Arq Bras CardiolArq Bras Cardiol2391arqbrascard0421031abcArquivos Brasileiros de Cardiologia0066-782X1678-4170Sociedade Brasileira de CardiologiaPMC8386991PMC8386991.1838699183869913249107810.36660/abc.20200406abc.202004061PosicionamentoPosicionamento da Sociedade Brasileira de Cardiologia para Gravidez e Planejamento Familiar na Mulher Portadora de Cardiopatia – 2020
https://orcid.org/0000-0001-5686-7058AvilaWalkiria Samuel AlexandreElizabeth Regina Giunco de CastroMarildes Luiza de LucenaAlexandre Jorge Gomes Marques-SantosCeli FreireClaudia Maria Vilas RossiEduardo Giusti CampanharoFelipe Favorette RiveraIvan Romero CostaMaria Elizabeth Navegantes Caetano RiveraMaria Alayde Mendonça de CarvalhoRegina Coeli Marques AbzaidAlexandre MoronAntonio Fernandes RamosAuristela Isabel de Oliveira AlbuquerqueCarlos Japhet da Mata FeioClaudine Maia Alves BornDaniel da SilvaFábio Bruno NaniFernando Souza TarasoutchiFlavio CostaJosé de RibamarJunior de MeloJosé XavierFilho KatzLeila AlmeidaMaria Cristina Costa GrinbergMax de AmorimMelania Maria Ramos de MeloNilson Roberto de MedeirosOrlando Otávio PomerantzeffPablo Maria Alberto BragaSérgio Luiz Navarro CristinoSonia Conde MartinezTania Leme da Rocha LealTatiana de Carvalho Andreuci Torres 
1
Instituto do Coração
Hospital das Clínicas da Faculdade de Medicina
Universidade de São Paulo
São PauloSP
Brasil
Instituto do Coração (Incor) do Hospital das Clínicas da Faculdade de Medicina da Universidade de São Paulo (HC-FMUSP),São Paulo, SP – Brasil

2
Hospital do Coração
São PauloSP
Brasil
Hospital do Coração (HCor),São Paulo, SP – Brasil

3
Hospital das Clínicas da Faculdade de Medicina
Universidade Federal de Minas gerais
Belo HorizonteMG
Brasil
Hospital das Clínicas da Faculdade de Medicina da Universidade Federal de Minas gerais (UFMG),Belo Horizonte, MG – Brasil

4
Hospital Agamenom Magalhães
RecifePE
Brasil
Hospital Agamenom Magalhães,Recife, PE – Brasil

5
Universidade Tiradentes
AracajuSE
Brasil
Universidade Tiradentes,Aracaju, SE – Brasil

6
Hospital São Lucas
Rede D'Or Aracaju
AracajuSE
Brasil
Hospital São Lucas, Rede D'Or Aracaju,Aracaju, SE – Brasil

7
Universidade Federal de Minas Gerais
Belo HorizonteMG
Brasil
Universidade Federal de Minas Gerais (UFMG),Belo Horizonte, MG – Brasil

8
Universidade Federal de São Paulo
Escola Paulista de Medicina
São PauloSP
Brasil
Universidade Federal de São Paulo (UNIFESP), Escola Paulista de Medicina (EPM),São Paulo, SP – Brasil

9
Hospital Israelita Albert Einstein
São PauloSP
Brasil
Hospital Israelita Albert Einstein,São Paulo, SP – Brasil

10
Universidade Federal de Alagoas
MaceióAL
Brasil
Universidade Federal de Alagoas,Maceió, AL – Brasil

11
Cardio Diagnóstico
BelémPA
Brasil
Cardio Diagnóstico,Belém, PA – Brasil

12
Centro Universitário Metropolitano da Amazônia
BelémPA
Brasil
Centro Universitário Metropolitano da Amazônia (UNIFAMAZ),Belém, PA – Brasil

13
Centro Universitário do Estado Pará
BelémPA
Brasil
Centro Universitário do Estado Pará (CESUPA),Belém, PA – Brasil

14
Secretaria de Saúde do Estado do Ceará
FortalezaCE
Brasil
Secretaria de Saúde do Estado do Ceará,Fortaleza, CE – Brasil

15
Instituto Dante Pazzanese de Cardiologia
São PauloSP
Brasil
Instituto Dante Pazzanese de Cardiologia,São Paulo, SP – Brasil

16
Hospital Metropolitano Oeste Pelópitas Silveira
RecifePE
Brasil
Hospital Metropolitano Oeste Pelópitas Silveira,Recife, PE – Brasil

17
Instituto de Medicina Integral Professor Fernando Figueira
RecifePE
Brasil
Instituto de Medicina Integral Professor Fernando Figueira (IMIP),Recife, PE – Brasil

18
Hospital Barão de Lucena
RecifePE
Brasil
Hospital Barão de Lucena,Recife, PE – Brasil

19
Hospital EMCOR
RecifePE
Brasil
Hospital EMCOR,Recife, PE – Brasil

20
Diagnósticos do Coração LTDA
RecifePE
Brasil
Diagnósticos do Coração LTDA,Recife, PE – Brasil

21
Universidade Federal do Pará
BelémPA
Brasil
Universidade Federal do Pará,Belém, PA – Brasil

22
UDI Hospital, Rede D'Or
São LuísMA
Brasil
UDI Hospital, Rede D'Or,São Luís, MA – Brasil

23
Centro Universitário de Belo Horizonte
Belo HorizonteMG
Brasil
Centro Universitário de Belo Horizonte,Belo Horizonte, MG – Brasil

24
Departamento de Obstetrícia e Ginecologia
Faculdade de Medicina
Universidade de São Paulo
São PauloSP
Brasil
Departamento de Obstetrícia e Ginecologia da Faculdade de Medicina da Universidade de São Paulo (USP),São Paulo, SP – Brasil

25
Ministério da Saíd
BrasíliaDF
Brasil
Ministério da Saúde,Brasília, DF – Brasil

26
Universidade de São Paulo
São PauloSP
Brasil
Universidade de São Paulo (USP),São Paulo, SP – Brasil
 Correspondência: Sociedade Brasileira de Cardiologia – Av. Marechal Câmara, 360/330 – Centro – Rio de Janeiro – CEP: 20020-907. E-mail: diretrizes@cardiol.brColaboradores: Alexandre Abzaid, Antonio Fernandes Moron, Auristela Isabel de Oliveira Ramos, Carlos Japhet da Mata Albuquerque, Claudine Maia Alves Feio, Daniel Born, Fábio Bruno da Silva, Fernando Souza Nani, Flavio Tarasoutchi, José de Ribamar Costa Junior, José Xavier de Melo Filho, Leila Katz, Maria Cristina Costa Almeida, Max Grinberg, Melania Maria Ramos de Amorim, Nilson Roberto de Melo, Orlando Otávio de Medeiros, Pablo Maria Alberto Pomerantzeff, Sérgio Luiz Navarro Braga, Sonia Conde Cristino, Tania Leme da Rocha Martinez, Tatiana de Carvalho Andreuci Torres Leal
2252020520201145388667849942220520202708202125102025https://creativecommons.org/licenses/by/4.0/ This is an Open Access article distributed under the terms of the Creative Commons Attribution Non-Commercial License, which permits unrestricted non-commercial use, distribution, and reproduction in any medium, provided the original work is properly cited. Errata
11512872020148148Arquivos Brasileiros de CardiologiaPMC838431032785492 

A desproporção entre o aumento no volume plasmático e a produção de glóbulos vermelhos resulta na anemia dilucional ou fisiológica da gravidez, mais aparente no final do 2º trimestre da gestação, quando o volume plasmático alcança seu pico em relação ao volume de hemácias. Assumindo que a função renal seja normal, o volume sanguíneo e os constituintes retornam aos valores prévios à gestação, em razão da diurese, após oito semanas do parto, enquanto a hemoglobina se eleva a partir do terceiro dia do puerpério. , 
No termo da gestação o volume sanguíneo é estimado em 100 ml/kg, quase duas vezes maior quando comparado aos 65 a 70 ml/kg em mulheres não grávidas. A massa de eritrócitos aumenta a partir da 8ª à 10ª semana de gestação, induzida pela elevação da eritropoetina no plasma.
Dentre os mecanismos hormonais utilizados para explicar a hipervolemia da gravidez, destacam-se: o estrógeno, que aumenta os níveis de renina, causando retenção de sódio e água corpórea total; a prolactina; o lactogeno placentário; as prostaglandinas; e o hormônio do crescimento.
Após a segunda metade da gestação, podem-se observar variações do débito cardíaco de repouso secundárias a mudanças na posição adotada pela gestante. A mudança de decúbito dorsal para lateral esquerdo, por exemplo, produz aumento de cerca de 22% do débito cardíaco, redução de aproximadamente 6% da frequência cardíaca e aumento de 27% do volume sistólico. A compressão da veia cava inferior pelo útero aumentado, na posição supina provoca a chamada síndrome da hipotensão supina, que pode se manifestar com tontura e/ou síncope. 
Durante a gravidez ocorre uma redução da pressão coloidosmótica plasmática em cerca de 12 a 18%, consequente à queda da concentração da albumina circulante, observada em níveis mais baixos durante a 24ª semana de gestação. Esse declínio piora o edema de membros inferiores e predispõe à congestão pulmonar gestantes e parturientes que recebem infusão intravenosa excessiva de cristaloides. 
A redução da resistência vascular periférica no início da gestação não é limitada ao plexo uterino e tem maior magnitude do que a concomitante elevação do débito cardíaco. Já na segunda metade da gestação, a resistência alcança os menores valores, momento em que o débito cardíaco chega ao seu máximo ( ). A dilatação arteriolar da gravidez tem sido atribuída aos componentes estrogênicos, à prolactina e ao aumento dos níveis de prostaglandina circulante (PGE2 e PGI2), substância responsável pela redução da resposta vascular à angiotensina exógena.
Um decréscimo na síntese de prostaglandinas ou um aumento no seu metabolismo podem resultar em incremento da responsividade vascular à angiotensina II, uma característica observada em grávidas que desenvolvem hipertensão. A progesterona e seus metabólitos também parecem participar da modulação da resposta vascular à angiotensina II durante a gravidez. Recentemente, tem-se demonstrado que alterações no tônus vascular durante a gravidez podem ser atribuídas, em parte, a mudanças na síntese de substâncias vasoativas derivadas do endotélio, destacando-se a endotelina, que, teoricamente, é capaz de mediar a síntese das prostaglandinas, e a redução do óxido nítrico, que tem sido relacionado com a vasodilatação da gestação. 
É oportuno ressaltar que, durante a gestação, o sistema arterial sofre um remodelamento para acomodar o volume sanguíneo aumentado. O estrógeno proporciona uma deposição de colágeno no interior da camada média das grandes e médias artérias; a elastase circulante favorece a ruptura da lâmina elástica e o enfraquecimento da média da parede dos vasos; e a relaxina, hormônio fator de crescimento insulina-like (detectado no plasma), causa redução da síntese de colágeno. Todos esses fatores explicam a predisposição à dissecção arterial durante a gravidez.
A pressão arterial sistólica (PAS) diminui desde o início até a metade da gestação, particularmente à custa da pressão diastólica, para, posteriormente, elevar-se e alcançar os valores pré-gestacionais quando se aproxima o termo ( ). A PAS eleva-se durante as contrações uterinas, principalmente no segundo estágio do trabalho de parto.

 

Ocasionalmente pode ocorrer um quadro de hipotensão ortostática secundário à redução do retorno venoso quando a gestante está na posição supina, com consequente queda do débito cardíaco. Considerando-se que o débito pulmonar é igual ao aórtico no adulto normal, as modificações da resistência vascular pulmonar são paralelas às da resistência vascular sistêmica. Nesse sentido, estudos recentes desafiam esse “dogma” e mostram uma tendência a elevação da pressão arterial em mulheres com índice de massa corporal (IMC) > 25 kg/m2 e obesas antes da gestação. 
O trabalho de parto normal está associado a alterações hemodinâmicas significativas, devido a ansiedade, esforço, dor, contrações uterinas, postura materna (lateral esquerda versus supina), involução uterina e sangramento. Durante o trabalho de parto, o sangue dos sinusoides uterinos é lançado para a circulação sistêmica a cada contração, aumentando a pré-carga em cerca de 500 ml de sangue, o que determina aumento do débito cardíaco e da pressão arterial. Assim, no segundo estágio do parto, o débito cardíaco está em torno de 50% mais elevado em relação ao pré-parto, e na expulsão fetal, 60 a 80% acima dos níveis pré-gestacionais. A brusca mudança do débito cardíaco é transitória, permanece elevada no puerpério imediato e não é acompanhada por variações da pressão arterial. No parto normal, perde-se em torno de 400 ml de sangue, podendo ser maior na cesariana, em torno de 800 ml. Após o período expulsivo, ocorre aumento súbito do retorno venoso, que se deve à autotransfusão do plexo uterino, à descompressão do fluxo da veia cava inferior e à redução da capacidade do sistema venoso. Além disso, a resistência vascular periférica está aumentada pela contração sustentada do útero, ocluindo os vasos que abrem na superfície materna da placenta. A autotransfusão contínua que ocorre durante 24 a 72 horas após o parto representa alto risco de congestão pulmonar na mulher cardiopata. 
Os efeitos cardiovasculares durante o parto também são influenciados pela eventual ocorrência de infecção, hemorragia e administração de anestésicos ou analgésicos. 
De modo geral, os padrões de alteração do volume sanguíneo materno durante o trabalho de parto, o período expulsivo e o puerpério obedecem às seguintes fases:
Hemoconcentração durante o trabalho de parto, variável com o grau de atividade uterina e de desidratação materna;
Redução do volume sanguíneo durante e imediatamente após o parto proporcionalmente à quantidade de sangue perdida;
Elevação imediata e transitória do volume sanguíneo após a dequitação placentária atribuída ao influxo de líquido para o espaço intravascular, devido ao esvaziamento uterino;
Discreta elevação do volume sanguíneo entre o segundo e terceiro dias do pós-parto, secundária ao aumento transitório da secreção de aldosterona;
Redução do volume plasmático após uma semana do parto, de modo que o volume sistólico materno pode apresentar uma discreta queda nesse período, normalizando-se em curto prazo.

## 2.1.2. Modificações da Coagulação Sanguínea
Durante a gravidez, ocorre uma ativação da síntese dos fatores de coagulação II, VII, VIII, IX e X, bem como do fibrinogênio, além da redução dos anticoagulantes endógenos (sobretudo da antitrombina e da proteína S), todos determinantes do estado de hipercoagulabilidade, peculiar a uma gravidez saudável. Essas modificações ocorrem progressivamente após o primeiro trimestre da gestação, com encurtamento dos tempos de protrombina, de tromboplastina parcial e de trombina, favorecendo a fragilização da função anticoagulante. Somando esses mecanismos à compressão mecânica do plexo venoso para os membros inferiores pelo útero gravídico, justifica-se a predisposição característica da gravidez ao tromboembolismo ( ).

 

## 2.1.3. Modificações Respiratórias ( )

 

O consumo de oxigênio aumenta em torno de 50%, especialmente nos dois últimos trimestres da gestação, e não é proporcional ao ganho de peso materno. O ganho ponderal durante a gestação inclui não somente a atividade metabólica do feto, mas também o peso do líquido amniótico e o aumento de fluido nos tecidos maternos, ambos considerados metabolicamente inertes. No trabalho de parto, o consumo de oxigênio eleva-se de 250 para 750 ml/min em cada contração. 
O trato respiratório normal é modificado durante a gravidez, o que induz à alcalose respiratória, com maior pressão arterial de oxigênio (PaO2) e menor de gás carbônico (PaCO2) ,quando comparado ao estado não gravídico. A menor PaCO2 favorece um gradiente de difusão que facilita a capacidade de o feto eliminar produtos do seu metabolismo aeróbico. 
O aumento da ventilação-minuto é acompanhado do incremento do volume corrente sem modificação da frequência respiratória. A hiperventilação materna é considerada um mecanismo protetor para o feto contra os efeitos prejudiciais de uma excessiva concentração de CO2 tecidual, ao mesmo tempo em que ocorre elevação da PaO2 para 100 mmHg.
Modificações da caixa torácica ocorrem com o aumento uterino e a elevação do diafragma. A circunferência torácica aumenta em torno de 5 a 7 cm, o ângulo subesternal alarga-se, e o diâmetro vertical diminui. Essas modificações são acompanhadas por alterações na distribuição do ar nos diversos compartimentos pulmonares.
O exame histológico da mucosa do trato respiratório superior durante a gravidez revela: hiperemia, hiperatividade glandular, aumento da atividade fagocítica e incremento do conteúdo de mucopolissacarídeo. A congestão nasal e a epistaxe, frequentes na gestação, possivelmente são causadas por essas alterações. A função das vias aéreas e respiratórias é preservada durante a gravidez, como refletido por um volume expiratório forçado inalterado no primeiro segundo (FEV1) e uma relação inalterada entre FEV1 e capacidade vital forçada (CVF). 
A redução de 25% da capacidade residual funcional (CRF) dos pulmões associa-se ao aumento similar da capacidade inspiratória (CI). Consequentemente, a capacidade vital (CV) não apresenta modificação durante a gravidez.
A diminuição da CRF para 300 ml durante a gravidez não é acompanhada do aumento da resistência das vias respiratórias, que, ao contrário, sofre uma redução importante, talvez por relaxamento da tonicidade da musculatura lisa secundário à ação hormonal. Essa redução serve para diminuir o trabalho da respiração.
Com a hiperventilação, ocorre um aumento na PaO2 e um desvio da curva de dissociação da hemoglobina para a direita. A gasometria normal em uma mulher grávida deve ter um pH entre 7,40 e 7,47, uma PaCO2 entre 30 e 32 e um aumento discreto da PaO2. A alcalose respiratória é compensada parcialmente pelo aumento da excreção renal de bicarbonato, o que mantém os níveis séricos de HCO3 entre 18 e 21 meq/L (déficit de base 3 a 4 meq/L). A diminuição na CRF pulmonar e o aumento no consumo de oxigênio reduzem a reserva de oxigênio materno, o que, em uma insuficiência respiratória, representa um estado de alerta para a adoção de medidas precoces de suporte respiratório ou ventilatório, a fim de não haver comprometimento fetal ou materno. 
O mecanismo da dispneia durante a gravidez normal não é totalmente claro. A hiperventilação induzida pela progesterona provavelmente é, pelo menos, parcialmente responsável, talvez devido à elevação da ventilação acima do nível necessário para atender ao aumento da demanda metabólica.

## 2.1.4. Mudanças na Parede Vascular
Mudanças hormonais da gravidez podem alterar a estrutura da parede vascular, resultando em fragilização da parede das artérias. O estrógeno influencia na deposição anormal de colágeno no interior da camada média das grandes e médias artérias. A elastase circulante pode provocar a ruptura da lâmina elástica e o enfraquecimento da média da parede dos vasos. Além disso, a relaxina, hormônio fator de crescimento insulina-like (detectado no plasma), causa redução da síntese de colágeno e predispõe à dissecção arterial. 

## 2.1.5. Pontos-chaves
O conhecimento das modificações fisiológicas do ciclo gravídico-puerperal é fundamental na conduta durante a gestação e na estratificação de risco de mulheres portadoras de cardiopatias.

## 2.2. Avaliação Materna e Fetal

## 2.2.1. Avaliação Clínica Materna

2.2.1.1. Anamnese e Exame Físico

A investigação clínica inicial da gestante cardiopata exige o questionamento sobre a história familiar no que diz respeito a doenças cardíacas genéticas transmissíveis. Destaca-se o histórico familiar de morte súbita prematura, cardiomiopatias, cardiopatias congênitas (CC), síndrome de Marfan, síndrome do QT longo, taquicardia ventricular (TV) catecolaminérgica e síndrome de Brugada.
As modificações fisiológicas da gravidez influenciam na avaliação do estado cardiovascular, e a interpretação entre ser ou não saudável exige um conhecimento especializado ( ).

 

As queixas de falta de ar (hiperventilação), fadiga fácil, diminuição da capacidade funcional ao exercício e estertores basais que desaparecem com tosse ou respiração profunda são sintomas que surgem com o crescimento uterino e seu efeito mecânico na compressão diafragmática, especialmente no final da gestação. Além disso, o edema periférico e as veias varicosas são frequentes nos estágios mais tardios da gestação. O pulso arterial sistêmico é caracterizado por um rápido aumento e um rápido colapso (“pequeno golpe de aríete”) a partir do primeiro trimestre.
Na palpação do tórax, nota-se que o “ictus” cardíaco é desviado para a esquerda, anterior, e girado em direção a uma posição transversal à medida que o útero aumenta. Como resultado, o impulso apical é deslocado para o quarto espaço intercostal e lateralmente para a linha hemiclavicular. O impulso ventricular esquerdo é relativamente hiperdinâmico, mas não sustentado; o ventrículo direito pode ser palpável porque, como o ventrículo esquerdo, ele suporta um volume maior de sangue, que é ejetado contra uma resistência relativamente baixa. À medida que a gravidez avança, o aumento das mamas e do abdômen dificulta, e às vezes impossibilita, a palpação adequada do coração. 
As alterações auscultatórias que acompanham a gestação normal começam no final do primeiro trimestre e geralmente desaparecem dentro de uma semana após o parto. Frequência cardíaca basal mais alta, sons cardíacos mais altos no precórdio, desdobramento da primeira e da segunda bulha no terceiro trimestre e sopros de ejeção sistólica (até grau 2/6) sobre as áreas pulmonar e tricúspide são regularmente detectados na ausculta cardíaca. A terceira bulha pode estar presente na maioria das mulheres grávidas; o quarto som do coração é raramente ouvido e, em geral, é patológico. O “hum” venoso é quase universal em mulheres saudáveis durante a gestação normal, mais audível sobre a borda esternal direita superior, atribuível ao aumento do retorno venoso. O sopro mamário (sistólico ou contínuo) é audível sobre o torax anterior no final da gestação e é peculiar à gravidez, decorrente do aumento do fluxo sanguíneo mamário. É especialmente comum após o parto em mulheres lactantes. 
Sopros diastólicos são incomuns em gestações normais. Quando ocorrem, podem refletir aumento do fluxo através da valva tricúspide ou mitral, ou dilatação fisiológica da artéria pulmonar. No entanto, esses sopros podem representar uma condição patológica, necessitando de investigação com exames subsidiários. 
O estado hiperdinâmico da gravidez pode manifestar-se com episódios de taquicardia, e a frequência basal de repouso pode oscilar em torno de 90 bpm. Bradicardias são raras; quando ocorrem, torna-se necessária uma investigação mais detalhada. O ritmo sinusal deve ser prevalente entre as grávidas, mas é muito comum a presença de extrassístoles supraventriculares ou ventriculares.
Na aferição da pressão arterial em grávidas, é aceito como diagnóstico da pressão diastólica o quarto ruído de Korotkoff, a partir do qual os sons começam a se modificar, o que às vezes não é facilmente reprodutível. Por isso, é fundamental aferir a pressão arterial em decúbito lateral esquerdo usando um método padronizado. A hipotensão arterial é um achado comum no primeiro trimestre, mantida até 22 a 24 semanas, com retorno da pressão arterial ao nível pré-gravidez quando próximo ao termo da gestação.

2.2.1.2. Pontos-chaves

Anamnese detalhada considerando os sintomas atuais e pregressos;
História familiar;
Exame fisico detalhado para diferenciar entre o normal e a doença cardíaca.

## 2.2.2. Avaliação Obstétrica e Fetal
As complicações obstétricas e perinatais são significativamente maiores em mulheres portadoras de cardiopatias, fato que resulta na primeira causa de morte materna durante o ciclo gravídico-puerperal. A carência de protocolos no atendimento da gestante cardiopata e a frágil interação multidisciplinar contribuem para o mau desfecho da gravidez. Nesse cenário, é necessária a elaboração de protocolos de atendimento alinhados na prevenção e no tratamento das complicações durante a gravidez, o parto e o puerpério da gestante cardiopata. O Serviço de Cardiopatia e Gravidez do Departamento de Obstetrícia da Universidaddse Federal de São Paulo propõe neste documento um protocolo apresentado na .

 

O plano de cuidado inclui: preparação e prontidão para o parto, em hospital de referência; obediência à rotina para pacientes anticoaguladas e em trabalho de parto prematuro; prevenção da hemorragia pós-parto (HPP); e a profilaxia de endocardite infecciosa.
Os principais fatores maternos que comprometem o crescimento e desenvolvimento fetais são: baixo débito cardíaco (insuficiência cardíaca [IC] e lesões cardíacas obstrutivas), hipoxemia (hipertensão pulmonar [HP], cardiopatias cianogênicas), uso de medicamentos (anticoagulantes, betabloqueadores, diuréticos, antiarrítmicos), hereditariedade (transmissão genética), infecções maternas (por Trypanosoma cruzi [T. cruzi]) e complicações obstétricas ( ).

 

As consequências para o concepto incluem a maior frequência de prematuridade, de recém-nascidos com crescimento intrauterino restrito (RCIU), de abortamentos, de anomalias cardíacas e não cardíacas e de morte. Complicações clínicas maternas que se associam ao baixo débito cardíaco causam maior frequência de baixo peso, índice de Apgar inferior a 7 e peso médio menor em 300 g, comparadas àquelas cujas gestações evoluíram sem complicações. 
A hipoxemia materna em portadoras de cardiopatias cianogênicas aumenta o risco fetal, mesmo existindo mecanismo de compensação para facilitar o recebimento de oxigênio pelo feto. A maioria dos recém-nascidos de mães hipoxêmicas é pequena para a idade gestacional e prematura. Observa-se também uma elevada frequência de abortos, proporcional aos valores elevados de hematócrito e hemoglobina materna.
O uso de anticoagulantes durante a gravidez causa perdas fetais expressivas. Estima-se que a incidência de abortos espontâneos no primeiro trimestre seja de 28,6 versus 9,2% para gestantes em uso de varfarina versus heparina, respectivamente. A varfarina sódica, quando usada no primeiro trimestre, causa em 5 a 10% a síndrome da varfarina fetal, que ocorre entre a sexta e a nona semana de gestação ( ). A incidência é variável porque, muitas vezes, a síndrome sob a visão clínica pode não ser identificada; porém, na avaliação de geneticistas, sua frequência é muito maior. O risco da síndrome varfarínica, quando comparado com o da população em geral, é de OR 3,86, (1,86 - 8,00 – IC 95%). Por isso, essas crianças devem ter uma avaliação genética detalhada na primeira infância e ser acompanhadas no desenvolvimento escolar.

 

Recém-nascidos de mães que utilizaram amiodarona, sotalol, inibidores da enzima de conversão da angiotensina (IECA), bloqueadores dos receptores da angiotensina (BRA) e outros medicamentos durante a gestação devem ter uma avaliação específica das anormalidades relacionadas a esses fármacos durante o período neonatal. Em pacientes que já foram operadas e sofreram transfusão sanguínea anterior, é essencial a pesquisa de infecções por hepatite B e pelo vírus da imunodeficiência humana (HIV), já que a utilização de medicamentos para essas condições pode diminuir a transmissão vertical.
A avaliação fetal deve ter periodicidade decidida pelo obstetra de acordo com a gravidade dos casos e os parâmetros a serem avaliados. Pacientes graves que incluem classe funcional (CF) III/IV (New York Heart Association – NYHA), doença valvar obstrutiva grave, cardiopatias cianogênicas, CC complexas e HP podem necessitar de reavaliação fetal, por ultrassom, até mesmo semanal. O doppler fetal das artérias uterinas durante o segundo trimestre tem a finalidade de prever pré-eclâmpsia. Ele inclui a avaliação das artérias umbilical, cerebral média e uterina, e da relação cérebro-placentária e ducto venoso ( ).

 

Na avaliação fetal por ultrassonografia (US), é importante estimar a idade gestacional, a vitalidade, a morfologia, o volume de líquido amniótico e o perfil de crescimento fetal. Se for detectada alguma anormalidade, a avaliação deve ser complementada por exames mais específicos, como doppler fetal, perfil biofísico fetal e ecocardiograma (ECO) fetal. Este último deve ser realizado de rotina e sempre após as 20 semanas, por indicação materna ou fetal. As indicações maternas são: diabetes melito, cardiopatia congênita de um dos pais, infecção materna relacionada à teratogenicidade (rubéola, citomegalovírus, HIV), doença de Chagas e toxoplasmose (relacionadas a miocardiopatias ou miocardites fetais), idade materna > 35 anos, fenilcetonúria, doenças do tecido conjuntivo (mais associadas a bloqueio atrioventricular fetal) e exposição a agentes teratogênicos. A avaliação complementar por indicações fetais são o achado de outras anormalidades em estudo morfológico, doenças cromossômicas e arritmias fetais.

2.2.2.1. Pontos-chaves

A morbimortalidade perinatal é maior em recém-nascidos de mães cardiopatas, quando comparada à população em geral;
Múltiplos fatores maternos associam-se a maior incidência de perdas fetais, malformações, RCIU e prematuridade;
Obstetras e neonatologistas devem atentar-se para as intercorrências neonatais relacionadas com a cardiopatia materna.

## 2.3. Exames Subsidiários Isentos de Radiação

## 2.3.1. Eletrocardiograma
O eletrocardiograma (ECG) é o primeiro método utilizado para confirmação diagnóstica na prática clínica cardiológica. Os critérios para a sua realização em gestantes seguem aqueles definidos para a população geral; contudo, ele não deve fazer parte da rotina pré-natal para triagem de doença cardíaca. O ECG deve servir para avaliação e acompanhamento de gestantes com uma cardiopatia prévia e para investigação de arritmias. 
As alterações fisiológicas da gestação devem ser consideradas na interpretação do registro eletrocardiográfico, destacando-se: discreto desvio do eixo elétrico para a esquerda; inversão da onda T nas derivações DIII, V1, V2 e, às vezes, V3; onda “q” proeminente nas paredes inferior e anterolateral; e aumento da duração da onda P e do intervalo QT. Medidas de duração da onda P e do intervalo QT nos três trimestres da gravidez mostraram prolongamento da duração da onda P no segundo trimestre e do intervalo QT máximo no termo da gestação. 
A depressão do segmento ST pode ser observada em 25 a 47% das gestantes durante o parto cesáreo ou 30 minutos depois, independentemente do tipo de anestesia utilizado. Nenhuma alteração sugestiva de isquemia foi observada durante o parto vaginal em gestantes normais. , 

## 2.3.2. Ecocardiograma
É o exame de escolha para investigação diagnóstica da maioria das cardiopatias, pela facilidade de uso, ausência de risco materno-fetal e pelo baixo custo, quando comparado a outros métodos. As indicações seguem as da população geral, seja para diagnóstico inicial, quando há suspeita de cardiopatia, para estratificação de risco pela medida da fração de ejeção ou do Strain global longitudinal, ou ainda, para determinação da conduta terapêutica clínica ou de intervenção percutânea ou cirúrgica, nas estenoses importantes das valvas mitral e aórtica.
A volemia aumentada da gestação pode determinar dilatação discreta das câmaras cardíacas (até 20% das câmaras direitas e 10 a 12% das esquerdas), refluxo discreto das valvas mitral e tricúspide, aparecimento de mínimos gradientes fisiológicos através das valvas e aumento de gradientes prévios, à gravidez, como nas lesões obstrutivas do coração. 
O ECO transesofágico é relativamente seguro e tem suas indicações convencionais, destacando-se que o risco de vômito e aspiração é aumentado principalmente após 20 semanas de gestação. Essa realidade exige a presença do anestesista, que auxilia na seleção da sedação mais adequada e no controle da ventilação materna e do monitoramento fetal durante o procedimento.
Nos períodos finais da gestação, pode ser notada a presença de pequeno derrame pericárdico consequente à retenção hídrica e salina excessiva, que desaparece no puerpério. Esses derrames não tem significado patológico e geralmente são assintomáticos; contudo, merecem uma reavaliação seis semanas após o parto.
O ECO fetal pode ser utilizado para a detecção de cardiopatia congênita e pode ser realizado a partir da 12ª semana de gestação, por via transvaginal, e da 18ª semana por via abdominal. Embora a principal indicação da ecocardiografia fetal seja a presença de alteração no exame de ultrassom de rotina, algumas indicações maternas são importantes para a realização do estudo, dentre as quais diabetes melito pré-gestacional ou identificada no primeiro trimestre de gestação, fenilcetonúria, lúpus eritematoso sistêmico (LES) e síndrome de Sjögren com anticorpos lúpicos positivos. Nesses casos, a presença de bloqueio atrioventricular total (BAVT) fetal em uma gestação anterior ou de LES neonatal aumenta a possibilidade de comprometimento fetal na próxima gestação, ou, às vezes, a alteração do ritmo cardíaco fetal determina a indicação de melhor avaliação materna para a pesquisa de auto-anticorpos.
Outras indicações são os casos de reprodução assistida, doença cardíaca congênita materna ou infecções, tais como a rubéola no primeiro trimestre da gestação ou outras viroses, quando existe a suspeita de miocardite ou pericardite fetal associada. Indicações menos precisas se referem ao uso materno de medicamentos no primeiro trimestre da gestação, como anticonvulsivantes, lítio, IECA, ácido retinóico, vitamina A, paroxetina e anti-inflamatórios não hormonais, seja pelos riscos de malformação fetal ou constricção ductal. 

## 2.3.3. Monitoramento Ambulatorial da Pressão Arterial
Monitoramento ambulatorial da pressão arterial (MAPA) é considerado um exame seguro, cuja principal indicação é a identificação da hipertensão arterial precoce, que ocorre nas primeiras 20 semanas da gestação. Estima-se que aproximadamente um terço das gestantes apresenta hipertensão do avental branco (HAB), e quase a metade delas pode desenvolver a hipertensão arterial verdadeira, com necessidade de tratamento. 
O monitoramento da pressão arterial em diferentes trimestres mostra resultados conflitantes em relação ao comportamento pressórico, tendo pouca utilidade para identificar gestantes que desenvolvem hipertensão tardia ou mesmo para predizer eventos adversos em pacientes hipertensas. Os valores de referência são os mesmos utilizados para a população geral, e não há estudos que sugiram o uso de rotina da MAPA para o diagnóstico ou o monitoramento da pressão arterial em substituição da medida convencional com tensiômetro. 

## 2.3.4. Sistema Holter-24 Horas
O sistema Holter é utilizado principalmente para a detecção ou estratificação de arritmias durante a gestação. As principais indicações são: investigação de palpitação, síncope ou pré-síncope sem causa aparente, ou, menos frequentemente, investigação de eventos neurológicos nos quais a fibrilação atrial (FA) possa estar envolvida na etiologia. 
O Holter é o modelo de exame para identificar e caracterizar as arritmias em simples ou complexas, sintomáticas ou assintomáticas, que são informações fundamentais para a conduta durante a gravidez. Destaca-se a sua indicação na investigação de FA paroxística, outras taquiarritmias, bradiarritmias sinusais sintomáticas e bloqueio atrioventricular de diferentes graus. O Holter tem também grande valor na avaliação de portadoras de marca-passo ou cardioversor desfibrilador implantável (CDI), na ocorrência de sintomas como palpitação, síncope ou pré-síncope, ou quando existe suspeita de falha de comando do dispositivo.

## 2.3.5. Teste Ergométrico
A principal indicação do teste ergométrico durante a gestação é a investigação de doença isquêmica coronariana. A realização de teste submáximo, alcançando 80% da frequência cardíaca máxima prevista, parece ser um método seguro durante a gestação, mas a carência de estudos não possibilita validar a sua indicação para definir doença isquêmica. Por isso, não há recomendação de realização do teste ergométrico durante a gestação para investigação de doença isquêmica coronária. Da mesma maneira, a utilização do estresse com dobutamina deve ser contraindicada durante a gravidez.
Em contrapartida, antes da concepção, a resposta cronotrópica anormal identificada no teste ergométrico em pacientes cardiopatas parece ser uma informação preditiva de eventos adversos na futura gravidez. Na mesma linha de investigação, o teste ergoespirométrico é válido para a avaliação da reserva miocárdica, particularmente em portadora de CC. 

## 2.3.6. Pontos-chaves
O ECG e o ECO devem ser indicados na suspeita de doença cardíaca;
O ECO fetal é indicado nas CC ou quando há suposição de comprometimento fetal decorrente de doença materna;
O Sistema Holter de 24 horas auxilia na identificação e estratificação das arritmias cardíacas;
A principal indicação da MAPA é a identificação da hipertensão arterial “precoce”, que ocorre nas primeiras 20 semanas da gestação;
O teste ergométrico não é indicado na investigação de doença isquêmica coronária durante a gestação;
O teste ergoespirométrico auxilia na estratificação de risco em portadoras de CC no planejamento da gestação.

## 2.4. Exames de Imagem com Radiação
A utilização de exames por imagens radiológicas em adultos cardiopatas corresponde a 12% da totalidade dos exames a que esses pacientes são expostos e a 40% da dose total de radiação que receberão durante toda a vida. Assim, causa preocupação a realização de exames que emitem radiação durante a gravidez e lactação.
As medidas de radiação ionizante podem ser em sieverts (Sv), que expressa a dose equivalente de radiação no tecido, ou em gray (Gy), indicando a dose total da radiação. O Sv é a medida de maior significado biológico. 
Existem dois efeitos biológicos da radiação: o determinístico, que leva à morte celular quando se excede a dose máxima recomendada de radiação, tornando-se evidente após alguns dias, semanas ou meses do procedimento (catarata, leucopenia, anemia, esterilidade e outros); e o estocástico, que causa transformação celular com alteração aleatória no DNA (ácido desoxirribonucleico) de uma única célula, que continua a se reproduzir. Quando o dano ocorre em célula germinativa, efeitos genéticos ou hereditários podem ocorrer. Não apresenta limiar de dose, podendo o dano ser causado por uma dose mínima de radiação. Além disso, os efeitos são difíceis de serem medidos experimentalmente, devido ao longo período de latência. Dentre os principais exemplos estão o câncer (leucemia de 5 a 7 anos, tumores sólidos de 10 a 15 anos ou mais) e os efeitos genéticos. Verifica-se que o risco estocástico é máximo em crianças e maior em mulheres quando comparadas aos homens, sendo reduzido em 50% entre os idosos octagenários. 
Durante a gravidez, os efeitos biológicos da radiação no embrião dependem da dose e da idade gestacional, podendo ser divididos em quatro categorias: óbito intrauterino, malformações, distúrbios do crescimento e desenvolvimento, e efeitos mutagênicos e carcinogênicos. , 
Admite-se que o risco não carcinogênico, que inclui aborto e malformação, é insignificante nas doses inferiores a 50 mGy, comparado a outros riscos da gravidez. Em contrapartida, estima-se que doses superiores a 100 mGy apresentam potenciais efeitos sobre o feto/embrião de acordo com a idade gestacional, tal como: morte fetal quando a exposição ocorre entre a primeira e a segunda semana de gestação; graves anormalidades no sistema nervoso central (hidrocefalia, microcefalia, retardo mental) entre a 3ª e a 15ª semana; retardo mental, microcefalia e restrição de crescimento fetal entre a 16ª e a 30ª semana; após a 32ª semana de gestação, os efeitos teratogênicos são ausentes, mas permanece o risco aumentado de desenvolvimento de neoplasia maligna durante a infância e na idade adulta. A indicação de interrupção da gestação poderia ser considerada em doses de radiação entre 100 e 500 mGy, com base em circunstâncias individuais, como doença maligna materna que requer imagens seriadas durante a gestação, procedimentos intervencionistas ou radioterapia. 
Nesse sentido, é importante lembrar que a incidência natural de anomalias congênitas na população em geral varia entre 0,5 e 5%, e que a exposição à dose de 10 mGy de radiação associa-se à probabilidade de malformações, microcefalia e retardo mental da ordem de 0,5, 0,4 e 0,1%, respectivamente. Ainda nessa linha de investigação, estudos demonstram que a exposição uterina mesmo a baixas doses de radiação (20 mGy) aumenta o risco de câncer na infância e de ocorrência de leucemia, por um fator de 1,5 a 2,0, quando comparado à incidência naturaldessas doenças. Os principais métodos radiológicos e as doses de radiação absorvidas pelo feto, pelo paciente e pelas mamas (durante a lactação) estão expostos na .

 

Deve-se lembrar que não existe exame radiológico único que exponha o feto a doses superiores a 250 mGy, o que pode ocorrer em uma combinação de exames, ou na vigência de um tratamento essencial à mãe.
Fluoroscopia, radiografias, cateterismo cardíaco e radiologia intervencionista, quando não envolvem diretamente o útero ou a exposição direta do abdômen, resultam em doses de radiação pouco significativas ao feto. Nesse sentido, devem-se considerar estratégias que possam reduzir a radiação, às vezes em torno de 30 a 65%. Dentre elas, destacam-se: uso de protetores de chumbo sobre o abdômen, colimação do feixe de raios X para a área de interesse, utilização de equipamentos permanentemente calibrados e aferidos, preferência por radiografias digitais e redução do tempo de fluoroscopia e do número de imagens adquiridas. Além disso, as ampliações devem ser realizadas com o emprego de menor número de imagens e de exposições.
Nos exames de cintilografia nuclear, a exposição do feto à radiação ionizante provém da radioatividade acumulada no organismo materno e do transporte e difusão do radiofármaco através da placenta. A cintilografia ventilação/perfusão (V/Q) é a imagem cintilográfica mais frequente com dose materna reduzida, quando comparada à angiotomografia pulmonar (ATCP). Entretanto, esta fornece doses mais baixas quando o feto ainda é pequeno e mais longe do campo de visão ou tórax.
A cintilografia V/Q e a ATCP têm eficácia no diagnóstico da embolia pulmonar durante a gravidez, embora a ATCP demonstre vantagem de identificar outras doenças pulmonares. Considera-se que, na suspeita clínica de embolia pulmonar, a radiografia de tórax simples e a US com doppler de membros inferiores bilateral sejam os exames iniciais para orientar a indicação da cintilografia V/Q, que deve ser preferível à ATCP quando ambas estiverem disponíveis. Estresse farmacológico com uso de vasodilatadores, tanto com a adenosina como com o dipiridamol, não é recomendado durante a gestação, pelos riscos decorrentes da hipotensão ortostática.

## 2.4.1. Administração de Agentes de Contrastes
Agentes de contraste iodados não apresentam efeitos teratogênicos e podem ser usados na forma oral ou intravenosa, quando a informação do exame é importante para conduta imediata; de outra maneira, seu uso deve ser adiado para após o parto. Isso porque a maturação da tireoide fetal se dá a partir de 12 semanas e está em mínimo funcionamento na 20ª semana de gestação. Assim, a preocupação é o agente de contraste iodado induzir ao desenvolvimento de hipotireoidismo, embora, nas últimas três décadas, não haja registro de ocorrências nessa situação. Em casos de reação alérgica ao contraste, a difenilefedrina e os corticosteroides podem ser utilizados com segurança. Nas situações de prevenção, a prednisona e a dexametasona devem ser consideradas, porque a maioria desses agentes é metabolizada na placenta antes de alcançar o feto. Contudo, há relatos de casos de supressão adrenal do feto com o uso de corticosteroides, e a metilprednisona foi associada a lábio leporino quando usada antes de 10 semanas de gestação. 
Mais recentemente, têm sido utilizados tomógrafos com múltiplas fileiras de detectores (multislice), proporcionando vantagens indiscutíveis, principalmente relacionadas a rapidez e definição em estudos abdominais e angiográficos (angio-TC). Todavia, esses benefícios têm sido acompanhados de aumento significativo das doses de radiação absorvidas em órgãos abdominais, em torno de 90 a 180%, quando comparados aos equipamentos helicoidais com uma única linha de detectores. Ao mesmo tempo que a tecnologia multislice se consolida como ferramenta extremamente útil em estudos tóracoabdominais, faz-se necessário um investimento na otimização e no ajuste de protocolos que visem ao controle e à limitação da dose de radiação emitida, principalmente durante a gestação.

## 2.4.2. Ressonância Magnética Nuclear
A ressonância magnética cardíaca (RMC) é aconselhável quando outros métodos de diagnóstico não invasivos são insuficientes para definir o diagnóstico, sendo preferível aos exames de imagem que emitem radiação ionizante. A exposição durante o primeiro trimestre da gestação não foi associada a efeitos nocivos ao feto ou à criança na primeira infância.
As evidências considerando o uso de contraste gadolínio durante a gravidez são controversas. O gadolínio (Gd+3) é um íon metálico paramagnético que, no organismo, tem comportamento farmacológico semelhante ao meio de contraste iodado, ou seja, atua como um agente extracelular, difundindo-se rapidamente do compartimento intravascular para o espaço intersticial. Não foi documentada a ocorrência de quaisquer efeitos na mutação ou teratogênicos após a administração inadvertida de meios de contraste baseados em gadolínio durante a gravidez. Contudo, dependendo da dose, seu uso parece estar associado a maiores riscos de manifestações cutâneas dos tipos reumático, inflamatório e infiltrativo, além de perdas fetais. 
O íon de gadolínio na sua forma livre é neurotóxico; no entanto, sua ligação a um agente quelante forma um complexo estável, protegendo o organismo contra os efeitos adversos. Os quelatos de gadolínio atravessam a barreira placentária e podem acumular-se na cavidade amniótica; contudo, alguns estudos demonstraram que apenas 0,01% da dose está presente na circulação fetal 4 horas após a administração do contraste, e que apenas vestígios são detectados após 24 horas.
Durante a lactação, ambos os agentes de contraste iodados e o gadolínio têm baixa solubilidade lipídica, e sua concentração no leite materno é inferior a 1 e 0,04%, respectivamente. Por isso, a Academia Americana de Pediatria e a OMS recomendam não suspender a lactação.
A obtenção do consentimento informado e o esclarecimento às pacientes sobre os riscos inerentes dos exames necessários à conduta médica são medidas essenciais que devem fazer parte da decisão interdisciplinar na indicação do exame com radiação durante a gestação, o que inclui o obstetra e a equipe de radiologia.

## 2.4.3. Pontos-chaves
A indicação de exame radiológico deve considerar o real benefício para a determinação da conduta terapêutica durante a gestação e na impossibilidade de substituição por método alternativo sem radiação (US, ECO e ressonância magnética);
O médico radiologista é o profissional mais preparado para avaliar a melhor opção diagnóstica em determinada situação clínica, garantindo segurança à gestante e ao feto;
Os exames radiológicos devem ser feitos em instituições que possam garantir a adoção de medidas efetivas de proteção radiológica e possuam equipamentos modernos e regularmente calibrados e aferidos;
A RMC é um exame complementar para definição do diagnóstico de cardiopatia. É seguro durante a gestação, contudo o uso de gadolínio deve ser evitado;
A necessidade de exame com radiação demanda uma discussão interdisciplinar que envolve radiologista, cardiologista e obstetra, além do consentimento informado da paciente.

## 2.5. Fármacos de Ação Cardiovascular na Gravidez e no Aleitamento
A necessidade de terapêutica farmacológica é muito frequente durante a gravidez e a lactação. Estima-se que 34% das gestantes cardiopatas utilizam medicamentos cardiovasculares de acordo com a seguinte distribuição: betabloqueadores (22%), antiplaquetários (8%), diuréticos (7%), IECA (2,8%) e estatinas (0,5%). Nessa casuística, a prevalência de eventos adversos ao feto, particularmente o RCIU, foi duas vezes maior quando comparado às gestantes que não utilizaram medicação. 
Presume-se que 10 a 15% das mulheres cardiopatas apresentam complicações cardíacas que exigem tratamento farmacológico durante a gestação como na doença hipertensiva gestacional, nas arritmias cardíacas, na IC e no tromboembolismo. , Entretanto, a prescrição de medicamentos durante a gravidez exige conhecimentos básicos sobre a farmacocinética e a classificação dos fármacos quanto à segurança materno-fetal durante a gestação e na lactação.
A farmacocinética dos medicamentos é influenciada pelas modificações fisiológicas da gravidez, acarretando, muitas vezes, uma redução da concentração plasmática dos fármacos de tal maneira que eventuais ajustes nas doses devem ser cogitados para se obter a eficácia terapêutica. A resume os aspectos que merecem as seguintes considerações:

 

A absorção dos fármacos administrados por via oral é reduzida devido ao retardo da motilidade intestinal. Além disso, o uso de antiácidos e de ferro como suplemento parece induzir a quelação de medicamentos em meio de pH gástrico aumentado, provocando redução na biodisponibilidade do fármaco; 
O volume de distribuição dos fármacos é aumentado durante a gestação decorrente da expansão do volume plasmático contribuindo para redução do pico de concentração do fármaco; 
O metabolismo hepático está acelerado durante a gestação porque a perfusão hepática é maior. Isso significa que a fração do fármaco removido da circulação pelo fígado está aumentada de tal modo que medicamentos como propanolol, nitroglicerina e verapamil são extraídos mais rápido da circulação sistêmica. Fármacos como a varfarina, que não depende do fluxo, mas da atividade hepática e da fração livre no plasma, não sofrem influências na sua concentração durante a gravidez. Por outro lado, níveis plasmáticos de nifedipina e do metoprolol estão reduzidos na gravidez por conta da maior atividade de catalização enzimática; 
Aumento de 85% do fluxo sanguíneo renal quando comparado aos níveis pré-gestacionais. , Contudo, a função tubular é variável, com redução na excreção de ácido úrico e na absorção de glicose, e aumento na excreção de proteína. 
Quanto à segurança, a maioria dos estudos de fármacos na gestação é realizada em animais e tem pouca aplicabilidade porque os efeitos são, de modo geral, espécie-específicos. Os estudos em humanos quase sempre são retrospectivos e incluem casuísticas pequenas. As gestantes, salvo raras circunstâncias, são excluídas dos grandes ensaios clínicos. Assim, a literatura médica sobre fármacos na gestação tem, na maioria, questionável evidência científica.
Em 1979, a Food and Drug Administration (FDA) introduziu a classificação dos medicamentos de acordo com as categorias de A a X, muito utilizadas na prática diária. Essa classificação rotulava os fármacos de acordo com estudos em animais e mulheres em categorias que variavam desde fármacos que não apresentavam riscos ao feto (categoria A) até aqueles teratogênicos (categoria X).
Em 2015, a classificação (A, B, C, D e X) foi substituída pela denominada Pregnancy and Lactation Labelling Rule (PLLR), que atualmente tem sido mais aceita. Ela fornece um resumo descritivo e informações detalhadas sobre estudos em animais e ensaios clínicos, como exposto na .

 

## 2.5.1. Anti-hipertensivos ( )

 

Nifedipina: ação hipotensora e tocolítica; não teratogênica. Pode requerer encurtamento do intervalo das tomadas ou maior dose devido ao metabolismo hepático acelerado, mediado pela CYP3A4. Hipotensão mais acentuada com uso de sulfato de magnésio concomitante. - 
Alfametildopa (agonista receptor α2-adrenérgico): não é teratogênica, considerada como segura e eficaz no tratamento da doença hipertensiva gestacional com resultados favoráveis nos desfechos primários e secundários tais como controle da pressão arterial, crescimento fetal e prematuridade. Os efeitos maternos adversos tais como, hipotensão postural, síndrome lúpus “like”, depressão, congestão nasal, sonolência e toxicidade hepática, foram registrados em 1% dos casos tratados. , 
Hidralazina: vasodilatador arteriolar direto, de uso oral ou intravenoso nas emergências hipertensivas. Os efeitos adversos são sintomas maternos de lúpus “like” e trombocitopenia fetal. 
Clonidina: agonista α2 tem efeito hemodinâmico divergente, na redução da resistência vascular versus redução no débito cardíaco, e consequente impacto no crescimento fetal. A suspensão abrupta pode causar hipertensão “rebote”. Não é teratogênica. É disponível por via transdérmica. 
Os diuréticos são indicados na hipervolemia e na IC; no entanto, a redução do volume plasmático, débito cardíaco e fluxo placentário é a principal restrição ao uso de diuréticos durante a gravidez. Seu uso durante a gravidez não tem sido relacionado a efeitos prejudiciais ao concepto. Furosemida é o mais utilizado, enquanto a hidroclorotiazida tem sido relacionada a menor peso ao nascer, icterícia e trombocitopenia neonatal. 
Betabloqueador: o atenolol não é recomendado porque seu uso está associado à RCIU e a recém-nascidos de baixo peso. 
Amlodipina: pode ser considerado tratamento de segunda linha sem referência a teratogênico quando usado no primeiro trimestre da gravidez. 
IECA, BRA, inibidores diretos da renina e antagonistas da aldosterona: contraindicados na gravidez e não devem ser prescritos em mulheres que desejam engravidar. Esses medicamentos causam disgenesia renal, oligoidrâmnio, insuficiência renal, RCIU, anúria neonatal e morte fetal, particularmente no segundo e terceiro trimestres da gravidez. No entanto, os IECA podem ser usados na lactação. Antagonistas da aldosterona têm efeitos antiandrogênicos no feto masculino e são contraindicados na lactação. , 

## 2.5.2. Antiarrítmicos ( )

 

Adenosina: nucleosídio com meia-vida de segundos. É seguro, mas os efeitos adversos incluem bradiarritmias, dispneia, dor precordial e rubor. , 
Betabloqueadores: são os fármacos mais utilizados durante a gestação. Não são teratogênicos. Estudos controlados mostram maior frequência de bradicardia e hipoglicemia neonatal, além de maior risco de prematuridade e de recém-nascidos pequenos para a idade gestacional. - 
Atenolol: hidrofílico com eliminação renal, é contraindicado pelo elevado risco de RCIU. , Propranolol é seguro; porém, dependendo da dose, pode ocorrer RCIU, hipoglicemia, policitemia e hiperbilirrubinemia. Metoprolol é bem tolerado, com clearance alto na segunda metade da gestação. Considera-se que o succinato seja mais seguro do que o tartarato porque as doses são menores e podem ser fracionadas. , Sotalol está associado à torsades de pointes devido ao prolongamento do intervalo QT. O Sotalol apresenta-se em concentração maior no leite materno, devendo ser suspenso na lactação. Em casos de manutenção da lactação, o controle eletrocardiográfico deve ser feito na mãe e no neonato. De acordo com as Diretrizes ESC 2018, o sotalol foi contraindicado na gestação e lactação por conta do risco de morte súbita materno-fetal. A proposta é a substituição por propafenona ou flecainide. Contudo, a restrição ao uso de sotalol durante a gravidez e a lactação ainda é controversa, uma vez que os resultados no controle de arritmias complexas têm sido satisfatórios na prática dos especialistas. Embora não existam estudos adequados, o sotalol é parece ser mais seguro quando comparado à amiodarona. - 
Amiodarona: lipofílica, acumula-se no músculo esquelético e no tecido adiposo, com meia-vida de semanas a meses. Os efeitos adversos são disfunção tireoidiana (causando o hipotireoidismo neonatal em 17 a 25% dos casos) e comprometimento do desenvolvimento neurológico. Deve ser contraindicada na gestação. - 
Lidocaína: mais estudada como agente anestésico do que como antiarrítmico. Sessenta por cento dela é ligada a proteína plasmática, entrando rapidamente na circulação materna e na placenta. Pode levar à depressão do sistema nervoso central do feto quando usada em altas doses. , 
Propafenona: é recomendada para a prevenção de taquicardia supraventricular em pacientes com síndrome de Wolff Parkinson White, na taquicardia atrial e na FA refratária a agentes com bloqueio nodal. 
Procainamida: associada à síndrome lúpus “like” materna. 

## 2.5.3. Fármacos na Insuficiência Cardíaca ( )

 

Carvedilol: há carência de estudos. É o betabloqueador cardiosseletivo de primeira escolha. Não é teratogênico e não tem sido associado a RCIU. 
Bisoprolol: não está associado a maior risco de abortamento espontâneo ou mal formação fetal quando usado no primeiro trimestre da gestação. Contudo, RCIU não pode ser descartada no seu uso prolongado, durante toda a gestação. , 
Hidralazina: fármaco que substitui os IECA e BRA. 
Nitratos: não são usados de rotina e não são teratogênicos. Baixa tolerância materna devido a hipotensão e cefaleia. 
Sacubitril/valsartana: é contraindicado durante a gravidez e, apesar de não haver estudos sobre excreção no leite humano, também não há recomendação de uso durante a amamentação.
Ivabradina: estudos em animais mostram sua associação com mal-formação, bradicardia e alteração no crescimento fetal.

## 2.5.4. Antiplaquetários ( )

 

Aspirina: em baixas doses, é segura em qualquer fase da gestação. , , Não é teratogênico, apresenta risco de sangramento materno-fetal. Deve ser suspenso três dias antes do parto. , , 
Clopidogrel: não há estudos que assegurem o seu uso durante a gravidez. Parece não ser teratogênico. A recomendação do uso do clopidogrel deve ser em casos muito específicos, porque a sua suspensão, obrigatório antes do parto, pode prejudicar o tratamento da doença para a qual está sendo indicado. , 

## 2.5.5. Trombolíticos ( )

 

Não ultrapassam a barreira placentária, mas apresentam risco de hemorragia materna. 

## 2.5.6. Anticoagulantes ( )

 

A varfarina sódica, quando usada no primeiro trimestre, causa a síndrome da varfarina fetal em 5 a 10% dos casos. A incidência é variável porque, muitas vezes, a síndrome sob a visão clínica pode ser imperceptível, embora, na avaliação de geneticistas, sua frequência seja muito maior. O risco de aborto espontâneo (menos de 20 semanas de gestação) é quase 30% e o de natimorto (mais de 20 semanas de gestação) é de 10%, ambos causados pela intoxicação varfarínica. A hemorragia materna do parto em pacientes em uso de varfarina é séria; contudo, mais grave é a hemorragia intracraniana neonatal e suas sequelas. , Para pacientes sob uso de anticoagulante oral que entram em trabalho de parto prematuro, a indicação é parto cesárea.
A hipótese de que doses inferiores a 5 mg de varfarina podem causar menor risco de embriopatia não tem apoio em estudos apropriados para servir de base na orientação da anticoagulação no primeiro trimestre da gestação. Entende-se que a propriedade teratogênica de um fármaco independe da sua dose. De fato, recentes relatos vêm demonstrando a ocorrência da embriopatia mesmo em doses inferiores a 5 mg de varfarina. , Conclui-se que é de “boa prática” que a dose de varfarina seja adequada em busca da meta terapêutica, controlada pelo índice internacional normalizado (INR) e individualizada para cada situação clínica.
A heparina não ultrapassa a barreira placentária. A apresenta as vantagens da heparina de baixo peso molecular (HBPM) sobre a heparina não fracionada (HNF). Ambas se associam ao risco de 10 a 15% de abortos espontâneos devido à hemorragia placentária. O uso permanente da HNF durante a gravidez apresenta riscos maternos, como: hemorragia (2%); osteoporose (30%); fraturas espontâneas (2%) e trombocitopenia (5 a 15%). Entretanto, parece que esses efeitos adversos são menores com o uso da HBPM. O controle da anticoagulação da HNF deve ser diário, de acordo com tempo de tromboplastina parcial ativado (TTPA), com meta de 1,5 a 2 vezes maior que o valor basal. Já o controle da HBPM deve ser semanal, de acordo com os valores terapêuticos entre 0,6 e 1,2 IU/ml do fator antiXa, nas pacientes com próteses valvares mecânicas.

 

A anticoagulação ainda é um desafio terapêutico. Exige conhecimento do risco de trombose para cada situação clínica e dos efeitos colaterais dos anticoagulantes nos diversos momentos do ciclo gravídico-puerperal. O fato é que, quando existe indicação de anticoagulação, a gravidez não deve influenciar no rigor e nas metas convencionais. A fondaparinux tem se mostrado uma alternativa segura quando as heparinas não são toleradas. , 
Novos anticoagulantes orais (NOACS): A carência de dados sobre o uso dos NOACS, não permite o seu uso durante a gestação.

## 2.5.7. Hipolipemiantes ( )

 

A primeira escolha é a colestiramina, considerada a mais segura. As estatinas não parecem ser teratogênicas. Não está esclarecida sua correlação a anomalias congênitas; contudo, devido à carência de estudos, o seu uso deve ser desaconselhado durante a gestação e deve ser suspenso na pré-concepção. - Gemfibrozil, fenofibrate e ezetimibe são considerados com potencial teratogênico. 
O tratamento da hipertensão arterial pulmonar (HAP) será discutido no tópico 3.6.3. Os fármacos liberados para o uso durante a gravidez incluem: , 
Prostaglandinas: epoprostenol, treprostinil, Iloprost;
Inibidores da fosfodiesterase 5: sildenafil e tadalafil;
Bloqueadores dos canais de cálcio (BCC): diltiazen e nifedipina;
Óxido nítrico: via inalatória.
Os fármacos contraindicados durante a gravidez são: , 
Antagonistas do receptor da endotelina: bosentan, ambrisentam e macitentan;
Estimuladores da guanilatociclase: riociguat.

## 2.5.8. Pontos-chaves
As recomendações básicas para a prescrição de medicamentos durante a gravidez, quando possível, são:
Considerar a farmacocinética durante a gravidez antes da prescrição;
Prescrever quando houver indicação de tratamento e o seu benefício superar o potencial risco;
Orientar a prescrição pela classificação PLLR;
Evitar medicação no primeiro trimestre da gestação;
Usar a menor dose, desde que efetiva, pelo menor tempo e, fracionar a dose diária;
Usar medicamentos que já sejam amplamente aceitos e seguros na gestação;
Considerar que fármacos com peso molecular inferior a 1.500 Da atravessam a placenta e alcançam a circulação fetal;
Orientar a pré-concepção para mulheres que fazem uso permanente de medicamentos;
Considerar que a prioridade do tratamento é materna, mas os riscos obstétricos e fetais devem ser considerados.

## 2.6. Princípios de Conduta Durante a Gravidez

## 2.6.1. Estilo de Vida
A gravidez é a época ideal para modificar o estilo de vida. Isso porque, enquanto gestante, a mulher está motivada a melhorar hábitos não saudáveis pela preocupação com a saúde do concepto, como cessar o tabagismo e o etilismo, consumir dieta mais equilibrada ou controlar o peso.
O tabagismo está relacionado a complicações como placenta prévia, descolamento prematuro da placenta, baixo peso fetal e prematuridade, até mesmo em fumantes passivas. O consumo de bebida alcoólica deve ser evitado porque pode provocar atraso no crescimento fetal e anomalias da face e do sistema nervoso central. 
A gravidez em cardiopatas deve ser acompanhada por equipe multidisciplinar, com consultas mensais ao cardiologista durante a primeira metade da gestação, quinzenais após a 21ª semana e semanais até o parto, devendo respeitar a constante interação com o obstetra, o que assegura a melhor conduta nas diversas fases da gestação.
Entretanto, tais rotinas devem ser alteradas conforme a gravidade do caso. Nesse sentido, recomenda-se que gestantes em uso permanente de anticoagulantes tenham avaliação semanal para o controle clínico e laboratorial. Portadoras de cardiopatias com risco IV-OMS devem ser hospitalizadas no terceiro trimestre da gestação para estabilização clínica e planejamento do parto. Além disso, cuidados com alimentação, atividade física, qualidade do sono, redução do estresse e carga horária do trabalho, dependendo da atividade e da cardiopatia, devem ser recomendados. Ademais, a revisão e o ajuste das medicações de uso continuado, assim como a suspensão ou substituição daquelas que são prejudiciais ao feto, devem ser condutas antecipadas à concepção, ou seja, na fase do planejamento da gestação.

## 2.6.2. Atividade Física
Na gravidez não complicada, os benefícios da atividade física são indiscutíveis e incluem: melhora da resistência física e da função cardiorrespiratória; redução de estresse, ansiedade e risco de comorbidades relacionadas ao sedentarismo; e ganho ponderal. , Contudo, o Colégio Americano de Obstetras e Ginecologistas contraindica o exercício na gravidez em portadoras de cardiopatias com repercussão hemodinâmica, pacientes classificadas como riscos III e IV-OMS e em casos de pré-eclâmpsia, hipertensão induzida pela gravidez, anemia grave e doença pulmonar restritiva. 

## 2.6.3. Dieta
A dieta equilibrada fornece nutrientes essenciais ao desenvolvimento do concepto e previne complicações relacionadas ao descontrole do peso na gestante. A obesidade está associada a aborto, recém-nascidos com baixo peso, macrossomia, diabetes gestacional, tromboembolismo e hipertensão gestacional, enquanto a desnutrição está ligada a prematuridade, baixo peso ao nascer e morte perinatal. A despeito da dieta adequada, as metas nutricionais exigem também suplementação oral, como apresentado na . A ingesta de alimentos ricos em ácido fólico e a suplementação nas doses de 1 a 5 mg/dia antes da concepção e durante o primeiro trimestre evitam o defeito do tubo neural em 72% dos casos. A suplementação de cálcio (≥ 1 g/dia) está associada à redução significativa no risco de pré-eclâmpsia (particularmente nas mulheres com ingesta baixa de cálcio), bem como à diminuição da prematuridade e da ocorrência do desfecho composto “morte materna ou morbidade grave”. A OMS recomenda 1,5 a 2 g de cálcio por dia para mulheres grávidas com baixa ingestão de cálcio na dieta.

 

O consumo de peixe é a principal fonte de exposição materna não ocupacional ao metilmercúrio, que é encontrado em todos os tecidos do peixe e é absorvido em mais de 95%. Contudo, apesar do risco de intoxicação pelo mercúrio, estudos de coorte mostraram que o maior consumo materno de peixe no pré-natal estava associado a melhor desenvolvimento neurológico em recém-nascidos e que a ingestão moderada (até três refeições por semana) antes das 22 semanas de gestação estava ligada à redução da prematuridade de repetição. Entretanto, recente revisão sistemática e metanálise de ensaios randomizados não mostraram significância estatística no efeito dos ácidos graxos poli-insaturados de cadeia longa (n-3 PUFA) em reduzir prematuridade ou qualquer outro efeito nos conceptos, como desenvolvimento neurológico, cognitivo ou acuidade visual. , 
Quanto à ingesta de cafeína, em função da carência de estudos adequados, recomenda-se limitar seu consumo a menos de 200 mg/dia. Deve-se ressaltar que o café, principal fonte de cafeína em muitos países, contém 50 a 70% mais cafeína que o chá e outros produtos. Admite-se uma relação teórica entre cafeína e arritmogênese, especialmente em pacientes cardiopatas.
A ingesta salina sem restrição significativa de sal é geralmente recomendada, em especial próximo ao parto. Entretanto, gestantes com risco de IC devem ser orientadas quanto à ingestão de 3 a 4 g de cloreto de sódio ao dia, sem adição de sal aos alimentos após cozimento, evitando itens salgados. Dieta com 2 g de sódio ao dia deve ser restrita a casos mais graves (CF III/IV-NYHA), assim como a orientação quanto à restrição hídrica nesses casos.

## 2.6.4. Atividade Profissional
Atualmente, a maioria das mulheres grávidas trabalha até um mês antes do parto, e apenas pequena porcentagem suspende suas atividades mais cedo. O risco de desenvolver complicações não tem relação com a atividade laboral ou o estresse psicossocial no trabalho. Entretanto, as exigências e condições laborais devem ser avaliadas individualmente em mulheres com cardiopatia limitante ou situações obstétricas como pré-eclâmpsia e RCIU. Mudanças ou adaptações nas atividades desenvolvidas, redução no estresse do trabalho ou aumento de períodos de repouso e relaxamento muitas vezes são medidas benéficas, principalmente se houver piora ou aparecimento de sintomas limitantes.
Gestantes portadoras de cardiopatias com repercussão hemodinâmica ou sintomáticas devem manter o repouso domiciliar a partir do início do terceiro trimestre da gravidez, ou seja, da 28ª semana de gestação. Nessa fase, a reserva cardíaca limitada pela cardiopatia é insuficiente para a adaptação ao máximo das alterações hemodinâmicas, favorecendo a ocorrência de IC, arritmias, RCIU e prematuridade.
Segundo as leis de proteção à gravidez, toda mulher tem direito a, no mínimo, seis dispensas para realizar exames e consultas, comprovadas por atestado médico, pelo tempo que o atestado indicar necessário para a realização dos procedimentos. 

## 2.6.5. Pontos-chaves
O atendimento pré-natal à cardiopata é multidisciplinar, com consultas regulares ao cardiologista. A periodicidade deve estar de acordo com a gravidade da doença, sua evolução e/ou possíveis complicações;
A orientação do estilo de vida deve ser individualizada de acordo com o risco cardíaco classificado pela OMS;
A gestante deve ser conscientizada quanto a dieta, controle do peso, restrição da atividade física e controle do estresse laboral. Medidas como cessar o tabagismo e a ingestão de bebida alcoólica e consumir moderadamente cafeína são essenciais durante o pré-natal;
O acompanhamento nutricional inclui o controle da ingesta calórica e a alimentação balanceada e rica em nutrientes, evitando consumo de produtos industrializados ou malcozidos e mal lavados;
A suplementação de vitaminas e minerais essenciais deve estar incluída na rotina do pré-natal da gestante portadora de cardiopatia.

## 2.7. Conduta no Parto e Puerpério
A visão interdisciplinar do parto e puerpério em pacientes cardiopatas deve considerar a evolução clínica e obstétrica durante a gestação e a situação funcional no período que antecede o parto. A programação do parto em mulheres cardiopatas exige a prévia estabilização hemodinâmica, o rastreamento de possíveis intercorrências como infecção, anemia, hipertensão arterial e arritmias, e o ajuste da terapêutica cardiovascular.
Do ponto de vista obstétrico, são obrigatórios: a discussão com a cardiologista e anestesista sobre o momento e a via de parto, o monitoramento materno-fetal durante o trabalho de parto e a especial atenção para o balanço hídrico. Nesse sentido, gestantes portadoras de cardiopatias classes III/IV (OMS) necessitam de assistência em hospital terciário com retaguarda de unidade de terapia intensiva (UTI) no puerpério.
A equipe de atendimento à parturiente cardiopata deve estar preparada para prevenção e tratamento das principais complicações no intraparto e puerpério. Dentre elas, destacam-se IC, edema agudo dos pulmões, arritmias, tromboembolismo e dissecção de aorta como as complicações cardíacas mais frequentes, enquanto pré-eclâmpsia, hemorragia e infecções se incluem nas obstétricas.

## 2.7.1. Conduta no Parto
É de consenso geral que a via de parto é de indicação obstétrica. No entanto, em pacientes consideradas risco I/II-OMS em condições clínicas e hemodinâmicas favoráveis, recomenda-se parto espontâneo no termo da gestação. O consenso sobre o tipo de parto é fundamentado na opinião de especialistas, que julgam o parto vaginal como mais vantajoso porque está associado a menor perda sanguínea, mais rápida recuperação e menor risco trombótico e infeccioso, sendo, portanto, preferido para mulheres cardiopatas com quadro clínico estável e não complicado.
No que diz respeito ao parto cesárea, sua incidência em pacientes com doença cardíaca varia, no mundo, entre 21% e 55%. Dados brasileiros disponíveis apontam um índice de cesariana na população geral ao redor de 52%, sendo que, na Rede Brasileira de Vigilância a Morbidade Materna Grave, a taxa chegou a 76% entre as cardiopatas. Não há justificativa clínica e nem explicação plausível para taxa tão elevada.
A proporção de parto cesárea reflete o nível de acesso a essa intervenção e seu uso; porém, a tarefa de definir qual a taxa “desejável” em determinada população, um número que mantenha as indicações médicas e, ao mesmo tempo, evite as cesáreas “desnecessárias”, é um grande desafio
O Registro Europeu sobre Cardiopatia e Gravidez mostrou que a frequência de parto vaginal programado foi de 69%; dentre os partos cesárea, 44% tiveram indicação cardiológica. Nas conclusões, o registro mostrou que, em termos de resultados maternos, a cesárea programada não mostrou nenhuma vantagem sobre o parto vaginal programado e foi associada a pior evolução fetal. 
As indicações maternas ao parto cesárea abrangem situações clínicas muito específicas, tais como: trabalho de parto em pacientes sob anticoagulação oral, doenças com diâmetros de aorta aumentados (risco III/IV-OMS), coarctação de aorta grave, arterite de Takayasu, dissecção de aorta, HAP, IC aguda, congestão pulmonar em cardiopatia preexistente, cardiomiopatia, periparto (CMPP) com IC grave ou outras situações clínicas em que a condição materna seja crítica. 
Apesar de controverso, há recomendações do parto assistido, seja por vácuo-extração ou fórceps, em situações de real benefício materno-fetal pela abreviação da fase ativa do segundo estágio do trabalho de parto e do esforço do período expulsivo prolongado. Recomenda-se a utilização da posição reclinada e lateral esquerda para evitar a compressão da aorta e veia cava inferior pelo útero gravídico, favorecendo melhor retorno venoso materno, além de facilitar o esforço no período expulsivo.
O monitoramento básico durante o parto deve incluir a medida não invasiva de pressão arterial, a oximetria de pulso e a eletrocardiografia contínua, além de controle fetal (ausculta dos batimentos fetais pelo sonar doppler a cada 15 min no primeiro estágio, a cada 5 min no segundo estágio ou cardiotocografia contínua). A necessidade de monitoramento adicional deve ser vista caso a caso. Deve-se restringir a infusão excessiva de líquidos para evitar excessiva hidratação e congestão pulmonar.
Os benefícios da analgesia são indiscutíveis na prevenção da hipertensão arterial e da taquicardia, reduzindo o estresse cardíaco. Um modo seguro e eficaz de reduzir a ansiedade neste momento é humanizar a assistência ao parto, ou seja, requisitar a presença de um acompanhante de livre escolha, ter liberdade para deambulação e adotar posição mais confortável durante o trabalho de parto.
O parto em pacientes anticoaguladas deve ser programado a partir de 37 semanas de gestação. Aquelas com alto risco trombótico exigem o uso de HNF cerca de 36 horas antes do parto, sendo essa infusão interrompida 4 a 6 horas antes do nascimento e reintroiduzida 6 horas depois, com controle do TTPA. Em baixo risco trombótico, usa-se HBPM até o dia anterior ao parto, e a dose noturna deve ser omitida se a indução do parto ou a cesariana for realizada na manhã seguinte. Bloqueio regional é possível se transcorridas 24 horas da última dose.
A indução do trabalho de parto deve ser considerada com 40 semanas de gestação em todas as pacientes cardiopatas, porque o benefício dessa prática supera os eventuais riscos. O modo de indução depende principalmente da avaliação do colo uterino e da vitalidade fetal. Recomenda-se tanto o misoprostol (PGE1) como a dinoprostona (PGE2) para preparo do colo uterino. Os métodos como o de Krause (balão), a amniotomia e a infusão de ocitocina também são considerados seguros. 
Em contrapartida, a inibição do trabalho de parto prematuro deve ser considerada com muita cautela e até mesmo contraindicada em mulheres cardiopatas. O grau de prematuridade deve ser ponderado pelos riscos da tocólise e da terapêutica com os corticoides, porque ambas podem levar a complicações como IC grave e arritmias cardíacas.
Quando indicada, a tocólise deve ser mantida durante 48 horas, que corresponde ao tempo suficiente para a ação do corticoide, no intuito de reduzir a ocorrência de síndrome do desconforto respiratório, hemorragia peri e intraventricular e enterocolite necrosante do recém-nascido. Os fármacos utilizados na inibição, como a nifedipina, podem induzir hipotensão, além de apresentar sinergismo quando empregados juntamente ao sulfato de magnésio. A terbutalina tem intensos efeitos β-miméticos e pode levar a IC materna. Nessa situação, a atosibana, antagonista competitivo do receptor de ocitocina humana, tem sido o agente tocolítico mais seguro quando usado em infusão intravenosa de cerca de 400 ml de solução (soro fisiologico de 0,9%, lactato de Ringer ou solução de glicose a 5%) em 48 h (cerca de 200 ml/24 h).

## 2.7.2. Conduta no Puerpério
Os cuidados devem ser intensificados no período de puerpério, e as medidas preventivas das principais complicações (IC, HPP e tromboembolismo) devem fazer parte de protocolos nas maternidades de alto risco.
A volemia materna sofre importantes variações no pós-parto imediato, seja pelo aumento do retorno venoso após dequitação placentária, seja pela perda sanguínea estimada em até 500 ml e 1000 ml para parto vaginal e cesárea, respectivamente (definição da OMS e da Organização Pan-americana da Saúde). O impacto dessas oscilações na hemodinâmica materna explica a ocorrência de complicações graves, como IC, edema agudo dos pulmões e choque cardiogênico. O descuido quanto às oscilações hemodinâmicas no puerpério é, em parte, responsável pela mortalidade materna; por isso, é mandatório que pacientes com cardiopatias graves, mesmo estáveis, permaneçam no período de 24 a 48 h na UTI para monitoramento hemodinâmico efetivo.
De igual importância é a HPP, que ocorre em cerca de 10% dos partos vaginais, chegando a ser considerada grave em cerca de 3% deles. Em pacientes cardiopatas, a incidência de HPP chega a 21% e tem relação com parto cesárea, parto assistido com fórceps, anestesia geral e uso de heparina antes do parto. Na verdade, o aumento da morbidade materna por transfusão, infecção e tromboembolismo é a causa principal de morte em cardiopatas.
Por isso, toda maternidade deve ter protocolo específico para conduta na prevenção e no tratamento da HPP, que inclui o uso dos uterotônicos, recomendados durante a terceira fase para ambas as vias de parto, na prevenção da HPP.
A ocitocina é o fármaco recomendado pelo benefício na prevenção de hemorragia e deve ser aplicada por via intramuscular, na dose de 10 UI para parto vaginal ou cesárea. A via intravenosa é também uma opção, especialmente no parto cesárea, em doses ≤ 5 UI e em infusão lenta (> 30 segundos) a cada 3 minutos até três infusões. A profilaxia intravenosa deve ser associada à dose de manutenção em infusão contínua.
O misoprostol (600 a 1.000 µg) pode ser utilizado com segurança tanto para profilaxia como para tratamento da HPP, mas a ocitocina administrada em bólus deve ser evitada pelo risco de hipotensão. A ergometrina e a metilergometrina devem ser evitadas pela sua associação com a vasoconstrição coronária e a hipertensão arterial sistêmica (HAS).
Admite-se que o puerpério representa um período de alto risco para trombose; por isso, medidas como a deambulação precoce, mais factível no parto vaginal, e a anticoagulação com heparina devem ser recomendadas nas primeiras 48 horas após o parto. Contudo, a prevenção do tromboembolismo deve ser individualizada e será discutida adiante.
Quando houver indicação de esterilização definitiva, a salpingotripsia bilateral por incisão infraumbilical pode ser realizada nas primeiras 48 a 72 horas após o parto vaginal. De modo geral, a discussão da contracepção deve ser realizada antes da alta da maternidade.

## 2.7.3. Pontos-chaves e Recomendações
Assistência multidisciplinar ao parto e ao puerpério deve considerar: estratificação de risco da cardiopatia e elaboração de protocolos na prevenção e no tratamento de IC, HPP, infecção e tromboembolismo;
A assistência ao parto e puerpério deve ser realizada em maternidade de alto risco;
Parto via vaginal, espontâneo e no termo da gestação é o recomendado para pacientes cardiopatas;
Indicações maternas do parto cesárea: IC grave, doenças da aorta com dilatação importante, obstruções graves do coração esquerdo, formas graves de HP e disfunção ventricular;
Parto cesárea é indicado em pacientes que iniciaram trabalho de parto espontâneo utilizando anticoagulantes orais (antagonistas da vitamina K) ou que suspenderam num período inferior a 15 dias;
Parto em pacientes sob uso de anticoagulantes orais deve ser programado a partir de 37 semanas de gestação, para ajustes da anticoagulação sob o uso da heparina;
Indicação de preparo de colo e indução do parto: misoprostol (PGE1) e dinoprostona (PGE2);
Indicação de inibição do trabalho de parto, a princípio, é contraindicada. Em casos excepcionais, a atosibana é o agente tocolítico indicado;
É exigência que as maternidades devem ter protocolo específico para prevenção e tratamento da HPP;
Portadoras de cardiopatias graves devem permanecer na UTI no período de 24 a 48 horas após o parto;
Contracepção deve ser discutida antes da alta da maternidade;
Conscientização que o puerpério é tão importante e arriscado como a gravidez;
Amamentação deve ser sempre incentivada.

## 2.8. Anestesia na Gestante Cardiopata
A anestesia obstétrica tem um papel fundamental na redução da morbi-mortalidade materno-fetal, principalmente no atendimento à gestante cardiopata. A complexidade das cardiopatias requer o envolvimento do anestesiologista nas discussões multidisciplinar no planejamento antenatal, intraparto e puerpério.
A frequência das avaliações deve ser conjugada ao risco da cardiopatia e à situação clínica das pacientes. De modo geral, a avaliação deve ser trimestral para aquelas em classe II de risco (OMS) e em intervalos de duas a quatro semanas para as de classes III e IV (OMS). O planejamento formal de toda a equipe deve ser discutido entre 32 e 34 semanas de gestação, de modo que a paciente seja admitida para o parto com uma orientação consolidada, o que auxilia no fluxo de atendimento e reduz o estresse das equipes nas urgências e a chance de desfechos negativos.
A equipe de anestesia terá a oportunidade de conhecer a evolução da gestação e as eventuais complicações, adequar a medicação na seleção da anestesia e analgesia e possibilitar a interação da paciente com maior clareza no entendimento das condutas tomadas no intraparto. É importante não negligenciar os riscos no manejo da via respiratória e a aspiração do conteúdo gástrico, os ajustes das eventuais medicações e a administração de uterotônicos no intraparto.
A programação atual para gestantes cardiopatas é o parto via vaginal com analgesia no neuroeixo. Esse tipo de anestesia é mais eficaz para o controle da dor na analgesia de parto quando comparada a outras técnicas, como o uso de opioides sistêmicos ou óxido nitroso inalatório. , Quando efetiva, a analgesia espinhal diminui as catecolaminas endógenas circulantes, considerando-se que a simpatectomia parcial induzida pelo efeito do anestésico local no neuroeixo leva à queda da resistência vascular sistêmica e a alterações na frequência cardíaca relacionadas ao bloqueio simpático e aos reflexos cardíacos.
No parto cesárea, a anestesia no neuroeixo tem recebido destaque no manejo das gestantes cardiopatas, devido à crescente expertise dos anestesiologistas em utilizar técnicas de bloqueio espinhal que viabiliza melhor aferição da forma gradual da anestesia, diminuindo o impacto hemodinâmico. A literatura mundial demonstra taxas superiores a 60% em partos cesáreas eletivos realizados com bloqueio no neuroeixo, em menor número nos partos emergenciais, nos quais a anestesia geral é a escolhida em função da complexidade de fatores a serem avaliados para a tomada de decisão. , 
Dentre as técnicas de neuroeixo mais utilizadas nas gestantes cardiopatas, podem-se destacar duas:
Anestesia peridural sequencial;
Anestesia combinada (raquiperidural) sequencial, com baixas doses no componente espinhal.
Essas técnicas são chamadas de “sequenciais”, pois permitem que a instalação e progressão cefálica do bloqueio simpático seja realizada gradualmente, prevenindo a instalação súbita e sua repercussão cardiovascular. Pequenas doses de anestésico local associado a opioides são utilizadas inicialmente, e complementações adicionais são realizadas através de cateter peridural, até se chegar ao nível sensitivo de T6. 
Nos casos que apresentam contraindicação à utilização do bloqueio do neuroeixo para cesariana, a anestesia geral deve ser realizada. O principal objetivo no manejo e planejamento dessa anestesia é minimizar os efeitos hemodinâmicos deletérios dos anestésicos sistêmicos e a resposta hipertensiva à laringoscopia, que é reflexo do estímulo simpático súbito e exacerbado. Nesse cenário, a avaliação pré-anestesia contribui para a identificação de anomalias do espaço dural e grave escoliose, situações habituais nas síndromes de Marfan, Loeys-Dietz ou Ehlers-Danlos.
Fármacos de ação rápida e com meia-vida curta são utilizados em doses de maneira conjugada à hemodinâmica materna, para atenuar as respostas simpáticas à laringoscopia, evitar grandes variações pressóricas e impedir o aumento da frequência cardíaca. Os opioides como alfentanil ou remifentanil podem ser úteis neste manejo, bem como a utilização de outras classes de fármacos. Betabloqueador de ação curta e anestésicos locais em doses adequadas, como o esmolol e a lidocaína, respectivamente, podem apresentar-se como boas opções. Além disso, o uso de indutores como cetamina e etomidato, em algumas circunstâncias, pode ser uma opção melhor em detrimento ao propofol, que apresenta maior potencial cardiodepressor quando utilizado em bólus ou em doses não ajustadas.
Na manutenção da anestesia geral, deve-se atentar para o potencial inotropismo negativo dos anestésicos inalatórios e a diminuição da resistência vascular sistêmica, fato que também ocorre com os anestésicos venosos. Pode haver também hipotonia uterina dose-dependente, com maior potencial de sangramento, relacionada ao uso de anestésicos inalatórios. , 
Nos casos em que a anestesia geral foi empregada, um bom plano para analgesia pós-operatória deve ser realizado com o objetivo de reduzir as catecolaminas circulantes. Nesses casos, existem algumas opções, incluindo opioides espinhais ou analgesia peridural, realização de bloqueios de parede abdominal (bloqueio do transverso abdominal e bloqueio do quadrado lombar) ou utilização de analgesia sistêmica.

## 2.8.1. Jejum
Para o parto cesárea eletivo, recomenda-se jejum de sólidos de 6 a 8 horas, a depender do conteúdo de gordura ingerida e de eventuais alterações anatômicas ou fisiológicas que determinem maior retardo no esvaziamento gástrico. A ingesta de líquidos claros e sem resíduos pode acontecer até 2 horas antes da cirurgia. É recomendada a profilaxia farmacológica contra a aspiração do conteúdo gástrico, com antiácidos não particulados, antagonistas do receptor H2 e antagonistas dopaminérgicos. Durante o trabalho de parto, gestantes de baixo risco podem ingerir moderada quantidade de líquidos sem resíduos, como água, chá, gelatina e isotônicos.
Na eventual instabilidade do quadro hemodinâmico materno, a equipe deve manter o jejum da mãe até que haja segurança para a reintrodução de líquidos. A analgesia de parto e a proximidade da segunda fase do trabalho de parto são pontos que exemplificam bem essa conduta, haja vista a possibilidade de instabilidade hemodinâmica e sangramento, respectivamente. Nas pacientes mais graves ou diante da maior probabilidade de parto cesárea, a paciente deve permanecer em jejum.

## 2.8.2. Anticoagulação e Bloqueio do Neuroeixo
Estima-se que o hematoma espinhal ocorra em 1:200.000 a 1:250.000 partos. , Embora raro, é um evento grave; logo, estratégias devem ser tomadas para sua prevenção. As recomendações atuais consideram que a dose dos anticoagulantes e o período prévio de supensão deles são os parâmetros para assegurar uma anestesia segura no neuroeixo. Isso vale para pacientes recebendo anticoagulação única, com peso acima de 40 kg, função renal normal e sem outras condições que contraindiquem o bloqueio de neuroeixo. Em resumo, as recomendações estão explicadas a seguir.

## 2.8.3. Heparina Não Fracionada (Subcutânea)144
Dose baixa (5.000 UI, 2 a 3 vezes/dia): aguardar 4 a 6 h, com TTPA normal ou fator antiXa indetectável;
Dose intermediária (7.500 a 10.000 UI, 2 vezes/dia; 20.000 ou menos UI/dia): aguardar 12 h ou mais, com TTPA normal ou fator antiXa indetectável;
Dose alta (Mais de 10.000 UI por dose; mais de 20.000 UI/dia): aguardar 24 h ou mais, com TTPA normal ou antiXa indetectável.

## 2.8.4. Heparina de Baixo Peso Molecular (Subcutânea)144
Dose profilática (enoxaparina 40 mg ou deltaparina 5.000 UI 1 vez/dia): aguardar 12 h ou mais;
Dose terapêutica (enoxaparina 1 mg/kg, 2 vezes/dia, ou deltaparina 120 UI/kg, 2 vezes/dia ou 200 UI/kg, dose única): aguardar 24 h.
Quaisquer regimes de anticoagulação que sejam diferentes dos mencionados devem ser avaliados e individualizados pela equipe, levando-se em consideração não apenas o risco de hematoma espinhal, mas também os riscos tromboembólicos, o tempo de jejum, as condições materno-fetais e a avaliação dos preditores de intubação difícil para anestesia geral.
Os tempos para reiniciar a anticoagulação devem obrigatoriamente ter a participação do anestesiologista, nos casos em que houve abordagem do neuroeixo. A reintrodução da anticoagulação deve ser individualizada porque existem condições técnicas na realização da anestesia raquidiana ou peridural que interferem nas condutas de reintrodução dos anticoagulantes.

## 2.8.5. Monitoramento Hemodinâmico
O uso de monitoramento invasivo nas pacientes de alto risco deve ser considerado para o reconhecimento antecipado do agravamento hemodinamico e o imediato tratamento. O monitoramento da pressão arterial invasiva (PAi) antes da aplicação do bloqueio do neuroeixo e da indução da anestesia geral nas pacientes com risco III e IV-OMS é importante para um desfecho melhor. 
A carência de validação para a utilização de métodos não invasivos no monitoramento do débito cardíaco permite em casos selecionados indicar a utilização de monitores invasivos, como cateter venoso central (CVC) e cateter de artéria pulmonar (CAP). Contudo, as informações obtidas podem ser imprecisas pela complexidade das cardiopatias, além do risco de arritmias induzidas e outras complicações. Por isso, há uma baixa adesão ao uso desses monitores. A ecocardiografia transtorácica intermitente e a ecocardiografia transesofágica, nos casos de cesariana com anestesia geral, têm ganhado espaço como opção de monitoramento de gestantes graves e podem ajudar na avaliação da função e do enchimento ventricular. 

## 2.8.6. Uterotônicos Intraparto
O uterotônico mais utilizado no periparto é a ocitocina, que tem um efeito brusco na resistência vascular sistêmica quando administrada em altas doses ou infusão rápida. Esses regimes devem ser evitados em qualquer gestante, principalmente nas portadoras de cardiopatia. A infusão de 2 UI do fármaco em 10 min parece ser efetiva e sem efeitos cardiovasculares significantes nas gestantes com cardiopatia. Em geral, é possível manter uma infusão de 2 a 5 UI em um intervalo de 15 a 30 min com baixos efeitos cardiovasculares. Os derivados do ergot induzem contração da musculatura lisa com vasoconstrição e consequente hipertensão. O misoprostol pode causar hipertermia e tremor e resulta em aumento do consumo de oxigênio, às vezes prejudicial, particularmente nas cardiopatas graves.
É controversa a regra mais utilizada pelos anestesistas para a administração da ocitocina em pacientes sem comorbidades. Trata-se da “regra dos 3”, que significa 3 UI a cada três min até 3 vezes enquanto a infusão de ocitocina 2 UI em 10 min parece ser lenta demais. , 

## 2.8.7. Pós-parto
O acompanhamento das gestantes com risco alto e intermediário deve acontecer em UTI por 24 a 48 horas. Esse período de observação é importante, tendo em vista que a maior parte das mortes ocorre no puerpério. Monitoramento inadequado e manejo volêmico inapropriado podem levar à disfunção cardiovascular. 

## 2.8.8. Pontos-chaves
O planejamento da anestesia para o parto de mulheres cardiopatas deve ser discutido com a equipe multidisciplinar entre 32 e 34 semanas de gestação;
A programação para gestantes cardiopatas é o parto via vaginal com analgesia do neuroeixo;
Nos casos de parto cesárea, a anestesia no neuroeixo tem recebido destaque em utilizar técnicas do bloqueio espinhal;
A anestesia geral é indicada em casos de cardiopatias graves;
A anestesia deve ser individualizada em pacientes sob anticoagulação;
O monitoramento materno é indispensável durante o parto e o puerpério imediato.

## 3. Avaliação e Conduta das Doenças Cardíacas Durante a Gravidez

## 3.1. Doença Valvar
No Brasil, a doença reumática é a causa mais frequente de cardiopatia durante a gravidez, com incidência estimada em 50% em relação a outras cardiopatias. Admitindo-se que o surto reumático é um episódio da primeira infância e/ou da adolescência, o início da fase clínica coincide com a idade fértil da mulher.
A adaptação cardiocirculatória das doenças valvares ao aumento do débito cardíaco influencia diretamente o fluxo através das valvas cardíacas, com piora funcional nas lesões estenóticas. Por outro lado, a queda da resistência vascular periférica reduz o volume de regurgitação nas valvas insuficientes. Por essas razões, a evolução das lesões estenóticas geralmente é pior e se correlaciona ao grau anatômico da lesão valvar, enquanto as regurgitantes, à condição da função ventricular. 
Essas considerações iniciais auxiliam a estratificação de risco das valvopatias, tanto para um aconselhamento adequado no planejamento familiar como no atendimento durante a gestação. Nesse sentido, a classificação elaborada pela OMS foi adaptada às portadoras de valvopatias para a gestação.
A OMS julga que pacientes classificadas como I e II apresentam risco aceitável ou baixo e não impõem sérias restrições à gestação; já o risco III desaconselha a gravidez, e o risco IV a contraindica. Nesse posicionamento, as pacientes valvopatas são qualificadas da maneira a seguir: risco I, aceitável; riscos II e III, intermediário; e risco IV, alto risco à gravidez ( ).

 

Vale acrescentar que a situação de alto risco em valvopatias não preenche os critérios para a indicação de interrupção da gestação (aborto terapêutico), uma vez que essas pacientes podem ser tratadas pela intervenção tanto cirúrgica como percutânea após a fase de embriogênese.
No planejamento familiar, a avaliação da valvopatia deve estabelecer os diagnósticos etiológico, anatômico e funcional e investigar a presença de fatores desfavoráveis que fazem parte da história natural das valvopatias e da correção cirúrgica prévia, que modificam o prognóstico materno e independem da lesão cardíaca estrutural per se, merecendo destaque especial:
FA;
HP;
Disfunção ventricular;
Doenças da aorta associadas;
Antecedentes de IC, tromboembolismo ou endocardite infecciosa (EI).
A avaliação cardiológica prévia à gestação inclui a história, o exame físico e exames subsidiários que auxiliam na classificação do risco à gravidez, como:
ECG: avalia o ritmo e a sobrecarga de câmaras cardíacas;
ECO: informa tipo e gravidade da valvopatia, grau de dilatação ventricular, presença de disfunção ventricular, HP e defeitos associados;
RMC: útil quando a valvopatia está associada às doenças da aorta;
Teste ergométrico: válido na estimativa da capacidade funcional e da pressão arterial na estenose aórtica grave em pacientes assintomáticas e quando há dissociação entre os sintomas e o grau anatômico da estenose mitral. É somente indicado no planejamento de gravidez;
Biomarcadores: aplicação controversa em valvopatias.
As recomendações pautadas em Diretrizes Nacionais , e Internacionais para a conduta no planejamento familiar e durante a gravidez em valvopatias adquiridas, congênitas e próteses valvares estão apresentadas nas a .

 

 

 

 

## 3.1.1. Considerações Gerais sobre a Terapêutica
A restrição moderada de sal e de atividade física, o controle do ganho ponderal (não acima de 10 kg) e a suplementação de ferro após 20 semanas de gestação são as recomendações iniciais, cuidando para afastar fatores como anemia, infecção, hipertireoidismo e arritmias cardíacas. A prevenção do surto reumático deve ser mantida com penicilina benzatina na dose de 1.200.000 UI a cada 21 dias ou estearato de eritromicina, 500 mg, a cada 12 horas, quando alergia à penicilina. A sulfadiazina é contraindicada. A prevenção da EI para o parto é realizada com ampicilina 2 g por via intravenosa associada a gentamicina 1,5 mg/kg por via intramuscular (dose máxima de 120 mg) 1 hora antes do parto. A segurança e eficácia do tratamento farmacológico requer ajustes periódicos da posologia.
Antes da concepção, os fármacos de reconhecidos efeitos teratogênicos devem ser substituídos. Em portadoras de estenose mitral, destaca-se o uso de propranolol ou metoprolol em doses que não ultrapassem 80 e 75 mg, respectivamente, na prevenção e no controle da congestão pulmonar, atentando-se sempre para os efeitos colaterais perinatais, como hipoglicemia, hiperbilirrubinemia e policitemia, os quais não têm sido verificados nessas doses recomendadas.
A FA aguda deve ser prontamente revertida por cardioversão elétrica em portadoras de valvopatia mitral, pois esse procedimento é considerado inócuo ao concepto e tem a vantagem de evitar a utilização de fármacos em doses às vezes tóxicas. Por outro lado, batimentos ectópicos atrial ou ventricular e taquicardia atrial assintomática não exigem uso de antiarrítmicos. Para o controle da frequência em pacientes com FA permanente, devem ser considerados os betabloqueadores ou bloqueadores de canais de cálcio não di-hidropiridínicos, além de anticogulação.
A necessidade de intervenção nas valvopatias durante a gestação se deve aos casos refratários ao tratamento clínico. Os procedimentos percutâneos devem ser preferidos à cirurgia com circulação extracorpórea (CEC). A valvoplastia por cateter balão (VCB) na estenose aórtica tem sido indicada nas valvopatias de etiologia congênita ou na tentativa de resgate da vida materna e nos casos extremos de gravidade. A mitral requer ausência de trombo em átrio esquerdo, insuficiência mitral no máximo discreta e escore ecocardiográfico de Wilkins ≤ 8. 

## 3.1.2. Pontos-chaves: Gravidez em Valvopatias – Valva Nativa
Lesão valvar estenótica complica mais que a de regurgitação;
Classe funcional I/II (NYHA) em lesões estenóticas não asseguram a boa evolução materna;
Fatores complicadores aumentam significativamente o risco das valvopatias;
Deve-se considerar intervenção percutânea antes da gestação em portadoras de estenose mitral e aórtica graves, mesmo em pacientes assintomáticas;
A gravidez não modifica os critérios de indicação da valvoplastia por cateter-balão;
Tratamento farmacológico das complicações durante a gestação deve ser considerado como primeira opção terapêutica;
Manutenção da profilaxia da doença reumática durante toda a gestação;
A consulta no pós-parto, além do exame clínico materno e avaliação da saúde do bebê, inclui ajuste da medicação, estímulo à lactação e orientação à contracepção.

## 3.1.3. Prótese Valvar
A prevalência da doença reumática no Brasil e o crescente número de pacientes com cardiopatia congênita que requerem substituição valvar determinaram um aumento de portadoras de próteses valvares no período fértil. Um fator favorável, nessa faixa etária, é o desempenho ventricular esquerdo, que geralmente é conservado.
Do ponto de vista hemodinâmico, próteses valvares, tanto as mecânicas como as biológicas, melhoram a capacidade funcional e proporcionam semelhante evolução clínica durante a gravidez. As próteses biológicas têm atributos favoráveis à evolução da gravidez por não requererem anticoagulação e por apresentarem, em relação a outras cardiopatias, morbimortalidade materno-fetal considerada risco II-OMS. Contudo, elas têm durabilidade limitada, com possibilidade de reoperação em curto prazo, inclusive durante a gravidez.
A disfunção da prótese valvar biológica (PB) devido à calcificação tem má evolução, acarreta a congestão pulmonar e o baixo débito cardíaco, ambos refratários ao tratamento clínico, além de causar alto risco de morte súbita (risco IV-OMS). A ocorrência de calcificação de PB durante a gravidez torna obrigatória a indicação cirúrgica de substituição valvar, independentemente da idade gestacional. 
Em contrapartida, a gestação em portadora de prótese mecânica (PM) é considerada risco III - OMS. O risco de trombose devido à hipercoagulabilidade materna e a dificuldade da anticoagulação permanente associam-se à incidência variável de acidentes embólicos, abortamento espontâneo, embriopatia varfarínica e fenômenos hemorrágicos maternos e neonatais. 
Estima-se que a chance de gravidez livre de eventos materno-fetais seja de 58,3% para a PB e 46,9% para a PM, , sendo que as taxas de mortalidade materna não são diferentes. Embora controverso, não há prótese valvar segura para a gravidez; contudo, a PB pode ser considerada a substituta mais adequada para a mulher em idade fértil, exceto em adolescentes em que a calcificação prematura da biológica favorece a escolha da PM.
Alguns fatores relacionados ao prognóstico da gravidez são:
Estado funcional da prótese;
Ritmo cardíaco (FA);
Disfunção ventricular;
CF (NYHA);
Antecedentes de EI, IC ou tromboembolismo.

## 3.1.4. Risco Materno
Pacientes portadoras de PM apresentam um risco estimado de 5% de trombose valvar durante a gestação, e a mortalidade materna varia entre 9 e 20%, associada a complicações tromboembólicas. A incidência de trombose da PM varia conforme o regime de anticoagulação, sendo significativamente maior na fase de transição com a heparina. - A incidência de tromboembolismo com a HBPM se deve às flutuações do fator antiXa que ocorrem nas 24 horas, mesmo com o valor terapêutico (0,6 a 1,2 UI/ml) no pico de ação após 4 h da aplicação, resultando em um nível subótimo de anticoagulação. Quanto a HNF em uso prolongado associa-se a trombocitopenia e osteoporose, , tem eficácia inferior à da HBPM, e seu uso por via subcutânea foi abolido na prática da anticoagulação. Em razão da alta incidência de tromboembolismo com as heparinas (HNF e HBPM), existe uma tendência a se priorizar o uso da varfarina durante toda a gravidez, por acreditar-se na sua maior segurança no desfecho materno-fetal. - 

## 3.1.5. Riscos para o Concepto
Para todos os esquemas de anticoagulação, os riscos obstétricos de hemorragia, descolamento prematuro de placenta que causa prematuridade e morte fetal são muito elevados. - A varfarina sódica atravessa a barreira placentária e, quando usada no primeiro trimestre, é teratogênica, acarretando 0,6 a 10% de malformação caracterizada pela síndrome varfarínica fetal, mesmo em doses inferiores a 5mg. - 
O esquema da anticoagulação para pacientes portadoras de PM que desejam engravidar ou se apresentam em curso da gestação na primeira consulta é ainda controverso. Fatores que devem ser levados em consideração na decisão do melhor tratamento anticoagulante incluem: preferências da paciente, expertise do médico assistente e disponibilidade de controle adequado da coagulação.
As recomendações para a prevenção de tromboembolismo em próteses mecânicas pretendem atender aos requisitos ideais de um posicionamento com base na documentação da literatura e na vivência dos autores, de modo que seja efetiva para a realidade dos diversos serviços. Entende-se que a dinâmica da anticoagulação permanente deva ser dividida em cinco momentos: na pré-concepção, em cada trimestre e no puerpério, conforme explicado a seguir.
Momento 1: Pré-concepção: Conscientização da paciente/casal. Orientação quanto ao diagnóstico precoce da gravidez. A paciente que planeja a gravidez deve ser esclarecida sobre a obrigatoriedade de manter a anticoagulação e a disponibilidade dos esquemas e os seus riscos em todas às fases da gestação, do parto e do puerpério. Para isso, o diálogo franco com o casal é fundamental. A orientação também inclui a informação sobre a importância do diagnóstico precoce da gravidez em reduzir a ocorrência da embriopatia. Nesta consulta, é fornecido um pedido de exame para a dosagem de gonadotrofina coriônica beta, que deve ser realizado à primeira dúvida de atraso menstrual.
Momento 2: Primeiro trimestre. Substituição do anticoagulante (evitar a teratogênese). A substituição da varfarina pela heparina possibilita uma conciliação entre o benefício da prevenção de trombose materna e o malefício da embriopatia. Neste momento existem opções que estão apresentadas na . A primeira escolha é o uso de HBPM, que exige o controle semanal do fator antiXa. Na indisponibilidade dessa opção, é indicada a HNF intravenosa no período entre a sexta e a nona semana de gestação. Em pacientes que chegam na primeira visita médica depois da sexta semana de idade gestacional, a varfarina não deve ser suspensa. O casal deve ser informado da possibilidade de embriopatia e de os riscos da substituição pela heparina não serem mais justificados.

 

Momento 3: Segundo e terceiro trimestres. Retorno ao anticoagulante oral, controle da anticoagulação e prevenção de hemorragia. O retorno para a varfarina justifica-se pela suposição de que abreviar o uso da heparina reduz os efeitos adversos à mãe e provoca menor risco de embriopatia. A proposta é manter as doses de varfarina de acordo com as metas de antes da gestação, com controle do INR semanal ou quinzenal. A reintrodução da varfarina deve obedecer à dinâmica da transição, ou seja, simultaneamente à HBPM (via subcutânea) ou à HNF (via intravenosa) até o INR alcançar o “valor-alvo” ( ).
Momento 4: Planejamento do parto. Considerar a hospitalização, redirecionar para a anticoagulação parenteral. A hospitalização deve ser programada com 36 semanas de gestação para o uso de HBPM por via subcutânea ou HNF por via intravenosa em doses terapêuticas ( ). A via de parto é discutida com o obstetra. Em parto prematuro sob anticoagulação, a via de parto é a cesárea e pode ser considerada o uso de complexo protrombínico.

 

Momento 5: Puerpério. Reintrodução da anticoagulação oral e alta hospitalar. Decorridas 6 h do parto e em ausência de complicação materna, a HNF via intravenosa ou a HBPM via subcutânea em doses terapêuticas devem ser reintroduzidas. A varfarina deve ser prescrita 48 h após o parto, obedecendo à dinâmica de transição em conjunto com a heparina até o valor de 2,0 do INR, quando é dada a alta hospitalar.

## 3.1.6. Pontos-chaves: Gravidez e Prótese Valvar
A PB não requer anticoagulação, exceto em pacientes com FA ou acidente tromboembólico prévio;
A gravidez não influencia na degeneração estrutural da PB;
PB calcificada e estenótica tem indicação cirúrgica independente da idade gestacional;
A PM requer anticoagulação com ajuste permanente na busca das metas convencionais;
A trombose de PM demanda intervenção imediata com trombolítico ou cirurgia de emergência com CEC, independentemente da idade gestacional;
A escolha da PB como substituta preferível para mulher em idade fértil considera a não necessidade do uso de anticoagulação e a perspectiva futura da troca valvar percutânea (“valve in valve”);
O procedimento percutâneo “valve in valve” requer centro especializado com “heart team” e recursos de tomografias valvar e arterial, ECO tridimensional esofágico e equipe hemodinâmica intervencionista e de cirurgia de prontidão;
Portadoras de PM devem ser encaminhadas a serviços terciários e de referência em doença valvar para o acompanhamento da gravidez;
A anticoagulação permanente em pacientes com próteses mecânicas ou doença valvar mitral com FA deve obedecer os algoritmo que inclui cinco momentos do ciclo gravídico-puerperal;
A despeito do controle adequado e efetivo da anticoagulação em todos os momentos, ainda permanecem incertezas quanto ao sucesso da gravidez em mulheres portadoras de PM;
A escolha da prótese valvar com perspectivas de futura gravidez deve ser discutida com a equipe multidisciplinar em conjunto com a paciente.

## 3.2. Cardiopatias Congênitas
O avanço do tratamento clínico-cirúrgico em cardiologia tem demonstrado que um número progressivamente maior de mulheres portadoras de CC consegue alcançar a idade reprodutiva e o desejo de engravidar, com grande oportunidade de sucesso materno-fetal. 
No Brasil, observa-se uma tendência ao crescimento do percentual de gestantes portadoras de CC, à semelhança do que já acontece em países europeus. A mortalidade materna na lesão cardíaca congênita é considerada a segunda causa indireta de óbito materno, alcançando até 20% das mortes por doença cardíaca. 
O planejamento da gravidez em portadoras de CC deve considerar: (1) o tempo do diagnóstico da cardiopatia; (2) cirurgia paliativa ou corretiva pregressa; (3) classe funcional (NYHA); (4) exames laboratoriais tais como o hematócrito, hemoglobina, saturação de oxigênio e peptídeo natriurético, provas de função hepática e tireoidiana.
Os diagnósticos estrutural e funcional são definidos pelo ECG, ECO transtorácico, ressonância magnética e teste cardiopulmonar.
A classificação da OMS tem sido muito bem aceita como um parâmetro para avaliação do risco materno-fetal de acordo com a lesão cardíaca estrutural. Acrescentem-se a essa classificação as condições clínicas previstas na história natural das CC (que modificam o prognóstico da gravidez e independem da lesão cardíaca estrutural ( ).

 

Síndrome de Eisenmenger: considerada de elevado risco para morte materna, estimado em 50% durante a gravidez e puerpério. A doença vascular arterial restringe a adaptação às variações do débito cardíaco e à queda da resistência vascular periférica durante a gravidez, o parto e o puerpério. Disso decorrem as principais complicações que causam a morte, tais como IC, crises de hipóxia e arritmias. O risco do puerpério é tão alto quanto o da gestação, devido à hemorragia do pós-parto e ao tromboembolismo inerente a este período. Pacientes com síndrome de Eisenmenger parecem ter predisposição para trombocitopenia, deficiência de fatores de coagulação vitamina K-dependentes e sangramento. O risco para o feto de abortos espontâneos, prematuridade e mortalidade perinatal é proporcional ao grau de cianose.
Cianose: estima-se que 30% das pacientes com CC cianogênicas, submetidas ou não a cirurgias, apresentam complicações durante a gestação, destacando-se: IC, trombose sistêmico-pulmonar, arritmias e hipoxemia. O grau de saturação de oxigênio arterial é fator de prognóstico para a sobrevida materno-fetal, e a insaturação tem correlação significativa a morte materna, aborto espontâneo e morte perinatal. A indicação de flebotomia na eritrocitose materna, tem sido realizada somente quando o hematócrito está acima de 65%, em pacientes com sintomas de cefaléia, fadiga, distúrbio visual ou cognitivo e mialgia. A evolução do concepto, que inclui perdas fetais, prematuridade e morte perinatal, está relacionada ao grau de saturação arterial de oxigênio (SaO2). Estima-se que saturação de oxigênio < 85% associa-se a apenas 12% de recém-nascidos vivos. 
IC: a dispneia é um parâmetro clínico utilizado no auxílio de condutas, entretanto, tem limitações quando aplicado à gravidez. Em CC deve-se considerar o baixo fluxo pulmonar e as lesões que envolvem o coração esquerdo. 
Arritmias cardíacas: frequentes em adultos com CC, as arritmias são resultantes de sequelas de defeitos cardíacos como dilatação de câmaras cardíacas, hipertrofia miocárdica, fibrose ou cicatrizes cirúrgicas, trauma do tecido de condução e presença de enxertos endocárdicos.
Intervenção prévia à gravidez: a correção cirúrgica ou percutânea das CC está associada a melhor prognóstico materno-fetal em comparação com pacientes cujas cardiopatias não foram operadas. Nesse aspecto, a eventual necessidade de intervenção deve ser levada em conta antes da concepção.

## 3.2.1. Conduta na Gestação
Em continuidade com a avaliação da pré-concepção, a consulta inicial do pré-natal deve incluir (1) história; (2) tipo de cirurgia corretiva ou paliativa, (3) evolução pós-operatória imediata e tardia; (4) situação clínica funcional atual e (5) exames periódicos laboratoriais (hematócrito, hemoglobina, saturação de oxigênio, peptídeo natriurético). 
A assistência durante a gestação, parto e puerpério de pacientes com CC deve contar com equipe de especialistas, hospital terciário e consultas periódicas e simultâneas com a equipe obstétrica. Vale lembrar que a hereditariedade das CC impõe a rotina de ECO fetal a partir do segundo trimestre da gestação. 
Gestantes que se incluem no risco III/IV-OMS devem ser orientadas quanto à rotina de hospitalização a partir da 28ª a 32ª semana de gestação, para estabilização do quadro clínico, monitoramento contínuo fetal, ajuste de medicação e planejamento do parto. As decisões quanto ao término da gestação, o tipo de parto e a anestesia devem ser conjuntas, de acordo com a situação clínica da mãe, a vitalidade e a maturidade do feto.
Cardiopatias congênitas associada à HP: A interrupção no 1º trimestre da gestação deve ser recomendada para mulheres com HP e síndrome de Eisenmenger (Risco IV-OMS). Entretanto, perante a decisão da paciente em manter a gravidez, a equipe multidisciplinar deve obedecer ao protocolo que orienta a hospitalização após a 28ª semana de gestação, uso de enoxaeparina (HBPM) em dose profilática (1 mg/kg/dia) e oxigenoterapia (suplementação de oxigênio para saturação abaixo de 92%), medidas essenciais para controlar hipotensão, hipoxemia e acidose metabólica. 
Vasodilatadores específicos, como os inibidores de fosfodiesterase (sildenafil), podem levar à hipotensão arterial e devem ser indicados individualmente de acordo com o quadro clínico e a tolerância materna. O sildenafil ou outros inibidores da fosfodiesterase têm sido utilizados, bem como a eventual adição das prostaglandinas na persistência dos sintomas. , Os antagonitas dos receptores da endotelina devem ser suspensos durante a gravidez. , 
A HBPM em dose plena ou profilática deve substituir a varfarina no primeiro trimestre da gravidez e após 36 semanas, conduta recomendada em pacientes que já faziam uso desse fármaco antes da concepção ( ). A prescrição de antiplaquetários (como aspirina) ou a HBPM deve ser realizada com muita cautela, porque pacientes com HP apresentam alto risco de hemoptise e trombocitopenia.
CC com lesão estrutural obstrutiva: pacientes com obstrução grave a via de saída de ventrículo esquerdo devem ser aconselhadas à correção cirúrgica ou percutânea antes da gestação. Contudo, se a paciente estiver grávida, a presença da tríade de sintomas (IC, angina de peito e síncope) é indicativa de intervenção durante a gestação Nesses casos, a valvoplastia percutânea com balão está indicada, sendo mais segura no segundo trimestre da gravidez, quando a fase de embriogênese foi ultrapassada, a tireoide fetal ainda é inativa e o útero tem volume pequeno, o que proporciona maior distância entre a radiação ionizante do procedimento e o concepto.
Cardiopatia cianogênica sem HP: as medidas gerais incluem restrição da atividade física, suplementação de oxigênio e prevenção da estase venosa pelo admitido risco de embolia paradoxal. O uso da HBPM em doses profiláticas é recomendado porque o tromboembolismo é uma das principais complicações. A suplementação de ferro pode ser utilizada em função da policitemia, à semelhança da síndrome de Eisenmenger. , 
Cardiopatia com comunicação sem HP: a comunicação interatrial (CIA) é bem tolerada durante a gravidez, considerada risco I-OMS. Arritmias, geralmente supraventriculares, são comuns nas pacientes não operadas ou com correção cirúrgica na idade adulta e podem ser controladas com digital (digoxina), betabloqueador (propranolol ou metoprolol) ou antagonista dos canais de cálcio (verapamil), em doses baixas e fracionadas. Deve-se considerar que paciente com CIA não corrigida apresenta risco de tromboembolismo, o que pode sugerir o uso de HBPM. Embora não seja habitual, pacientes sintomáticas que apresentam fluxo esquerdo-direito e instabilidade hemodinâmica podem ser beneficiadas com o fechamento percutâneo dessa comunicação antes da gestação.
A comunicação interventricular (CIV) pequena ou operada tolera bem a gravidez considerada risco I-OMS, especialmente quando a função ventricular é normal.
A evolução dos defeitos de septo atrioventricular ou canal atrioventricular (DSAV) não corrigidos depende da magnitude da regurgitação valvar e do tamanho da comunicação entre as câmaras, o que é considerado risco II (OMS). As complicações mais frequentes são: arritmias, congestão pulmonar e IC em pacientes com disfunção ventricular. O tratamento inclui: digital (digoxina), diurético (furosemida), vasodilatador (hidralazina) ou betabloqueador (carvedilol).
Coarctação da aorta: a gravidez é bem tolerada em pacientes com coarctação aórtica corrigida, considerada risco II-OMS. Contudo, quando não há correção prévia à concepção, há complicações associadas que determinam alto risco para a gravidez, como: HAS com risco adicional de pré-eclâmpsia, aneurisma de aorta, dissecção aórtica e rotura de aneurisma cerebral, passando para risco IV-OMS. , O controle da pressão arterial é fundamental, utilizando-se a terapêutica convencional.
Tetralogia de Fallot: é a cardiopatia cianogênica mais frequente do adulto, e as pacientes operadas toleram bem a gravidez. Nesse grupo, os fatores de risco são a disfunção ventricular direita e a insuficiência pulmonar, que, na maioria, tem adaptação adequada à gravidez. Nesse aspecto, a conduta atual de substituição da valva pulmonar na população de pacientes com dilatação importante do ventrículo direito tem contribuído para um contingente cada vez maior de gestantes portadoras de próteses biológicas em valva pulmonar. As arritmias cardíacas que eventualmente fazem parte da história natural do pós-operatório tardio não comprometem o resultado obstétrico e fetal. A experiência com tetralogia de Fallot não operada é muito limitada e deve seguir as recomendações das cardiopatias cianogênicas.
Anomalia de Ebstein: o prognóstico dessas gestantes está relacionado à presença ou não de cianose e IC. A instabilidade hemodinâmica está associada a insuficiência tricúspide ou disfunção do ventrículo direito. A gravidez deve ser planejada após a correção cirúrgica em pacientes sintomáticas, com IC ou cianose. É comum a síndrome de pré-excitação associada a anomalia, e arritmias podem ser um fator de complicação durante a gestação, mesmo em pacientes operadas. 
Transposição das grandes artérias (TGA): na dextro TGA, a evolução tardia após o “switch” atrial (técnicas de Senning ou Mustard) ou arterial (cirurgia de Jatene) tem sido boa, incluindo a tolerância à gravidez. A presença de disfunção ventricular direita ou insuficiência tricúspide importante é um fator de mau prognóstico e de restrição à gravidez. A conduta no tratamento das complicações deve seguir as recomendações convencionais. Na levo TGA, também conhecida como discordância ventrículo-arterial e atrioventricular ou inversão ventricular, a evolução da gravidez depende da classe funcional, da função do ventrículo direito sistêmico, da presença de arritmias e das lesões associadas. No adulto, a presença de disfunção ventricular é um fator de restrição ao prognóstico materno-fetal. Para estas mulheres, a gravidez deve ser desaconselhada.
Circulação de Fontan: gestações sucedidas têm sido reportadas em pacientes submetidas à cirurgia de Fontan, embora seja considerada risco III- OMS. As complicações presumíveis são consequentes ao baixo débito cardíaco, arritmias, tromboembolismo e à doença hepática. Desaconselha-se a gravidez para pacientes com StO2 menor que 85%, insuficiência atrioventricular grave, depressão da função ventricular ou perda proteica entérica, condições que inclui a circulação de Fontan no risco IV-OMS. A conduta é o tratamento e a prevenção da IC, das arritmias e do tromboembolismo. A evolução obstétrica e fetal de pacientes com Fontan é incerta e complicada devido à alta incidência de aborto espontâneo, prematuridade, recém-nascidos pequenos para a idade gestacional e óbito neonatal. Acresce o alto risco de HPP, peculiar a essa situação clínica. , 
Hereditariedade: filhos de mães portadoras de cardiopatia congênitas têm maior risco de apresentar lesões cardíacas congênitas, as quais variam de acordo com o tipo de defeito materno e não são, necessariamente, iguais à lesão estrutural da mãe. A recorrência da CC é detectada pelo ECO fetal, sendo em torno de 2,7 a 10% dos casos. Verifica-se ainda que há síndromes genéticas associadas a defeitos específicos, tais como CIA na síndrome de Holt-Oram, anomalia conotruncal na síndrome de DiGeorge, dentre outras, que são transmissíveis. Esses dados reforçam a recomendação do ECO fetal na rotina do pré-natal nesse grupo de portadoras de CC hereditárias.

## 3.2.2. Pontos-chaves
O planejamento da gravidez requer a determinação do diagnóstico estrutural e funcional da cardiopatia com base em exames laboratoriais e de imagem;
O aconselhamento pré-concepção deve ser fundamentado na classificação de risco da OMS;
A presença de HP, cianose, arritmias, disfunção ventricular, antecedentes tromboembólicos ou de IC acrescenta risco às categorias da OMS;
Intervenção cirúrgica ou percutânea, quando indicada, deve ser realizada antes da concepção;
Gestantes de risco III/IV-OMS devem ser encaminhadas para atendimento especializado em centros terciários com apoio do Heart Team;
A hereditariedade das CC exige a realização do ECO fetal e o aconselhamento genético na pré-concepção.

## 3.3. Cardiomiopatias
Cardiomiopatia é uma doença do músculo cardíaco com comprometimento estrutural e funcional do coração, na ausência de doença arterial coronariana, hipertensão arterial, doença valvar ou cardiopatia congênita, que justifique a anormalidade miocárdica observada. De acordo com o fenótipo, as cardiomiopatias são classificadas em: hipertrófica, dilatada, restritiva, arritmogênica do ventrículo direito e não compactada. Essa classificação é fundamental para a avaliação de riscos, a determinação de conduta e a estimativa de prognóstico da gestação, independentemente da provável etiologia. A CMPP será discutida adiante.
Um estudo retrospectivo sobre cardiomiopatias durante a gestação mostrou um percentual de 35% de complicações com 11% de mortalidade materna, dados que se relacionaram com a maneira e o grau de comprometimento miocárdico. , A classificação de risco III/IV-OMS inclui as cardiomiopatias com fração de ejeção do ventrículo esquerdo reduzida (FEVE) abaixo de 30%, com manifestação de IC, HP e arritmias complexas. 
A IC é a principal complicação, principalmente após o segundo trimestre de gestação e durante o trabalho de parto. No puerpério imediato, momento tão delicado quanto a gestação, devem-se pressupor as seguintes recomendações: cautela com o uso de ocitócicos, moderação na infusão de fluidos durante o intraparto, atenção a HPP, controle da dor, prevenção de infecção e retaguarda de UTI nas primeiras 24 a 48 h após o parto.

## 3.3.1. Cardiomiopatia Dilatada
Cerca de 50% dos casos de cardiomiopatia dilatada (CMD) são idiopáticos, 20 a 35% são hereditários e, em quase 40%, têm sido identificadas mutações genéticas. Dentre as causas adquiridas, destacam-se: miocardites de etiologia viral (Coxsackie virus, parvovírus, ecovírus, adenovírus), H1N1, Epstein-Barr e outras relacionadas ao uso de fármacos.
No planejamento familiar, na intenção de engravidar, devem ser recomendados: (1) ajustes na terapêutica materna no controle da IC, considerando-se que fármacos essenciais que são contraindicados na gravidez (IECA, BRA, inibidores da Neprisilina, espirolactona, ivabradina) devem ser substituídos; (2) conscientização da paciente sobre o possível impacto imediato e a longo prazo da gravidez na doença cardíaca; (3) aconselhamento genético, em função de a doença estar associada à herança autossômica dominante, seguida da autossômica recessiva e às ligadas ao cromossomo X. 

## 3.3.2. Cardiomiopatia Hipertrófica
A prevalência global de cardiomiopatia hipertrófica (CMH) está em torno de 0,02 a 0,2% da população e foi estimada em 0,015% em um estudo de coorte com gestantes portadoras de cardiopatia. A gravidez constitui um risco potencial para mulheres com CMH; entretanto, o seu prognóstico ainda é incerto.
A grande variação da taxa de complicações cardiovasculares durante a gravidez, estimada entre 5 e 40%, tem sido atribuída à heterogeneidade do fenótipo dessa doença cardíaca. - Embora muitas vezes assintomáticas, as queixas mais frequentes das gestantes portadoras de CMH são dor torácica, dispneia, síncope e palpitação. Os fatores de pior prognóstico para a gravidez são história de IC, arritmia ventricular e morte súbita na família. As complicações durante a gravidez são decorrentes de obstrução da via de saída do ventrículo esquerdo, disfunção diastólica e isquemia miocárdica.
Dentre as arritmias mais frequentes, destacam-se extrassístoles atriais, taquiarritmias supraventriculares sustentadas e FA, que favorecem a instabilidade hemodinâmica materna. Do ponto de vista obstétrico, as complicações mais frequentes são aborto espontâneo em cerca de 20% dos casos e baixo peso ao nascimento em 10% das gestações. - 
Outra importante questão é o risco de transmissão da doença para o feto, porque a CMH é um traço autossômico dominante mendeliano causado também por mutações que codificam os componentes do sarcômero cardíaco. A complexidade dessa doença ainda não permitiu a determinação da sua verdadeira incidência em recém-nascidos aparentemente saudáveis e que não apresentam anormalidades ao ECO convencional. Na maioria dos casos, o ECO no período neonatal não identifica a CMH porque a hipertrofia miocárdica ocorre com o desenvolvimento e se torna aparente após a adolescência. Contudo, destaca-se que a forma obstrutiva da doença e uma história familiar de morte cardíaca súbita (MCS) são os fatores de risco para a manifestação de hipertrofia precoce na criança. , 
O estudo genético de crianças e adolescentes assintomáticos com antecedentes familiares de CMH pode identificar portadores “sãos” da mutação. No entanto, existem importantes obstáculos à aplicação clínica dessa investigação, tais como pluralidade genética, baixa frequência da mutação responsável na população doente, dificuldades das técnicas na identificação da mutação patogênica e alto custo.
Em pacientes sintomáticas, a conduta farmacológica inicial é o uso de betabloqueadores (propranolol ou succinato de metoprolol), associados ou não aos antagonistas de cálcio, como o verapamil. A associação desses fármacos exige cuidados quanto a tolerância materna, pressão arterial e vitalidade fetal. O uso de prostaglandinas para a indução do parto não é aconselhado devido aos seus efeitos vasodilatadores. O parto vaginal é considerado seguro, enquanto a cesárea é reservada em situações especiais. A anestesia peridural ou raquidiana deve ser contraindicada nas formas obstrutivas graves.
No planejamento de gravidez em pacientes com arritmias de difícil controle farmacológico, deve-se considerar a discussão com o eletrofisiologista sobre a possibilidade de intervenção percutânea, como a ablação por radiofrequência nos casos de taquicardias complexas e/ou sintomáticas, ou mesmo o CDI em pacientes incluídas nas recomendações convencionais de classe IA de indicação.

## 3.3.3. Displasia Arritmogênica do Ventrículo Direito
A displasia arritmogênica do ventrículo direito é uma cardiomiopatia hereditária, autossômica dominante, com penetrância reduzida e expressão variável. Por esses motivos, é obrigatório o aconselhamento genético.
A gravidez é bem tolerada na maioria das mulheres com a doença, mas pacientes com doença biventricular preexistente têm maior risco de desenvolver IC à medida que a gravidez progride. O controle e a prevenção dos sintomas são feitos com os betabloqueadores (propranolol, succinato de metoprolol). Caso seja necessário, os antiarrítmicos devem ser mantidos, respeitando as retrições da toxicidade fetal. O implante do CDI, se indicado, deve ser preferencialmente realizado antes da gestação. 

## 3.3.4. Cardiomiopatia Não Compactada
O miocárdio não compactado caracteriza-se por uma morfologia acentuadamente trabeculada do miocárdio. É uma doença familiar em até 60% dos casos, com herança autossômica dominante. Sua prevalência é desconhecida, e as evidências são limitadas na literatura sobre a conduta durante a gravidez. O quadro clínico é muito variável, desde pacientes assintomáticas até mulheres com IC refratária e arritmias graves. Não há tratamento específico para a cardiomiopatia não compactada, e a conduta terapêutica deve ser apoiada na experiência das outras cardiomiopatias. No entanto, o risco de tromboembolismo é considerado maior pela própria morfologia do miocárdio, o que justifica a anticoagulação permanente durante a gestação em pacientes sintomáticas ou com disfunção ventricular.

## 3.3.5. Cardiomiopatia Restritiva
A cardiomiopatia restritiva idiopática caracteriza-se por apresentar ventrículos não hipertróficos, não dilatados e com disfunção diastólica, resultando na dilatação dos átrios. Pode ser idiopática ou estar associada a outras doenças, como amiloidose, endomiocardiofibrose, sarcoidose e hemocromatose. A escassez de experiência na literatura, a terapêutica limitada e controversa, e a evolução clínica muitas vezes grave são fatores que desaconselham a gravidez.

## 3.3.6. Pontos-chaves e Recomendações
Portadoras de cardiomiopatia devem participar de planejamento familiar, incluindo o aconselhamento genético;
A estratificação de risco para “nova” gravidez deve considerar o estado funcional e estrutural da cardiomiopatia;
Filhos de portadoras de CMH, mesmo que aparentemente saudáveis, devem ter um seguimento diferenciado até a adolescência;
A otimização terapêutica deve obedecer às diretrizes convencionais, considerando as clássicas contraindicações dos fármacos para a gestação;
A anticoagulação permanente deve ser instituída nas gestantes portadoras de cardiomiopatia não compactada ou dilatadas com trombo intracavitário ou evento embólico prévio;
Estudos genéticos são promissores para as mudanças no prognóstico das cardiomiopatias.

## 3.3.7. Cardiomiopatia Periparto
A CMPP é definida como uma forma idiopática de cardiomiopatia que se manifesta com IC secundária à disfunção sistólica do ventrículo esquerdo, com FEVE (< 45%), que ocorre no final da gravidez ou em meses que transcorrem após o parto ou abortamento, quando nenhuma outra causa de IC tenha sido encontrada. 
A fisiopatologia da CMPP, ainda não totalmente esclarecida, apoia-se em hipóteses que sugerem mecanismos hormonais, inflamatórios, autoimunes, infecciosos, genéticos e ambientais. Novos conceitos sobre a etiopatogenia têm sido apresentados, envolvendo o estresse oxidativo, o desequilíbrio angiogênico e a prolactina na gênese da CMPP. , 
Os estudos têm demonstrado que o aumento do estresse oxidativo da gravidez em combinação com níveis elevados de fatores antiangiogênicos, menor expressão de reguladores da angiogênese e aumento de espécies reativas de oxigênio propiciam a clivagem da prolactina, pela catepsina D, formando vasoinibinas como a 16kDa prolactina. Ela tem propriedades antiangiogênicas, pró-apoptóticas e pró-inflamatórias que induzem no endotélio a expressão de micropartículas (miR-146a), as quais, no miocárdio, alteram o metabolismo dos cardiomiócitos, ocasionando a morte celular e a disfunção deles. , O miR-146a é um marcador altamente específico no diagnóstico da CMPP, considerado o primeiro biomarcador específico da CMPP. Nesse sentido, a bromocriptina, agonista do receptor de dopamina-D2, ou a cabergolina, potente e prolongada atividade redutora de prolactina, vem apresentando resultados promissores na terapêutica e na recuperação da função ventricular. - 
Os principais fatores de risco para a CMPP são as síndromes hipertensivas da gestação (hipertensão gestacional, pré-eclâmpsia, eclâmpsia ou síndrome HELLP), hipertensão arterial crônica, gestações múltiplas, obesidade, tabagismo, pré-diabetes e diabetes melito, idade avançada ou adolescência e uso prolongado de beta-agonistas. 
As taxas de mortalidade podem ser inferiores a 5% ou alcançar até 50% dos casos. As causas de morte materna são IC, arritmia ventricular e tromboembolismo, que ocorrem principalmente nos primeiros 6 meses da doença até 1 ano pós-parto (morte materna tardia), o que pode causar a subnotificação da doença. , 
O quadro clínico compreende dispneia importante, edema agudo dos pulmões ou choque cardiogênico. Não é rara a ocorrência de parada cardíaca, arritmia grave ou eventos tromboembólicos (acidente vascular encefálico, isquemia mesentérica ou infarto agudo do miocárdio [IAM]) e choque cardiogênico como primeira manifestação da doença. 
O diagnóstico de CMPP deve ser sempre considerado quando ocorrer descompensação cardíaca nas semanas próximas ao termo da gestação ou meses subsequentes após o parto em mulheres previamente saudáveis. O diagnóstico da CMPP é de exclusão e deve ser diferenciado da miocardite, infarto agudo do miocárdio, tromboembolismo pulmonar (TEP), pré-eclâmpsia grave, embolia amniótica, cardiomiopatias preexistentes, síndrome de Takotsubo, doença valvar ou congênita preexistente e infecções sistêmicas. A não valorização de sintomas não muito específicos, como cansaço aos esforços , dor no peito ou fadiga, que costumam ocorrer no final da gravidez e no pós-parto, contribuem para o retardo no diagnóstico da CMPP e consequentemente pior prognóstico e menor chance de recuperação da função sistólica do miocárdio. , , , 
Os exames complementares incluem: 
ECG: na maioria dos casos apresenta alterações inespecíficas na repolarização ventricular, na taquicardia sinusal ou nas arritmias ventriculares. É preciso lembrar que o ECG normal não exclui o diagnóstico da doença;
Radiografia de tórax: as alterações mais frequentes são: cardiomegalia, sinais de edema alveolar, redistribuição do fluxo sanguíneo para os ápices pulmonares e imagem de “asa de borboleta”;
Biomarcadores: peptídeos natriuréticos (peptídeo natriurético tipo B [BNP] e/ou N-terminal-pro-BNP) são marcadores válidos na investigação da IC, porque, quando elevados, ajudam a estabelecer o diagnóstico e, quando normais, excluem o diagnóstico de IC na gravidez;
Os valores de referência para o diagnóstico de IC são: N-terminal-pro-BNP > 300 pg/ml e BNP > 100 pg/ml;
Concentrações de troponina sérica têm valor preditivo de persistência de disfunção ventricular após seis meses da doença instalada;
Ecodoplercardiograma transtorácico é o exame “padrão ouro” para o diagnóstico de CMPP. As imagens demonstram predominância de hipocinesia do ventrículo esquerdo, com FEVE inferior a 45%, regurgitação das valvas atrioventriculares e derrame pericárdico. A FEVE abaixo de 30% e o diâmetro diastólico final do ventriculo esquerdo > 60 mm são correlacionados a pior prognóstico materno;
RMC: fornece informações sobre o grau de acometimento miocárdico e deve ser considerada para a estimativa de prognóstico e tratamento na evolução tardia da doença;
Cinecoronariografia/biópsia do miocárdio: não apresentam indicação para o diagnóstico da CMPP.
O momento do diagnóstico o PPCM é crucial para a sobrevivência da paciente. Os objetivos imediatos no tratamento agudo são estabilizar o estado hemodinâmico, proporcionar alívio sintomático e garantir o bem-estar materno e fetal. Os médicos devem conhecer o diagnóstico diferencial de dispneia em sala de emergência relacionado à gravidez e atuar no diagnóstico precoce. Os cuidados devem ser prestados por uma equipe multidisciplinar, incluindo cardiologistas, intensivistas, obstetras, neonatologistas, anestesistas e cirurgiões. Para diagnóstico rápido e tomada de decisão em todas as gestantes com insuficiência cardíaca aguda, é fundamental um algoritmo de gerenciamento pré-especificado e a composição da equipe multidisciplinar. , 
O tratamento farmacológico da CMPP , acompanha as diretrizes convencionais de IC com fração de ejeção ecocardiográfica (FE) reduzida. Os betabloqueadores, de preferência β1-seletivos (carvedilol, bisoprolol e metoprolol), são indicados em doses inicialmente baixas, associados ao diuréticos de alça; a digoxina pode ser considerada no controle da frequência cardíaca. O uso de anticoagulante, seja a heparina em dose plena ou a varfarina com meta de INR = 2, é indicado, uma vez que o tromboembolismo é causa de morte. Deve-se reforçar que IECA, BRA, sacubitril/valsartan, ivabradina, espirolactona e varfarina são contraindicados na gestação, mas devem ser considerados na lactação. Recomenda-se anticoagulação com heparina para evitar complicações cardio-embólicas em pacientes com FEVE ≤ 35% com HBPM ou anticoagulação oral pelo menos em dose profilática.
O uso de bromocriptina (alcaloide do ergot) e cabergolina (agonista do receptor da dopamina D2) mostrou resultados satisfatórios na resposta imediata e recuperação tardia da disfunção ventricular da CMPP. - A eventual contra-indicação ao uso desses medicamentos também deve ser ponderada. Se a bromocriptina não estiver disponível, a cabergolina pode ser usada como um medicamento alternativo. Como foram relatados eventos tromboembólicos durante o uso de bromocriptina (embora principalmente em doses mais altas), o tratamento com bromocriptina deve sempre ser acompanhado de anticoagulação, pelo menos nas doses profiláticas de heparina; doses completas de heparina (fracionada/não fracionada) são obrigatórias na presença de trombo intracardíaco ou embolia sistêmica, bem como em FA paroxística ou persistente. O esquema proposto mostra que as doses seguras que apresentam boa tolerância e eficácia são de 2,5 mg, 2 vezes ao dia, por 2 semanas, seguidas de 2,5 mg, 1 vez ao dia, durante 6 semanas para a bromocriptina; e de 1 mg em dose única para a cabergolina, pelo seu efeito prolongado de 14 a 21 dias. - A abreviatura BOARD (Bromocriptina, Otimização da terapêutica da IC, Anticoagulação, Vaso Relaxadores e Diuréticos) foi proposta para o tratamento na PPCM após o parto. 
O tratamento com bromocriptina deve sempre ser acompanhado de anticoagulação com heparina (HBPM ou HNF), pelo menos em dose profiláticas; em pacientes com trombo intracardíaco detectado por imagem ou evidência de embolia sistêmica, bem como em pacientes com fibrilação atrial paroxística ou persistente. 
Em relação ao tratamento não farmacológico de PPCM, CDI, ressincronização cardíaca, dispositivos de assistência ventricular e transplante cardíaco são considerados. - O CDI foi considerado na prevenção primária de morte súbita, seguindo diretrizes para pacientes com FE ventricular abaixo de 35%. O desfibrilador cardioversor tipo colete (wearable) é uma alternativa durante os primeiros meses após o diagnóstico com PPCM, considerando que a maioria desses pacientes recupera a função ventricular 6 meses após a fase aguda da doença.
A ressincronização cardíaca pode ser proposta após 6 meses do início da doença, de acordo com critérios convencionais de indicação, ou seja, IC avançada, CF III-IV (NYHA), com tratamento otimizado, ritmo sinusal, FE inferior a 35%, QRS > 150 mseg ou QRS > 120 mseg com dissincronismo Não ECO ou na ressonância magnética
Os dispositivos de assistência circulatória mecânica do ventrículo esquerdo podem ser uma opção nas pacientes criticamente graves, como “ponte para transplante” ou como “ponte para recuperação”. O transplante cardíaco é indicado em cerca de 10% dos casos de CMPP nas pacientes que não apresentam recuperação após 12 meses com suporte circulatório mecânico (SCM).
No seguimento clínico a longo prazo, deve-se seguir as recomendações adiante: 
Se não houve melhora da função cardíaca: manter betabloqueador, IECA ou BRA; espirolactona se FE < 40%, ivabradina se FC > 75/min, com dose máxima de betabloqueador (alcançar FC < 60/min); diuréticos de houver edema/congestão pulmonar;
Se houve recuperação completa e sustentada da função ventricular, informação apoiada no acompanhamento ecocardiográfico semestral: manter tratamento farmacológico (betabloqueador, IECA, espirolactona) por pelo menos 6 meses e diuréticos somente se houver sintomas de congestão ou edema de membros inferiores; no período entre 6 e 12 meses subsequentes, suspender a espirolactona e a ivabradina (se estiver em uso), mas continuar betabloqueador e IECA/BRA por pelo menos mais 6 meses depois da retirada da espirolactona; após 12 meses, reduzir gradativamente até suspender IECA/BRA e manter betabloqueador por mais 6 meses; após 18 meses, é controversa a suspensão do betabloqueador porque alguns admitem que ele deve ser mantido por no mínimo 5 anos;
O não aconselhamento a uma gravidez subsequente em pacientes que tiveram a recuperação completa da função sistólica de ventrículo esquerdo (VE) após CMPP é controverso, já que não existem evidências concludentes que possam apoiar tal orientação na prática médica. 
As recomendações para a conduta da IC agudam , podem ser resumidas nos seguintes itens:
Monitoramento da saturação de O2 transcutânea;
Oxigenoterapia: SatO2 < 90% (oximetria de pulso); pressão arterial de O2 (PaO2) < 60 mmHg (gasometria arterial);
Intubação endotraqueal: deve ser realizada na insuficiência respiratória aguda com hipoxemia (PaO2 < 60 mmHg), hipercapnia (pressão arterial de gás carbônico [PaCO2] > 50 mmHg) e acidose (pH < 7,35);
Diurético se sinais de congestão (furosemida (20 a 40 mg) em bólus intermitentes ou em infusão contínua;
Vasodilatador se PAS > 110 mmHg. Nitroglicerina intravenosa (IV), dose inicial de 10 a 20 μg/min até o máximo de 200 μg/min;
Agentes inotrópicos (inibidores da dobutamina, dopamina, levosimendan, fosfodiesterase III (PDE III) nas pacientes hipotensas (PAS < 90 mmHg) e/ou sinais de baixo débito cardíaco; 6. Evidências experimentais e experiência clínica sugerem que catecolaminas como dobutamina são menos favoráveis em pacientes com PPCM devido a comprometimento metabólico. O levosimendan pode ser considerado como agente inotrópico de preferência, em infusão contínua de 0,1 µg/kg/h por 24 h sem uma dose inicial de carga (bolus) para pacientes com PPCM grave. Caso o levosimendan não esteja disponível, a dobutamina é a outra opção, enquanto a adrenalina deve ser evitada;
Vasopressores no choque cardiogênico;
Anticoagulação com HBPM em dose plena desde que não haja contraindicação;
Suporte mecânico circulatório como “ponte para decisão” de transplante cardíaco.

3.3.7.1. Pontos-chaves

A etiopatogenia da CMPP ainda não está plenamente esclarecida;
O diagnóstico e tratamento imediatos ao início dos sintomas são fundamentais para a recuperação ventricular;
O emprego dos inibidores da prolactina (bromocriptina ou cabergolina) junto ao tratamento otimizado para IC é o diferencial na recuperação da função ventricular;
Aproximadamente 50% dos pacientes com CMPP recuperam a função miocárdica em um prazo médio de 6 meses com terapêutica da IC;
Ainda que haja recuperação da função ventricular, o seguimento deve ser periódico pelo menos por 5 ou quiçá 10 anos após o diagnóstico;
A falta de evidências sobre a real recorrência da CMPP em gestações subsequentes não autoriza desaconselhar a concepção em pacientes que de fato recuperaram a função ventricular;
Pacientes com CMPP transplantadas têm um prognóstico pós-operatório imediato e tardio semelhante ao das portadoras de outras formas de CMD.

## 3.4. Cardiopatia Isquêmica
A doença cardíaca isquêmica (DCI) é incomum durante a gravidez; a maioria das publicações considera a síndrome coronariana aguda, e não a doença isquêmica estável. Dados da OMS mostram que a taxa de infarto agudo é de 3,34 eventos por 100.000 gestações, sendo mais frequente durante o terceiro trimestre. A incidência de infarto sem supradesnivelamento do segmento ST é maior na gestação. 
Os fatores de risco para a DCI na gestação são: idade materna (acima dos 40 anos; para cada ano de vida há aumento de 20% de risco para infarto), história familiar de doença coronária prematura, tabagismo, hipertensão arterial, dislipidemia e diabetes melito. 
Fatores de risco adicionais incluem pré-eclâmpsia, trombofilia, infecção pós-parto, uso de cocaína, multiparidade, doenças autoimunes, estenose valvar aórtica/trombose de prótese valvar aórtica, estenose mitral e HP. 
A etiologia da DCI na gestação difere da população geral. Em uma revisão contemporânea, foram identificados os mecanismos relacionados ao infarto e as seguintes incidências: dissecção espontânea da artéria coronária (43%), aterosclerose (27%), trombose coronária (17%), artérias normais à angiografia (9%), vasoespasmo (2%) e Takotsubo (2%).
Dissecção espontânea da artéria coronária: é a causa mais comum de IAM durante a gestação e o puerpério, com prevalência ao redor de 1,81 evento por 100.000 gestações, de ocorrência mais frequente no terceiro trimestre. O desfecho da dissecção associada à gravidez parece ter pior prognóstico quando comparado àquela não relacionada à gravidez. 
As condições demográficas e as comorbidades associadas incluem raça negra, hipertensão crônica, hipertensão gestacional, pré-eclâmpsia, anormalidades lipídicas, depressão crônica, enxaqueca, idade materna avançada, primeiro parto e tratamento para infertilidade. 
A etiologia da dissecção de coronária ainda não está esclarecida, mas parece estar relacionada ao desarranjo e enfraquecimento da parede arterial, consequente à influência dos hormônios da gestação. As complicações maternas mais comuns descritas são: choque cardiogênico em 24%, fibrilação ventricular (FV) em 16% e suporte mecânico em 28%, que resultam em 4% de morte hospitalar. 
Aterosclerose: a DCI de causa aterosclerótica está ligada à presença de fatores de risco clássicos e os atualmente denominados emergentes: doença hipertensiva da gestação, diabetes gestacional, histórico de parto prematuro, doenças autoimunes (Lupus eritematoso, artrite reumatoide, esclerodermia), tratamento com radioterapia no tórax/quimioterapia e depressão/ansiedade generalizada. 
Trombose: trombose coronariana na ausência de aterosclerose é mais provável devido à hipercoagulabilidade da gravidez e pode resultar de embolização paradoxal.
Artérias normais: mecanismos do IAM com coronárias normais permanecem incertos e incluem espasmo coronário transitório (aumento da reatividade vascular e/ou uso de derivados da ergotamina) ou dissecção coronária não detectada, refletindo as limitações do diagnóstico. 
Vasoespasmo: pode ser espontâneo ou induzido por fármacos, síndromes hipertensivas da gravidez, aumento da reatividade vascular à angiotensina II e à norepinefrina, disfunção endotelial ou liberação de renina pelo útero gravídico. O vasoespasmo pode ser induzido por fármacos da rotina obstétrica, como os beta-agonistas (terbutalina, salbutamol) na inibição do trabalho de parto prematuro, os derivados do ergot para indução do trabalho de parto ou prevenção da HPP e a bromocriptina, indicada para inibição da lactação. 
Outras causas: aneurisma de artéria coronária relacionado à doença de Kawasaki. 
O diagnóstico do IAM não é influenciado pelo estado gravídico e inclui sintomas (dispneia e dor torácica), exames laboratoriais (troponina aumentada), ECG (alterações específicas e clássicas do IAM) e ECO (alterações de contratilidade segmentar de parede). O diagnóstico diferencial de IAM durante a gravidez deve ser feito com embolia pulmonar, embolia amniótica, dissecção de aorta, CMPP e miocardite. Os exames adicionais para o diagnóstico, a estratificação do risco e o tratamento do IAM incluem cintilografia, ressonância magnética e angiografia das coronárias.
Em nosso entendimento, pacientes com síndrome coronariana aguda devem ter diagnóstico e tratamento definidos antes do parto. Por isso, em casos de dor torácica ou suspeita de doença isquêmica aguda, somos favoráveis à indicação de angiografia coronária, que, além de concluir o diagnóstico, favorece a chance de tratamento da artéria “culpada” pelo quadro isquêmico agudo. O risco da angiografia é relativamente pequeno diante do seu benefício para o planejamento do parto e a anestesia dessas pacientes.
O tratamento do IAM na gravidez é semelhante ao da população geral, inclusive quanto às técnicas de revascularização. Na dissecção de coronária, o tratamento clínico tem sido a primeira escolha. A intervenção, percutânea ou cirúrgica, fica reservada para os casos de comprometimento do tronco de coronária esquerda ou lesão proximal de descendente anterior. As complicações mais frequentes são: IC e choque cardiogênico (38%), arritmias (12%), angina recorrente e reinfarto (20%), mortalidade materna (7%) e morte fetal (7%). A conduta para choque cardiogênico e parada cardiorrespiratória (PCR) segue as diretrizes convencionais, com a estratégia de parto de urgência quando houver viabilidade fetal. 
O tratamento farmacológico do IAM é semelhante ao recomendado na população em geral. Aspirina em baixas doses é segura; porém, há pouca informação sobre os inibidores P2Y12. Clopidogrel é liberado, mas deve ser suspenso sete dias antes do parto. Não há evidências de benefício do uso dessa medicação na dissecção de coronária; além disso, inibidores da glicoproteína IIb/IIIa, bivalirudina, prasugrel e ticagrelor não são recomendados. Os betabloqueadores, exceto o atenolol, têm seu uso já está estabelecido na síndrome coronariana aguda. O ativador do plasminogênio tecidual recombinante (TPA) não atravessa a placenta, mas pode induzir complicações hemorrágicas (sangramento subplacentário). Benefícios da heparinização a curto prazo provavelmente superam o risco de complicações hemorrágicas.
A liberação para “nova” gravidez em pacientes com cardiopatia isquêmica prévia pode ocorrer na ausência de isquemia residual ou sinais de disfunção ventricular. Não há dados de alta qualidade definindo quanto tempo a gravidez deve ser retardada após a síndrome coronariana aguda. Não entanto, a recomendação de 12 meses parece razoável, individualizada de acordo com comorbidades, estado cardiovascular e necessidade de terapia medicamentosa.

## 3.4.1. Pontos-chaves
A progressiva incidência de DCI na gravidez se deve à maior idade materna e à presença crescente de fatores de risco;
A incidência de IAM sem supradesnivelamento do segmento ST é maior durante a gravidez, e a artéria descendente anterior é a mais acometida;
O quadro clínico da dissecção arterial coronária parece ser mais grave durante a gestação quando comparado com o da população geral;
Vasoespasmo coronário pode ocorrer em consequência das medicações de uso obstétrico;
Sintomas, ECG, troponina sérica elevada e alterações no ECO definem o diagnóstico da síndrome coronária aguda;
A cineangiocoronariografia deve ser indicada para definir o diagnóstico e possibilitar o tratamento percutâneo;
O tratamento segue regras gerais, com eventuais restrições da gestação;

## 3.5. Dislipidemia na Gestação

## 3.5.1. Alterações Lipídicas
Durante a gravidez ocorre substancial aumento na concentração plasmática das lipoproteínas, consequente à elevação de estrogênio e progesterona circulantes. Os triglicerídios aumentam duas a três vezes em relação ao valor pré-gestacional, alcançando o pico no termo da gestação, com retorno progressivo ao basal no final do puerpério. Da mesma maneira, ocorre um aumento progressivo dos níveis de colesterol total, que corresponde a duas a cinco vezes os valores anteriores à gestação, com decréscimo um pouco mais lento que os níveis de triglicerídios com normalização, que pode prolongar além das seis semanas após o parto. 
As frações lipoproteicas apresentam também alterações qualitativas, de modo que o colesterol da lipoproteína de alta densidade (HDL-c) e o colesterol da lipoproteína de baixa densidade (LDL-c) têm um quantidade aumentada de triglicerídios. O HDL-c tem comportamento um pouco diferente do colesterol total e dos triglicerídios, pois apresenta um aumento progressivo, chegando ao máximo na 24ª semana, com um acréscimo de 50% nos valores quando se compara com período não gravídico. Em seguida, apresenta uma queda equivalente a 15% acima dos valores antes da gravidez até o período de termo. Os níveis de LDL-c aumentam em sincronismo com os do colesterol total; porém, apresentam um decréscimo mais retardado, podendo ocorrer a queda após a oitava semana de puerpério.
O fator responsável por essas alterações das lipoproteínas é o hormônio estrogênio. A queda do HDL-c após a 24ª semana é explicada pelo aumento da concentração plasmática de insulina, que representa aumento da resistência à insulina. Conclui-se, portanto, que os níveis de HDL-c estão mais relacionados ao nível de estrogênio na primeira fase e à insulina na segunda fase da gestação. Recomenda-se que a dosagem de um perfil lipídico seja adiada em pelo menos 4 ou 6 semanas após a gestação, principalmente naquelas mulheres sem alterações prévias.
Na atualização da Diretriz Brasileira de Dislipidemia e Prevenção da Aterosclerose, as recomendações para mulheres dislipidêmicas em idade fértil incluem orientação dietética e adoção de estilo de vida saudável, além de controle de peso corporal, atividade física e interrupção do tabagismo. A terapia com estatinas deve ser evitada em mulheres em idade fértil que planejam gravidez (classe II-A; C).
A hipertrigliceridemia gestacional ocorre para suprir demandas energéticas maternas, como precursor de hormônios para a placenta e para fornecer colesterol e ácidos graxos essenciais ao feto. Em gestantes no segundo e terceiro trimestres e em lactantes, a terapia com estatina não deve ser indicada (classe III-C). A contraindicação deve-se aos relatos de teratogenicidade, embora as informações disponíveis na literatura sejam inconclusivas. 
Fibratos, ezetimibe, niacina, colesterolamina e ômega-3 são considerados fármacos sem contraindicação absoluta, mas a colestiramina é o único com segurança definida. Os fibratos podem ser empregados nos casos de hipertrigliceridemia muito grave (nível plasmático de triglicérides > 1.000 mg/dl), sob a análise de risco/benefício para as gestantes (alta mortalidade para mãe e feto por pancreatite aguda). Entretanto, o controle dietético deve ser o tratamento de eleição em gestantes (classe IIA; C); em casos extremos, a aférese pode ser recomendada. 
Quanto aos ácidos graxos ômega-3, mulheres grávidas e lactantes devem ser aconselhadas a introduzirem na dieta peixes ricos em mineral, de águas profundas e com baixos níveis de mercúrio. Os recomendados são salmão, cavala, arenque, sardinha, atum e truta. Não há estudos sobre suplementação (cápsulas) e fitosteróis durante a gestação.
Merecem considerações as dislipidemias genéticas, tanto a hipertrigliceridemia com frequentes complicações pancreáticas como a hipercolesterolemia familiar. A abordagem terapêutica especial nessas circunstâncias graves é a aférese, sendo que, nos casos de hipercolesterolemia familiar, a aférese é LDL-aférese seletiva. 
Admitia-se que a dislipidemia na gravidez deveria ser considerada fisiológica, tanto é que não faz parte da rotina pré-natal o estudo do perfil lipídico. Contudo, recentemente, foram descritas estrias gordurosas em aorta de fetos de mães dislipidêmicas. A partir dessas observações, tem sido sugerido que a disfunção cardiometabólica materna pode não somente contribuir para efeitos maternos a longo prazo, mas também causar um risco de aterosclerose em gerações futuras. Essas considerações sugerem que o diagnóstico e o tratamento das dislipidemias devem ser realizados antes da concepção e ter uma continuidade durante a gestação e o pós-parto. 

## 3.5.2. Pontos-chaves
Aumento de triglicerídios e colesterol ocorre na gravidez;
O uso de estatinas naõ tem sido recomendado, embora exista controvérsia sobre seus efeitos teratogênicos;
Dislipidemia materna pode induzir a aterosclerose fetal e também em futuras gerações.

## 3.6. Outras Doenças

## 3.6.1. Arterite de Takayasu
A arterite de Takayasu é uma vasculite crônica e idiopática que afeta de maneira predominante a aorta e seus ramos principais, as artérias coronárias e a artéria pulmonar. O processo inflamatório decorrente causa estreitamento, oclusão e aneurisma dos ramos afetados. A etiologia da doença é desconhecida, mas vários estudos demonstraram uma associação com antígenos leucocitários humanos, sugerindo predisposição para o processo imunomediado. 

3.6.1.1. Prevalência

A arterite de Takayasu é uma doença rara, com taxas de prevalência crescentes. As maiores ocorrem no Japão, com 100 a 200 novos casos anuais. As mulheres são mais acometidas, 80 a 90% dos casos, com início da doença entre 10 e 40 anos de idade, portanto no período fértil da vida, sendo a gestação motivo de atenção especial. É a vasculite mais frequente observada na gravidez justamente porque surge em pacientes jovens. A modulação das funções imunológicas induzidas pelo período gestacional pode influenciar o curso da doença e prejudicar a evolução materno-fetal. 

3.6.1.2. Prognóstico

A gravidez em pacientes com arterite de Takayasu tem um prognóstico incerto. Embora a maioria das gestações seja bem-sucedida, a incidência de hipertensão grave e pré-eclâmpsia é 40% maior quando comparada aos 8% na população geral. Complicações obstétricas como parto prematuro e natimorto são previstas. Pacientes com envolvimento de artéria renal e aorta abdominal tiveram complicações mais frequentes de pré-eclâmpsia e RCIU. 
Complicações maternas mais raras, porém de muita gravidade, são: aneurisma da aorta, acidente vascular cerebral, IC, insuficiência aórtica, infarto do miocárdio e dissecção da aorta. Outras complicações, mais comuns, incluem progressão da insuficiência renal, anemia, trombocitopenia e marcadores inflamatórios elevados. 

3.6.1.3. Tratamento

A conduta no tratamento da vasculite durante a gravidez é a convencional, exceto os três medicamentos teratogênicos que incluem o metotrexato, o micofenolato e a ciclofosfamida. Os demais são considerados compatíveis com a gestação. É preferível usar imunossupressores não hormonais para controlar a vasculite em atividade, reservando a prednisona para esquema de curta duração em doses moderadas na fase aguda ou na piora da doença. O tratamento pode ser iniciado antes da concepção e mantido durante a gravidez e na lactação. 
Os inibidores do fator de necrose tumoral podem ser continuados no período da pré-concepção, da gravidez e da lactação. Esses inibidores, quando são compostos à base de imunoglobulina G (IgG), atravessam a placenta a partir da 16ª semana, com progressivo aumento da transferência quanto mais próximo do termo. Em vista disso, eles não devem ser administrados após a 30ª semana de gestação, mas devem ser reintroduzidos no puerpério. 

3.6.1.4. Pontos-chaves

A gravidez é autorizada quando a doença estiver em remissão, porque a vasculite tem prognóstico grave;
O tratamento com corticosteroides e imunossupressores (azatioprina, ciclosporina e tacrolimus) melhora a evolução materno-fetal;
Em casos de vasculite sistêmica, visto que o risco de eventos tromboembólicos é elevado, a prevenção com aspirina ou HBPM deve ser considerada;
Arterite de Takayasu deve ser sempre considerada no diagnóstico diferencial na hipertensão arterial durante a gravidez;
A contracepção deve ser eficaz e segura durante o tratamento com altas doses de medicamentos citotóxicos.

## 3.6.2. Doença de Kawasaki
A doença de Kawasaki é uma vasculite sistêmica, de etiologia desconhecida, que ocorre em crianças até 5 anos de idade, de prevalência asiática e predomínio do sexo masculino na proporção de 1,5:1. Na fase aguda, o envolvimento inflamatório das artérias coronárias resulta em desfechos clínicos e provoca formações aneurismáticas em 15 a 25% das crianças não tratadas. É uma das principais causas de cardiopatia adquirida na infância. 
Os aneurismas das artérias coronárias podem ser detectados precocemente por intermédio do ECO, e a perda do fluxo laminar nessas artérias pode favorecer a formação de coágulos.
O prognóstico da doença está relacionado à presença e ao tamanho dos aneurismas de artéria coronária. Aneurismas pequenos têm prognóstico favorável, com baixo risco de eventos isquêmicos do miocárdio. Por outro lado, aneurismas grandes e gigantes (diâmetro interno > 8 mm) apresentam alto risco de trombose e, consequentemente, de infarto do miocárdio, arritmias e morte súbita. 
A falta de diagnóstico e tratamento durante a fase aguda na infância tem contribuído para o achado, na idade fértil e na gravidez, de mulheres com sequelas vasculares da doença de Kawasaki. , A influência dos estados de hipercoagulabilidade e hipercinético, inerentes à gravidez, ao parto e ao puerpério, representa um potencial risco de graves eventos, como trombose, infarto do miocárdio e morte súbita, na história natural de mulheres portadoras de doença de Kawasaki complicada com aneurisma de coronárias. Acresce que a gravidez, per se, propicia o risco de rotura e/ou dissecção de coronárias, decorrentes das mudanças específicas nas paredes das artérias, que incluem: fragmentação das fibras reticulares, redução dos mucopolissacarídeos e perda da ondulação normal das fibras elásticas.
Nessa linha de raciocínio, admite-se que o estado de hipercoagulabilidade da gravidez e puerpério demanda a anticoagulação permanente. Portanto, está indicado o uso de aspirina em baixas doses (80 mg por dia) até 36 semanas, associada ao anticoagulante. Recomenda-se a HBPM no primeiro trimestre e após 36 semanas de gestação, e a varfarina em doses baixas no intervalo entre esses dois períodos. A literatura carece de dados sobre as metas dessa prevenção; contudo, é de consenso que o INR em torno de 2 é seguro e presumivelmente eficaz.
O antecedente de infarto do miocárdio aumenta o risco da gestação e a função ventricular é um fator determinante da evolução materna. O uso de betabloqueador (propranolol ou succinato de metoprolol) em baixas doses propicia menor consumo de oxigênio, em função do menor trabalho cardíaco.

3.6.2.1. Avaliação Pré-concepção

Na estratificação do risco para futura gravidez, deve-se considerar a presença de aneurisma de coronária, isquemia miocárdica e disfunção ventricular.

3.6.2.2. Pontos-chaves

A presença de aneurisma de coronária moderado (> 3 mm e < 6 mm) em uma ou mais artérias têm indicação de uso permanente de aspirina em baixas doses;
Aneurismas gigantes (> 8 mm) ou múltiplos, além da aspirina, necessitam da associação de anticoagulante;
Em casos de isquemia miocárdica, a associação de aspirina, anticoagulante e/ou antagonistas dos canais de cálcio é recomendada.

## 3.6.3. Hipertensão Pulmonar
A HP é uma condição fisiopatológica que leva a sintomas debilitantes e a menor expectativa de vida, causada pelo comprometimento da circulação pulmonar. É definida quando a pressão média da artéria pulmonar (PAP) em repouso acima é igual a 25 mmHg, medida pelo cateterismo cardíaco direito. É uma doença progressiva, com predomínio no sexo feminino, que pode ocorrer no período reprodutivo. Em geral, acarreta insuficiência ventricular direita com risco de morte durante a gravidez, mas particularmente no puerpério. , 
A gravidez em mulheres com HP é considerada de alto risco e as complicações maternas e neonatais e tem alcançado as taxas 50 a 70%, respectivamente com mortalidade próxima de 30%. Em vista disso, a gravidez é contraindicada.
As alterações fisiológicas da gestação, com destaque para queda da resistência vascular periférica, aumento do débito cardíaco e hipercoagulabilidade, são as razões da instabilização hemodinâmica materna. Soma-se a isso a ação dos hormônios sexuais na circulação pulmonar, tais como betaestradiol, progesterona e testosterona, que, se por um lado, atenuam a vasoconstrição pulmonar, por outro ativam fatores angiogênicos que estimulam a proliferação de células musculares lisas da vasculatura pulmonar, predispondo ao remodelamento reverso vascular.
Esta complexidade fisiopatológica da HP na gestação se resume em um aspecto primordial, que é a alteração da resposta vasodilatadora fisiológica compensatória da vasculatura pulmonar, tornando-se diminuída ou ausente, o que leva a um aumento significativo da pressão e resistência pulmonares. A incapacidade de o leito vascular pulmonar acomodar o aumento do débito cardíaco resulta em desproporção significativa na pós-carga do ventrículo direito e sua falência. 
A classificação da HP era feita de maneira simplista, dividida em dois grupos: primária e secundária, de acordo com a identificação de fatores de risco. Entretanto, desde 1998, a OMS tem proposto modificações na classificação da HP no sentido de permitir que diferentes tipos da doença fossem agrupados com base em sua fisiopatologia, resposta ao tratamento e prognóstico ( ). Nessa classificação, vale lembrar que o termo HAP é descrito como um subgrupo da HP, caracterizado pela pressão de enchimento de VE (Pd2) < 15 mmHg e resistência vascular pulmonar > 3 unidades Wood.

 

No diagnóstico da HP, sintomas como dispneia, dor torácica, edema dos membros inferiores, palpitação e tosse seca podem ser atribuídos à gravidez, mas a presença de síncope presume maior gravidade da doença. O ECG e a radiografia do tórax mostram sobrecarga de câmaras direitas. O ECO transtorácico estima a PAP, avalia a função do ventrículo direito e identifica outras lesões estruturais do coração, possibilitando classificar o tipo de HP. O diagnóstico definitivo é por meio do cateterismo cardiaco e medidas das pressões , 
O planejamento familiar em pacientes com HP inclui a contra-indicação à gravidez, esclarecendo os riscos maternos e fetais, bem como a escolha de um método contraceptivo eficaz e seguro. Até o momento, não há evidências sobre o nível de pressão de artéria pulmonar (ponto de corte) para determinar o prognóstico para uma futura gravidez.
Entretanto, o resultado da gravidez é muito diferente quando são considerados subgrupos para classificação da HP. Vale ressaltar que as pacientes incluídas na categoria 2 ( ), como aquelas com estenose mitral, estenose aórtica e cardiomiopatias, recebem diferentes tratamento e aconselhamento do que os pacientes incluídos nas outras categorias.
Por esse motivo, a estratificação de risco de acordo com a categoria e a estratégia de tratamento para a gravidez deve receber apoio interdisciplinar em um hospital terciário com especialistas em HP, para que as melhores práticas possam ser adotadas.
Exceto gestantes incluídas na categoria 2, a proposta inicial ao longo do primeiro trimestre em pacientes com HP é a interrupção da gravidez, com ênfase no esclarecimento sobre os riscos impostos do desenvolvimento da gestação e do puerpério bem como os do procedimento de aborto terapêutico. No caso de a paciente não aceitar o aconselhamento, recomenda-se o atual protocolo que segue seguinte prática: 
Consulta multidisciplinar semanal à partir de 16 semanas de gestação;
Terapêutica farmacológica da HP individualizada;
A avaliação periódica do ECG e ECO e BNP no segundo e terceiro trimestres;
Hospitalização a partir de 28 semanas para terapêutica com oxigénio intermitente de acordo com a saturação arterial de oxigenio, anticoagulação, monitorização materno-fetal e planejamento do parto
O parto é de indicação obstétrica;
A anestesia geral é preferencial;
Contra-indicação à anestesia com bloqueios – peridural ou raquidiana.
A terapêutica farmacológica recomendada é o uso das prostaciclinas e seus análogos e os inibidores da fosfodiesterase tipo 5 que parecem ser seguros durante a gestação. O uso dos bloqueadores dos canais de cálcio é alternativa segura e eficaz para o subgrupo de pacientes que apresentam vasorreatividade documentada em CF I/II sem disfunção grave ventricular. Atentar para os seus efeitos inotrópicos negativos além da hipotensão arterial que podem limitar o uso dos bloqueadores de cálcio. , 
As prostaglandinas parenterais são recomendadas em pacientes em classe funcional IV ou que apresentem evidências de comprometimento grave do ventrículo direito A maior parte da experiência com prostaglandinas parenterais é com epoprostenol intravenoso. Em pacientes com função ventricular preservada que estejam em CF I/II as prostaglandinas inaladas como o Ilosprost pode ser indicada. As prostaglandinas parenterais podem ser combinadas com inibidores da fosfodiesterase oral com resultados satisfatórios. 
Os bloqueadores dos receptores de endotelina e estimuladores de guanilato ciclase solúvel são contra-indicados na gravidez. , As prostaglandinas IV podem ser consideradas no momento do parto com monitorização invasiva tipo cateter venoso central e acesso arterial.
Vale lembrar que grande parte das mortes maternas ocorrem no puerpério e dentre as causas destacam-se a IC devido a falência de ventriculo direito, a hipoxemia e o tromboembolismo (trombose pulmonar ”in situ”). Por isso a anticoagulação é essencial com doses terapêuticas de HBPM (1 mg kg a cada 12 h) no 1º trimestre da gravidez e após 36 semanas de gestação e nos demais período com a varfarina com dose diária com a meta de INR = 2 (Figure 6).

3.6.3.1. Pontos Chaves e Recomendações

O diagnóstico de HP deve ser definido pelo cateterismo de câmaras direitas
A gravidez deve ser desaconselhada em mulheres com HP;
As categorias de HP de acordo com a classificação presente tem prognóstico e tratamento muito diferentes;
A proposta de interrupção da gravidez deve ser considerada em pacientes com HP durante o de 1º trimestre, exceto em pacientes do grupo 2;
Caso a gravidez seja mantida ela deve ser seguida em hospital terciário com equipe multidisciplinar especializada em HP;
A farmacoterapia atual tem auxiliado o sucesso da gravidez em HP.

## 3.6.4. Doenças da Aorta
As doenças da aorta podem estar presentes em mulheres na idade reprodutiva e são consideradas importantes causas de complicação e até mesmo de morte durante a gestação. Esse fato se deve a três fenômenos fisiológicos da gravidez que causam um impacto prejudicial nas doenças da aorta: hemodinâmico (aumento do débito cardíaco); estrutural (crescimento progressivo da raiz de aorta até o terceiro trimestre); e hormonal (fragilidade da parede vascular). As causas mais frequentes das doenças de aorta em gestantes são: valva bicúspide, síndrome de Marfan, coarctação de aorta, síndrome de Ehlers-Danlos, síndrome de Turner e síndrome de Loeys-Dietz.

3.6.4.1. Dissecção e Ruptura Aórtica

A gestação aumenta a suscetibilidade da mulher para a dissecção e a ruptura da aorta. Na população geral, a incidência de dissecção da aorta é de 6 por 100.000 indivíduos/ano, contudo na gravidez esta ocorrência aumenta em 100 vezes, para aproximadamente 0,6%.Por isso, o diagnóstico de dissecção aórtica deve ser considerado em todas as pacientes com dor torácica durante a gravidez. Ela ocorre mais frequentemente no último trimestre (50%) ou no período inicial pós-parto (33%). 
A síndrome de Marfan é a doença mais comum do tecido conjuntivo, causada por uma mutação no gene FBN-1, que codifica a glicoproteína fibrilina herdada em um padrão autossômico dominante. O aumento médio de crescimento do diâmetro da aorta durante a gestação em portadoras da síndrome de Marfan é de 0,3 mm/mês, enquanto, na população em geral com a doença, é de 0,38 mm/ano. O aumento da taxa de dilatação da aorta diminui após o parto, mas permanece mais elevada do que a taxa pré-gestacional. 
O diagnóstico inclui história, exame físico, ECO e ressonância magnética da aorta. A angiotomografia da aorta torácica complementa a investigação quando há forte suspeita pelos exames anteriores de dissecção.
Um dos fatores mais importantes para determinar o risco de disseção da aorta é o seu diâmetro máximo (< 40 mm, risco de dissecção de 1%; > 40 mm, risco de dissecção de 10%). A gravidez geralmente é contraindicada se o diâmetro da aorta ascendente for maior que 40 mm em pacientes com história familiar de dissecção ou morte súbita, embora a dimensão exata ainda seja uma questão de debate. Parece haver uma baixa incidência de dissecção se o diâmetro da aorta for inferior a 4,5 cm; no entanto, a gravidez aumenta o risco tardio de complicações aórticas. , , 
Uma consideração importante é a área de superfície corporal, particularmente em mulheres pequenas. Índice de diâmetro aórtico maior que 27 mm/m2 está associado a um alto risco de dissecção, e a substituição profilática de raiz aórtica deve ser considerada. 
Problemas cardiovasculares associados também precisam ser avaliados, incluindo a possibilidade de regurgitação aórtica e prolapso da valva mitral com regurgitação associada.
Tem sido demonstrado que os betabloqueadores aumentam a distensibilidade da aorta e reduzem a velocidade da onda de pulso e reduzindo a taxa de complicações, tais como regurgitação, dissecção e IC congestiva. Considera-se a redução de 20% da frequência cardíaca de repouso como objetivo do tratamento. 
Recomenda-se vigilância ecocardiográfica periódica a cada 6 a 8 semanas para monitorar o tamanho da raiz da aorta da mãe, com o intervalo dependente dos achados ecocardiográficos iniciais. 
O tipo de parto preferível é o cesárea, em pacientes com dilatações de aorta > 45 mm, e deve ser realizado em um centro de atendimento terciário onde haja equipe cirúrgica experiente. Em pacientes com diâmetro < 45 mm e sem evento prévio, o parto pode ser normal, com analgesia precoce e fórceps de alívio.
Aconselhamento na pré-concepção exige determinação da doença de base, avaliação genética e a correção da dilatação da aorta de acordo com os limiares de seus diâmetros ( ).

 

Síndrome de Ehlers-Danlos do tipo IV (vascular) cursa com complicações vasculares graves, com características de herança autossômica dominante e risco de transmissão de 50% para a prole.
A mortalidade materna é significativa e relaciona-se a ruptura uterina e dissecção de grandes artérias e veias. A gravidez é, portanto, considerada situação de alto risco e não aconselhada (risco IV-OMS); assim, essas mulheres devem ser aconselhadas em um processo de tomada de decisão compartilhada ao contemplar gravidez. 
Na síndrome de Ehlers-Danlos vascular, também uma doença rara e grave do tecido conjuntivo caracterizada por tecido vascular frágil, a ruptura vascular durante a gravidez tem sido relatada em até 50%, com taxas de mortalidade entre 5 e 50% A gestação, nesse caso, está também associada a ruptura prematura das membranas fetais, abortos espontâneos e prematuridade. 
A síndrome de Turner é a anormalidade dos cromossomos sexuais mais comum nas mulheres e ocorre em 1 a cada 1.500 a 2.500 crianças do sexo feminino nascidas vivas. A constituição cromossômica pode ser ausência de um cromossomo X (cariótipo 45,X) ou mosaicismo cromossômico (cariótipo 45,X/46,XX), além de outras anomalias estruturais do cromossomo X. A síndrome de Turner está associada a um risco aumentado de doença cardíaca, dilatação aórtica, hipertensão, diabetes melito e eventos de doença aterosclerótica. 
Estima-se que a dissecção de aorta em pacientes com síndrome de Turner seja 36 em 100.000 casos, porém é seis vezes mais comum em idades mais jovens do que na população geral. Os fatores de risco incluem dilatação da aorta, valva aórtica bicúspide e coarctação da aorta. A gravidez deve ser evitada quando o índice de tamanho da aorta é > 25 mm/m2. Além disso, após a cirurgia de raiz, a paciente permanece em risco de dissecção tipo B.
Gravidez espontânea pode ocorrer em pacientes em mosaico Turner (0,5 a 10%), sendo muito comum secundária a fertilidade assistida. Por isso, recomenda-se avaliação cardiovascular antes de se iniciar o tratamento de fertilidade. Ademais, um bom controle da pressão arterial e da diabetes é obrigatório para todos os pacientes de Turner durante a gravidez. 
A síndrome de Loeys-Dietz é uma condição autossômica dominante rara. Foi descrita pela primeira vez em 2005 e está associada à formação ou dissecção do aneurisma da aorta ou de outras artérias, geralmente em idade precoce. Foi identificada em indivíduos encaminhados para investigação de síndrome de Marfan ou de Ehlers-Danlos vascular que não apresentavam características clássicas dessas condições, mas sim outras características, incluindo tortuosidade arterial generalizada, hipertelorismo, úvula bífida/ampla ou fenda palatina. 
A síndrome resulta de mutações nos genes que codificam componentes da via de sinalização do fator de transformação do crescimento beta (TGF-β). A patologia aórtica é particularmente preocupante nessa condição, mas outras anormalidades vasculares também podem estar presentes. 
Morbimortalidade materna significativa tem sido descrita em pacientes com síndrome de Loeys-Dietz, mas é possível a gravidez bem-sucedida e não complicada. No entanto, todas as pacientes com essa condição devem, no presente, ser tratadas como muito alto risco na gravidez e no período pós-parto, até que ferramentas confiáveis de previsão de risco estejam disponíveis. 
Não há estudos sobre o benefício e os riscos do parto cesárea quando comparado ao parto vaginal em pacientes com doenças hereditárias da aorta. Contudo, recomenda-se o parto cesárea de acordo com os limites de dilatação de aorta apresentados na . Abaixo desses limites, a via vaginal pode ser considerada.

3.6.4.2. Pontos-chaves

Doenças da aorta constituem causa importante de morte materna no ciclo gravídico-puerperal;
Gravidez aumenta a suscetibilidade da mulher para a dissecção e a ruptura da aorta;
O planejamento de gravidez inclui diagnóstico da doença de base, ressonância magnética da aorta e vasos da base, e eventual correção cirúrgica da aorta de acordo com os limites de risco de dissecção ee aconselhamento genético;
A ocorrência de dissecção de aorta com feto viável (> 28 semanas de gestação) indica cesárea de urgência, contudo se o feto for inviável, procede-se a cirurgia cardíaca com manutenção da gravidez;
Mulheres portadoras das síndromes de Ehlers-Danlos, Turner e Loeys-Dietz além do alto risco de dissecção de aorta estão exposta a eventos complicadores como hipertensão, diabetes e outros aneurismas, que, em conjunto, representam um significativo aumento de morte materna durante a gravidez.

## 3.6.5. Doença de Chagas

3.6.5.1. Prevalência

A estimativa global da prevalência da infecção por T. cruzi em gestantes tem variado de 1 a 40%, sendo que aproximadamente 1,8 milhão de mulheres em idade fértil estavam infectadas na América Latina. No Brasil, a prevalência de infecção em gestantes é aceita como sendo de 1,1%, com taxa de transmissão vertical de 1,7%. , 

3.6.5.2. Diagnóstico e Conduta da Infecção por T. Cruzi Durante a Gestação

A avaliação sorológica para a infecção por T. cruzi durante o pré-natal é recomendada para as gestantes que vivem em áreas endêmicas ou são procedentes delas, ou que tenham recebido transfusão de sangue nessas regiões. , Os testes mais utilizados fundamentam-se na maior sensibilidade e especificidade para a detecção da infecção pelo T.cruzi e incluem: Enzyme Linked Immunosorbent Assay (ELISA); hemaglutinação indireta (HAI) e imunofluorescência indireta (IFI). A transmissão pode ocorrer em qualquer momento da gravidez, mas o tratamento antiparasitário específico da infecção por T. cruzi está contraindicado durante a gestação e o aleitamento, em razão da teratogenicidade em animais. A exposição acidental ao benzonidazol não indica efeitos adversos no recém-nascido e não representa um critério para interrupção da gestação. 
A parasitemia materna elevada associa-se a maior risco de transmissão vertical e aborto. Por isso, na fase aguda da doença de Chagas, as gestantes devem ser avaliadas individualmente, e a decisão para o início do tratamento antiparasitário deve ser baseada na relação risco-benefício.
A evidência de infecção por T. cruzi não justifica a indicação de parto cesárea, embora a infecção congênita por T. cruzi possa resultar em restrição de crescimento uterino e prematuridade. , Ressalta-se a importância de proceder a avaliações recomendadas durante o pré-natal, incluindo os testes anti-HIV. As infecções simultâneas por T. cruzi e por vírus da HIV representa risco aumentado de transmissão congênita de T. cruzi em função da elevada parasitemia, também implicando maior morbimortalidade perinatal. , Após o parto, a mulher deverá ser encaminhada para avaliação clínica e tratamento específico. A mostra as orientações quanto à conduta da doença de Chagas durante a gravidez. 

 

3.6.5.3. Cardiopatia Chagásica Crônica

A cardiopatia chagásica na forma indeterminada não acrescenta riscos adicionais à gravidez, enquanto aquelas com disfunção ventricular ou arritmogênica associam-se a complicações como IC, tromboembolismo e arritmias complexas. Nesses casos, a gravidez é de alto risco e, às vezes, desaconselhada, na dependência do grau de comprometimento cardíaco, que pode ser estabelecido por ECO e Holter de 24 horas.

3.6.5.4. Transmissão Vertical de Trypanosoma Cruzi

A transmissão vertical (de mãe para filho) de T. cruzi depende do grau de parasitemia; pela via transplacentária, pode ocorrer em qualquer fase da doença (aguda ou crônica), o que exige tratamento prévio à gestação nas mulheres infectadas em idade fértil. Ressalta-se que a transmissão vertical pode recorrer durante todo o período reprodutivo, e a detecção da transmissão vertical na prática é complicada, já que a maioria dos casos congênitos é assintomática. A doença de Chagas congênita é considerada aguda, e sua notificação é compulsória dentro das ações de vigilância epidemiológica. , , 
Na fase aguda da doença de Chagas, existe a possibilidade de transmissão pelo leite materno, enquanto na sua fase crônica, a transmissão durante a lactação ocorre em casos de sangramento por fissura do mamilo, e não propriamente pelo leite.

3.6.5.5. Reativação da Doença de Chagas

Durante a gestação, mecanismos e alterações imunológicos no organismo materno podem propiciar a reativação da doença de Chagas crônica em casos previamente infectados. A reativação é definida pela positividade dos seguintes exames, independentemente da presença de outros sinais e sintomas:
Presença do parasito ao exame microscópico direto no sangue ou em secreções biológicas como líquor, pleura, pericárdio e líquido ascético;
Exame histopatológico de lesões teciduais (paniculite, miocardite, encefalite, enterite, colpite) com encontro de ninhos do parasito em meio a infiltrado inflamatório agudo.

3.6.5.6. Aleitamento

Não se recomenda a suspensão da lactação em puérperas com doença de Chagas na fase crônica, exceto nos casos de fissura mamária, em situações de elevada parasitemia ou em mulheres na fase aguda da doença. 
Se houver exposição ao leite materno de mãe infectada, seja na forma aguda ou na crônica, e com fissuras no mamilo, o monitoramento de aquisição da infecção por T. cruzi pelo lactente deve ser realizado durante o período de exposição. Em alguns desses casos, o tratamento térmico do leite materno antes da administração aos lactentes pode ser considerado. , , 
A lactação deve ser suspensa nos casos de infecção por T. cruzi e HIV, uma vez que a lactação, independentemente da associação com a doença de Chagas, está associada a um risco adicional de 7 a 22% de transmissão do HIV. Por sua vez, em casos de infecção materna aguda por HIV, o aleitamento natural aumenta a probabilidade de transmissão vertical do vírus para 29%. No Brasil, a mãe tem direito a receber fórmula láctea infantil pelo menos até que seu filho complete 6 meses de idade. , 

3.6.5.7. Pontos-chaves

Avaliação sorológica é recomendada para todas as gestantes com epidemiologia positiva;
O risco para a gestação depende da forma clínica da doença de Chagas;
Gravidez pode propiciar a reativação da doença;
O aleitamento não deve ser desaconselhado;
Tratamento antiparasitário está contraindicado durante a gestação e o aleitamento;
A indicação do tipo de parto é obstétrica.

## 4. Síndrome Hipertensiva da Gestação

## 4.1. Introdução
A síndrome hipertensiva na gestação é considerada um grave problema de saúde pública, com expressiva taxa de morbimortalidade materna e fetal, tanto nos países desenvolvidos como naqueles em desenvolvimento. É a complicação médica mais comum da gestação e afeta 5 a 10% das gravidezes em todo o mundo.
A pré-eclâmpsia ocorre em aproximadamente 3% de todas as gravidezes nos Estados Unidos, sendo responsável por 9% das mortes maternas, com aumento de 25% em incidência nas últimas duas décadas. Há registro de aumento da proporção de mulheres com pré-eclâmpsia nos últimos anos na ordem de 2,2%, em 2009, para 5,58% em 2013, sendo que, ao longo dos últimos cinco anos, 22,5% experimentaram uma complicação em geral grave. 
Embora pesquisas tenham evoluído na área das síndromes hipertensivas na gestação, sua etiologia permanece desconhecida. Inúmeros são os desafios metodológicos das pesquisas em relação à pré-eclâmpsia, como definições da hipertensão na gravidez, níveis de gravidade e fisiopatologia. Esses dados provavelmente interferem nas pesquisas e nos desfechos, justificando as recomendações a seguir.

## 4.2. Recomendações para Aferição da Pressão Arterial
Os dispositivos de mensuração da pressão arterial em mulheres grávidas devem ser precisos e validados para esta população especial. O manguito deve ter tamanho apropriado com comprimento de 1,5 vezes a circunferência do braço.
A pressão arterial deve ser aferida sentada, em repouso de pelo menos cinco minutos. Pode ser também na posição de decúbito lateral esquerdo, em repouso, não devendo diferir da obtida na posição sentada;
É preciso considerar a fase V de Korotkoff para a determinação da pressão arterial diastólica (PAD); 
A HAB e a hipertensão mascarada (HM) são consideradas apresentações relativamente comuns na gravidez. Ocorrem em até 1/3 das gestantes, de modo que o MAPA e o monitoramento residencial da pressão arterial (MRPA) constituam exames complementares úteis na decisão clínica, fundamentais para evitar o tratamento desnecessário e potencialmente lesivo ao feto; , 
São consideradas gestantes hipertensas mulheres com PAS ≥ 140 mmHg e/ou PAD ≥ 90 mmHg;
A gravidade da hipertensão na gravidez é considerada com base na ocorrência de envolvimento de órgão-alvo, bem como no nível da pressão arterial; 
A hipertensão grave é definida com base em níveis tensionais ≥ 160 x 110 mmHg, os quais estão associados ao aumento do risco de acidente vascular cerebral em gestantes. , , 

## 4.3. Classificação
A classificação mais utilizada das síndromes hipertensivas da gestação é a adotada pelo Report of the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists – Task Force on Hypertension in Pregnancy, aplicada na Diretriz da Sociedade Brasileira de Cardiologia para Gravidez na Mulher Portadora de Cardiopatia ( ). De acordo com ela, as síndromes são classificadas da seguinte maneira:

 

Hipertensão crônica, preexistente (de qualquer causa);
Pré-eclâmpsia/eclâmpsia;
Hipertensão crônica com pré-eclâmpsia sobreposta;
Hipertensão gestacional.
Com base nesse posicionamento, será mantida uma classificação de quatro categorias e enfatizada a importância das outras apresentações da hipertensão arterial, como:
HAB;
HM;
Hipertensão gestacional transitória: ocorre sem o desenvolvimento da pré-eclâmpsia, com normalização da pressão arterial em 12 semanas pós-parto e que se resolve sem tratamento; , 
Hipertensão pós-parto: surge, em geral, entre 2 semanas e 6 meses após o parto. Leve e lábil, normaliza-se dentro do primeiro ano e pode estar relacionada à persistência de hipertensão gestacional, pré-eclâmpsia ou hipertensão crônica, ou ser secundária a outras causas; 
Hipertensão pré-natal inclassificável: esse termo é usado quando a primeira medida de pressão é registrada após a 20ª semana e não fica evidente se é crônica ou preexistente; apenas a reavaliação pós-parto entre a 6ª e a 12ª semana faz o diagnóstico.

## 4.3.1. Hipertensão Crônica, Preexistente (Essencial ou Secundária)
Ocorre quando a pressão arterial é ≥ 140 x 90 mmHg (hipertensão preexistente; em geral, hipertensão essencial ou diagnosticada antes da 20ª semana de gravidez). É comum ser diagnosticada por volta do primeiro trimestre ou bem no início do segundo. Está associada a desfechos maternos e fetais adversos; portanto, deve-se ter um controle mais rigoroso da pressão arterial materna (110 a 140/85 mmHg), monitorando o crescimento fetal e avaliando repetidamente o desenvolvimento de pré-eclâmpsia e complicações maternas. 
A hipertensão pode não ser diagnosticada em muitas mulheres que se apresentam para o pré-natal pela primeira vez no segundo trimestre. Mulheres grávidas podem ser consideradas normotensas na fase inicial da gestação, devido ao decréscimo fisiológico da pressão arterial na gravidez no primeiro trimestre, assim como uma elevação na pressão arterial pode ser diagnosticada como hipertensão gestacional, porque a pressão não foi verificada antes da 20ª semana de gestação. Habitualmente, a hipertensão crônica persiste após 42 dias pós-parto. 
O diagnóstico de hipertensão crônica será feito corretamente somente se a pressão arterial for reavaliada após a 6ª a 12ª semana pós-parto. 

## 4.3.2. Pré-eclâmpsia/Eclâmpsia
É uma síndrome hipertensiva complexa e pode deteriorar-se rapidamente e sem aviso; não se recomenda classificá-la como “leve” ou “grave”. O diagnóstico ocorre com aparecimento de hipertensão, que se instala a partir da 20ª semana de gestação com uma ou mais condições relacionadas:
Proteinúria (> 0,3 g/24 h) e/ou disfunções orgânicas maternas tipo evidência de lesão renal aguda materna (creatinina ≥ 1 mg/dl);
Disfunção hepática (transaminases hepáticas elevadas, > 40 UI/L);
Com ou sem dor abdominal (quadrante superior ou epigástrio);
Complicações neurológicas (incluem eclâmpsia, estado mental alterado, cegueira, acidente vascular cerebral, clônus, cefaleias intensas, escotoma visual persistente);
Hemólise ou trombocitopenia e/ou disfunção uteroplacentária (restrição do crescimento fetal, análise anormal da forma de onda do Doppler da artéria umbilical ou natimorto).
A existência de proteinúria não é mandatória para o diagnóstico e pode ocorrer pela primeira vez intraparto, ou precocemente no pós-parto. Desse modo, o Ideal seria identificar gestantes com risco de desenvolver pré-eclâmpsia. As recomendações de screening, tipo pesquisar proteinúria para esse fim, são falhas; a única rotina consensual é aferir a pressão arterial rotineiramente nas visitas do pré-natal. , 

4.3.2.1 Síndrome HELLP (Hemólise, Elevação das Enzimas Hepáticas, Plaquetopenia)

Trata-se da manifestação grave da pré-eclâmpsia e não deve ser considerada como entidade separada.

## 4.3.3. Hipertensão Crônica (Preexistente) com Pré-eclâmpsia Sobreposta
Ocorre em 25% das gestantes hipertensas crônicas. O diagnóstico é feito quando uma gestante com hipertensão essencial crônica desenvolve alguma das disfunções orgânicas maternas compatíveis com pré-eclâmpsia. Como após a 20ª semana de gestação pode ocorrer o aumento habitual da pressão arterial, apenas elevações da pressão arterial não habilitam a considerar o diagnóstico de pré-eclâmpsia sobreposta, assim como a restrição do crescimento fetal pode fazer parte do quadro da hipertensão crônica.
Em caso de doença renal com proteinúria de base, um aumento da proteinúria também não é parâmetro diagnóstico de pré-eclâmpsia sobreposta; entretanto, caso não haja proteinúria preexistente, seu aparecimento no contexto da elevação da pressão arterial é suficiente para o diagnóstico.

## 4.3.4. Hipertensão Gestacional
É uma hipertensão “nova” que surge após a 20ª semana de gestação, na ausência de proteinúria, sem anormalidades bioquímicas ou hematológicas. Geralmente não é acompanhada por RCIU, e os desfechos geralmente são bons; porém, cerca de um quarto das mulheres com hipertensão gestacional (particularmente aquelas que se apresentam com menos de 34 semanas) evolui para pré-eclâmpsia e apresenta desfechos desfavoráveis. Em geral se resolve dentro das 6 semanas pós-parto. 

4.3.4.1. Pontos-chaves

Considerar hipertensão quando a medida de pressão arterial for PAS ≥ 140 mmHg e/ou PAD ≥ 90 mmHg;
Definir como hipertensão grave quando PAS ≥ 160 mmhg e PAD ≥ 110 mmHg. Estes níveis estão associados com aumento de risco de AVC em gestantes;
Hipertensão arterial crônica, pré-existente (essencial ou secundária) deve ter um controle rigoroso da pressão arterial materna (PAS = 110 a 140 mmhg e PAD = 85 mmHg), monitorização do crescimento fetal e avaliaçao repetida na presunção de ocorrência da pré-eclâmpsia e outras complicações;
Pré-eclâmpsia/eclâmpsia - síndrome hipertensiva complexa, pode deteriorar rapidamente e sem prenuncio. Não é recomendado classificar a pré-eclâmpsia como "leve" ou "grave”;
A existência de proteinúria não é essencial para o diagnóstico e pode ocorrer pela primeira vez no período intra-parto ou no pós-parto imediato.

## 4.4. Tratamento da Síndrome Hipertensiva Gestacional

## 4.4.1. Tratamento Não Farmacológico269
Considerando gestantes os níveis tensionais – PAS ≥ 140 mmHg ou PAD ≥ 90 mmHg, as recomendações são:
Não há indicação de repouso rotineiramente nas gestantes com Tratamento da síndrome hipertensiva gestacional (SHG); 
Exercícios físicos são recomendados por pelo menos 3 dias por semana, em uma média de 50 min por sessão, incluindo atividades aeróbicas e treinamento de força e flexibilidade; A atividade física com exercícios moderados pode ser continuada nas mulheres habituadas a praticá-los; 
A dieta deve ser saudável, rica em nutrientes, proteínas, fibras e cereais;
A suplementação de cálcio é necessária, 1,5 a 2,0 g diários, principalmente em áreas onde a ingestão dietética de cálcio for baixa;
O ganho de peso na gestante se baseia no índice de massa corpórea (IMC) antes da gestação: 
– IMC de 25 kg/m2 (normal): ganho de 11,2 a 15,9 kg;
– IMC de 25 a 29,9 kg/m2(sobrepeso): ganho de 6,8 a 11,2 kg;
– IMC ≥ 30 kg/m2 (obesas): ganho de 6,8 kg.

Não são recomendados:

Nenhuma dieta hipocalórica, mesmo em mulheres obesas, pois pode levar ao retardo de crescimento fetal;
Restrição de sal durante a gestação com a intenção de prevenir a SHG ou dietas com baixo teor de sódio (menos de 100 mEq por dia) nas gestantes com hipertensão arterial crônica;
Uso de suplementos alimentares (magnésio, vitaminas C, E e D, óleos de peixe ou óleos de algas ou alho) com o objetivo de prevenir a SHG.

## 4.4.2. Quando Tratar – Alvo da Pressão Arterial
Existem divergências, nos consensos internacionais, quanto ao início do tratamento farmacológico na SHG. , - Apesar disso, a recomendação predominante é iniciar anti-hipertensivos orais na SHG com a PAS de 140 a 155 mmHg e a PAD de 90 a 105 mmHg, aferidas no consultório, ou ≥ 135/85 mmHg em domicílio. Especificamente, nas hipertensões crônicas (HAC), na hipertensão gestacional (HG) ou na pré-eclâmpsia, a terapia anti-hipertensiva é recomendada se PAS ≥ 140 mmHg ou PAD ≥ 90 mmHg. , 
A meta do tratamento é da pressão arterial ser de 110 a 140/80 a 85 mmHg. Na eventualidade da PAD ≤ 80 mmHg, os anti-hipertensivos devem ser reduzidos ou cessados. A queda abrupta da pressão arterial materna superior a 25% , aumenta o risco de hipoperfusão em órgãos-alvo da mãe e de baixo fluxo sanguíneo placentar, podem contribuir negativamente para a nutrição fetal e / ou oxigenação.
O objetivo primário do tratamento da SHG é a prevenção do acidente vascular cerebral, a progressão da doença renal preexistente ou de outras lesões em órgãos-alvo materno, mantendo a circulação útero-placentária. Os níveis pressóricos devem ser sempre correlacionados ao período gestacional em curso, porque as mudanças fisiológicas , específicas da gestação, ocorrem a cada trimestre gestacional, como o aumento da taxa de filtração glomerular, que altera a biodisponibilidade dos fármacos na gestação. , 
Nas hipertensas crônicas, até o momento, não há provas suficientes que demonstrem que, ao atingir um nível específico (ideal) da pressão arterial ou do uso de um anti-hipertensivo específico, esteja associado com diminuir o risco do desenvolvimento de pré-eclâmpsia sobreposta. - 
Recentemente, a última revisão sistemática da Cochrane concluiu que os dados são insuficientes para determinar os benefícios materno-fetais do do uso de anti-hipertensivos na hipertensão leve a moderada pressão (PAS 140 a 169 mmHg e/ou PAD 90 a 109 mmHg) durante a gravidez. Entretanto, o tratamento com fármacos anti-hipertensivos reduzem o risco de hipertensão grave. Contudo, não diminui a ocorrência de pré-eclâmpsia, RCIU, descolamento de placenta ou efeitos adversos neonatais. Concluindo, são necessários ensaios clínicos mais adequados para fornecer estimativas confiáveis dos verdadeiros benefícios e efeitos adversos do tratamento anti-hipertensivo para hipertensão leve a moderada.
O ensaio clínico multicêntrico randomizado internacional “Control of Hypertension in Pregnancy Study (CHIPS)”, com gestantes que não apresentavam proteinúria e hipertensão “não grave” (PAS de 140 a 159/90 e PAD de 109 mmHg) demonstrou que o controle pressórico “menos rigoroso” da pressão arterial (PAD de 100 mmHg) comparado ao controle “mais rigoroso” (PAD de 85 mmHg) teve correlação com maior incidência de hipertensão grave (pressão arterial ≥ 160/110 mmHg), com pré-eclâmpsia, perda fetal, recém-nascidos de baixo peso, prematuridade e internação em UTI neonatal. , 

## 4.4.3. Anti-hipertensivos Orais – Hipertensão Crônica/Hipertensão Gestacional
Todos os anti-hipertensivos atravessam a barreira placentária; por isso, o uso terapêutico de fármacos na gravidez exige a análise de risco-benefício com individualização do tratamento. , 
No Brasil, os medicamentos orais disponíveis e usualmente empregados são metildopa, betabloqueadores (exceto atenolol), hidralazina e BCC, nifedipina, anlodipina e verapamil. O tratamento anti-hipertensivo nas gestantes com hipertensão gestacional ou hipertensas crônicas recomenda-se iniciar o tratamento com monoterapia e fármacos de primeira linha, - tais como metildopa, BCC e betabloqueadores (exceto atenolol).
Caso os níveis ideais da pressão arterial não sejam alcançados, deve-se considerar a associação com os medicamentos orais de segunda linha: clonidina, hidralazina e diuréticos tiazídicos. , O potencial dos diuréticos causarem depleção de volume intravascular e, portanto, comprometer circulação útero placentar, o RCIU ou oligohidrâmnio, não é suportada em estudos randomizados mais recentes e numa revisão sistemática de diuréticos para a prevenção de pré-eclâmpsia. , - 
Fármacos considerados de primeira linha:
Agonista dos receptores alfa-2- adrenérgicos de ação central: diminuem a pressão arterial por reduzir a resistência periférica vascular. Podem alterar a frequência e o débito cardíaco. A α-metildopa constitui o anti-hipertensivo mais bem estudado na gestação. , no entanto, a metildopa tem apenas um efeito anti-hipertensivo leve, com um início de ação lento (3 a 6 h) e com duração média de 6 a 8 horas. Os efeitos colaterais mais comuns maternos dose-dependente são sonolência e boca seca. Já os independentes de dose incluem a elevação das enzimas hepáticas, em até 5% das mulheres e anemia hemolítica auto-imune. A dose inicial recomendada é de 250 mg, 2 ou 3 vezes ao dia (dose máxima 3 g/dia);
Bloqueadores dos canais de cálcio (BCC): a nifedipina oral parece não ser teratogênica. - , - , , Ensaios clínicos demonstram que não é afetado o fluxo sanguíneo na artéria umbilical. Os efeitos colaterais maternos com o uso de BCC incluem taquicardia, palpitações, edema periférico, dores de cabeça e rubor facial. A experiência com nifedipina tem sido favorável. Embora não seja licenciado especificamente para a gestação, recomenda-s eo seu uso juntamente com labetalol e metildopa . A dose diária máxima da nifedipina é de 120 mg, fracionada em três ou quatro tomadas ou 30-60 mg uma vez ao dia (liberação prolongada). - A administração pela via sublingual é contraindicada por determinar resposta hipotensora imprevisível, excessiva ativação autonômica e isquemia aguda do miocárdio;
A exposição à amlodipina no início da gravidez não parece estar associada a um aumento da taxa de malformações fetais em comparação com outros agentes anti-hipertensivos , e o efeito anti-hipertensivo é lento (± 8 horas);
Betabloqueadores: nenhum dos betabloqueadores têm sido associados a teratogenicidade - O RCIU e o baixo peso da placenta foram associados ao uso de atenolol. , , A exposição a qualquer betabloqueador está associada a risco de bradicardia e hipoglicemia neonatal, podendo causar sedação, distúrbios do sono e depressão na gestante. Não caso do propranolol, há relatos de RCIU, bradicardia e hipoglicemia neonatal, especialmente com doses altas (160 mg/dia). O labetalol não é comercializado no Brasil.
Considerados de segunda linha são:
A clonidina mostra um aumento exagerado da pressão arterial (efeito rebote) quando o tratamento é interrompido abruptamente. Tem um efeito hipotensor maior que a metildopa;
Hidralazina: é predominantemente usada por via intravenosa no tratamento da hipertensão grave na pré-eclâmpsia;
Diuréticos: Os tiazídicos podem ser continuados nas gestantes com HAS crônica, desde que não promovam depleção de volume mas a clorotiazida pode aumentar o risco de anomalia congênita e de complicações neonatais. , 
Os seguintes anti-hipertensivos orais são contra-indicados durante a gestação: 
IECA e BRA, associados a lesão renal aguda fetal e oligoidrâmnio e que devem ser suspensos antes da concepção;
Atenolol (betabloqueador), que leva a RCIU e baixo peso placentário; , 
Espironolactona, que tem um efeito antiandrogênico durante o desenvolvimento fetal; 
Clorotiazida, que pode aumentar o risco de anomalias congênitas e complicações neonatais.

## 4.4.4. Anti-hipertensivos na Hipertensão Grave/Pré-eclâmpsia275,276,278,279,298-300
O prognóstico materno e fetal está correlacionado diretamente ao atendimento inicial prestado a essas gestantes. A pré-eclâmpsia grave é a hipertensão sistólica grave é de início agudo quando a pressão sistólica for maior ou igual a 160 mmHg; hipertensão diastólica grave igual ou superior a 110 mmHg; ou ambos, podendo ocorrer no período pré-natal, intraparto ou pós-parto. É uma emergência obstétrica e requer tratamento imediato com anti-hipertensivos. O objetivo não é normalizar a pressão arterial, mas atingir níveis de 140-150/90-100 mmHg ou a reduzir de 15% a 25% da PA. 
A pré-eclampsia grave está associada à síndrome da encefalopatia reversível posterior (PRES) caracterizada por dor de cabeça, sintomas visuais, consciência prejudicada, crises epilépticas e, ocasionalmente, defeitos neurológicos focais. 
A mulher com diagnóstico de pré-eclamspsia grave deve ser encaminhada rapidamente a um centro terciário de referencia para tratamento. Antes da transferência inter-hospitalar, a pressão arterial (PA) deve ser estabilizada e outras medidas iniciadas, como sulfato de magnésio para profilaxia da eclâmpsia. É recomendado que o sulfato de magnésio deva ser usado para a prevenção e tratamento de convulsões em mulheres com hipertensão gestacional e pré-eclâmpsia com características graves ou iminência de eclâmpsia.A estabilização materna deve ocorrer antes do parto, mesmo em circunstâncias urgentes.
Considerar indicação de internamento em UTI com os seguintes critérios: gestantes com pré-eclâmpsia grave (PAS ≥ 160 mmHg e PAD ≥ 110 mmHg); insuficiência respiratória com necessidade de assistência ventilatória mecânica; eclâmpsia, síndrome HELLP, oligúria, edema agudo de pulmão e complicações neurológicas mais frequentes como o acidente vascular encefálico e a PRES. 
A intubação endotraqueal é outro risco na emergência hipertensiva . A indução de anestesia geral e intubação nunca deve ser realizada sem antes tomar medidas para eliminar ou minimizar a resposta hipertensiva à intubação. A monitoração materno-fetal deve ser rigorosa pela equipe médica e de enfermagem durante o tratamento. Após a estabilização inicial, a equipe deve monitorar de perto a PA e instituir a terapia de manutenção, conforme necessário.
O American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists , , faz as seguintes recomendações e conclusões:
O tratamento com agentes de primeira linha deve ser imediato ou ocorrer o mais rápido possível dentro de 30 a 60 minutos após a hipertensão grave confirmada (pressão arterial maior que 160/110 mmHg e persistente por 15 minutos) para reduzir o risco de derrame materno. A paciente deve ser posicionada em posição sentada ou semi-reclinável, com as costas apoiadas, não devem ser reposicionados para ficarem reclinados ou ficarem de lado para obter uma pressão arterial baixa, pois fornecerá uma leitura falsa da medida pressórica; 
A monitorização materna e fetal por um médico e equipe de enfermagem é recomendada durante o tratamento da hipertensão grave de início agudo;
Após a estabilização inicial, a equipe deve monitorar de perto a pressão arterial e instituir terapia de manutenção, conforme necessário;
Labetalol e hidralazina (IV) intravenosos são considerados medicamentos de primeira linha para o tratamento da hipertensão grave de início agudo em gestantes e mulheres no período pós-parto;
A nifedipina oral de liberação imediata também pode ser considerada como terapia de primeira linha, principalmente quando o acesso IV não está disponível;
O uso de labetalol IV, hidralazina IV ou nifedipina oral de liberação imediata para o tratamento de hipertensão grave de início agudo em pacientes grávidas ou no pós-parto não requer monitoramento cardíaco;
Nas raras circunstâncias em que bolus labetalol, hidralazina ou nifedipina oral de liberação imediata falham em aliviar o início agudo, hipertensão grave e são administrados em doses apropriadas sucessivas, consulta emergente com um anestesista, subespecialista em medicina materno-fetal ou subespecialista em cuidados intensivos para discutir a intervenção de segunda linha é recomendado;
O sulfato de magnésio não é recomendado como agente anti-hipertensivo, mas o sulfato de magnésio continua sendo o medicamento de escolha para a profilaxia das crises em mulheres com hipertensão grave de início agudo durante a gravidez e o período pós-parto. O início do magnésio não deve ser retardado no cenário de hipertensão grave aguda; é recomendado independentemente de o paciente apresentar hipertensão gestacional com características graves, pré-eclâmpsia com características graves ou eclâmpsia.

## 4.5. Conduta na Emergência Hipertensiva em Pré-eclâmpsia (PA ≥ 160/110 mmHg)
Na emergência hipertensiva as drogas com eficácia são a nifedipina, hidralazina e labetalol. Podem existir diferenças sutis em seus perfis de segurança. A evidência é inadequada para outras drogas. Os medicamentos de uso intravenoso são a hidralazina e labetalol intravenoso (não disponível no Brasil). A nifedipina oral, hoje é aceita como de primeira linha. Uma revisão sistemática recente da Cochrane não encontrou diferenças significativas dessas tres drogas no tratamento da crise hipertensiva quanto à eficácia ou segurança entre a hidralazina e o labetalol ou entre a hidralazina e os BCC. , - 
Nifedipina: dose inicial de 10-20 mg por via oral. O tempo de inicio de ação da nifedipina oral é de 5-10 minutos. A dose deve ser repetida em 20 minutos, se necessário (se pressão arterial for > 155/105 mmHg). Manter 10-20 mg a cada 2-6 horas com a dose diária máxima é de 120 mg. Repetir a medicação se pressão arterial for > 155/105 mmHg e administrar no máximo três doses. Após 20 min da terceira dose e a persistência de hipertensão arterial, administrar fármaco de segunda escolha .Salienta-se que os comprimidos não devem ser mastigados e não devem ser utilizadas as formulações pela via sublingual;
Hidralazina: Dose inicial de 5 mg por via intravenosa (dose máxima de 45 mg) em bólus, lentamente, durante 1 a 2 min, repetir , se necessário, 5mg a cada 20 minutos (obs: A ampola de hidralazina contém 1 ml, na concentração de 20 mg/ml. Diluir uma ampola (1 ml) em 19 ml de água destilada, assim, obtém-se a concentração de 1 mg/ml). O nicio de ação começa dentro de 10 a 30 minutos e dura de 2 a 4 horas. A hidralazina parenteral pode aumentar o risco de hipotensão materna (PA sistólica, 90 mmHg ou menos); 
Nas raras circunstâncias em que o bolus de labetalol (não disponível no Brasil) , de hidralazina ou nifedipina oral (retard) administrados em doses apropriadas e sucessivas não controlarem os níveis tensionais, recomenda-se discutir intervenção com drogas consideradas de segunda linha; 
Nitroglicerina: considerar como medicamento de escolha na pré-eclâmpsia associada com o edema agudo de pulmão (infusão intravenosa de 5 mg/min, aumentando gradualmente a cada 3 a 5 min até uma dose máxima de 100 mg/min);
Nitroprussiato de sódio: deve ser considerado como opção preferencial para controle da pressão arterial em situações excepcionais, como hipertensão refratária ou hipertensão grave com risco de morte. O tratamento prolongado com nitroprussiato de sódio está associado ao risco fetal por intoxiacação pelo cianeto, produto metabólico do nitroprussiato de sodio; por isso, ele deve ser iniciado com 0,25 μg/kg/min até o máximo de 4 μg/kg/min, e por não mais de 4 h de infusão contínua. 

## 4.6. A Profilaxia da Crise Convulsiva na Pré-eclâmpsia – Eclâmpsia e a Terapêutica com Sulfato de Magnésio293,275,299-303
Desde a publicação dos resultados do The Collaborative Eclâmpsia Trial – Maggie Trial, o sulfato de magnésio (MgSO4)é considerado o medicamento de escolha para o tratamento da eclâmpsia iminente e da eclâmpsia. Estudos clinicos randomizados demonstram que o sulfato de magnésio é mais seguro e mais eficaz que a fenitoína, diazepam ou coquetel lítico (clorpromazina, prometazina e petidina) para prevenir convulsões recorrentes na eclâmpsia, além de ser de baixo custo, fácil de administrar e não causar sedação. - Portanto, o uso de sulfato de magnésio é altamente recomendado para casos de eclâmpsia iminente, eclâmpsia, síndrome HELLP (15% desses pacientes desenvolvem eclâmpsia) e pré-eclâmpsia com deterioração clínica e/ou laboratorial, incluindo hipertensão de difícil controle. 
A dose inicial, adequadamente administrada, não oferece riscos de intoxicação. Recomenda-se porém, a monitorização do reflexo patelar , a frequência respiratória e a diurese. Caso haja ausência do reflexo patelar, depressão respiratória (Frequência respiratória < 16 rpm) e diurese inferior a 25 ml/h recomenda-se suspender o MgSO4 por via intravenosa e dosar os seus níveis séricos.
A concentração terapêutica do íon magnésio varia de 4 a 7 mEq/L (4,8 a 8,4 mg/dl). O reflexo patelar fica abolido com 8 a 10 mEq/L, o risco de parada respiratória a partir de 12 mEq/L e cardíaca de 25 mEq/L. O gluconato de cálcio (1 g por via endovenosa – 10 ml a 10% – administrado lentamente) deve ser utilizado nos casos de sinais de intoxicação pelo magnésio. Na parada respiratória, além de gluconato de cálcio, deve-se proceder à intubação endotraqueal e ventilação mecânica. Nas pacientes com insuficiência renal (creatinina ≥ 1,2 mg/dl), a dose de manutenção deve ser a metade da dose recomendada. Deve-se interromper a infusão do sulfato de magnésio apenas se a diurese for inferior a 25 ml. Diante de valores dentro dos limites de normalidade, deve-se manter ou reiniciar o tratamento. 
A prevenção das crises convulsivas deve seguir as seguintes recomendações:
Dose de ataque: (MgSO4 50% – ampola com 10 ml – contém 5 g de magnésio) – 4 a 6 g de MgSO4 por via intravenosa, em dose única (diluir 8 a 12 ml da solução a 50% em 100 ml de soro glicosado a 5% e ministrar, com bomba de infusão, em 30 min);
Dose de manutenção: 1 a 2 g por hora, por via intravenosa (Diluir 10 de MgSO4 50% (1 ampola) em 490 ml de soro fisiológico a 0,9%. A concentração final terá 1 g/100 ml. Infundir a solução por via intravenosa na velocidade de 100 ml por hora em bomba de infusão contínua.
É preciso manter o MgSO4ão por 24 horas após o parto ou após a última convulsão. Nos casos de recorrência da crise convulsiva, administram-se mais 2 g do sulfato de magnésio por via endovenosa (bolus) e utiliza-se como manutenção a dose de 2 g/h. Se dois desses bolus não controlarem as convulsões, a droga de escolha será a difenil-hidantoína em seu esquema clássico para o tratamento de crises convulsivas. Recomenda-se ainda nesses casos a investigação de complicações cerebrais, principalmente hemorragias intracranianas.
Após as primeiras 24 horas de observação e avaliação, necessário decidir por conduta conservadora ou interrupção da gestação. O parto é a única intervenção que leva à resolução da pré-eclâmpsia e eclâmpsia. Recomenda-se que a conduta expectante seja somente até as 37 semanas de gestação. Após esta data gestacional ou se o diagnóstico de pré-eclâmpsia for realizado a termo, a resolução da gestação deverá ser indicada, reduzindo-se, assim, os riscos maternos, sem alterar os resultados perinatais.

## 4.6.1. Pontos-chaves
Em mulheres com hipertensão gestacional, hipertensão preexistente sobreposta por hipertensão gestacional ou com lesão em órgãos alvo , recomenda-se o início do tratamento medicamentoso com a PAS ≥ 140 mmHg ou PAD ≥ 90 mmHg;
A meta para o tratamento de pressão arterial na SHG deve ser para a PAS ≤ 140 e PAD = 80 a 85 mmHg. Nestes níveis os anti-hipertensivos devem ser ajustados;
Metildopa, betabloqueadores (exceto o atenolol) e os BCC são recomendados como os medicamentos de escolha;
Inibidores da ECA, BRA ou inibidores diretos da renina não são recomendados;
A terapêutica com diuréticos geralmente é evitada porque o volume plasmático é reduzido em mulheres que desenvolvem pré-eclâmpsia;
Considerar PAS ≥ 160 mmHg ou PAD ≥ 110 mmHg como uma emergência hipertensiva na mulher grávida, com indicação de imediata hospitalização;
O sulfato de magnésio deve ser usado na prevenção e tratamento de convulsões em mulheres com hipertensão gestacional e pré-eclâmpsia com características graves ou eminência de eclâmpsia;
Na emergência hipertensiva, as drogas indicadas são nifedipina oral, hidralazina intra-venosa e labetalol;
Na pré-eclâmpsia associada ao edema pulmonar, a nitroglicerina (infusão) deve ser considerada;
O parto é a intervenção que conduz à resolução da pré-eclâmpsia e eclâmpsia.

## 4.7. Prognóstico e Prevenção da Pré-eclâmpsia
Modelos com base em dados clínicos ou fatores de risco têm baixa sensibilidade na predição da pré-eclâmpsia. Em contrapartida, marcadores bioquímicos, por exemplo, fator pró-angiogênico, PIGF (derivado da placenta), quando em níveis baixos entre 11ª e 13ª semana de gestação ou o fator anti-angiogênico, tirosinoquinase 1 solúvel FMS like- sFlt-1, em níveis elevados, podem predizer a pré-eclâmpsia. Ambos não apresentam sensibilidade suficiente na presunção, contudo os estudos sobre a relação entre ambos (sFlt-1/PIGF), são promissores. No momento, não há nenhum teste laboratorial preditor disponível na prática clínica. 
A US com Doppler através da avaliação da pulsatilidade e resistência nas artérias uterinas, pode classificar a gestante como de risco para desenvolvimento de pré-eclâmpsia. A US com Doppler deve ser realizada entre 20 e 22 semanas, tem boa correlação com pré-eclâmpsia tardia (> 34 semanas) e RCIU. Por outro lado, a US com Doppler realizada no final do primeiro trimestre tem menor acurácia; porém, somada com a história clínica e as comorbidades, pode ser útil em identificar as gestantes de maior risco e selecionar aquelas com indicação de medidas de prevenção da pré-eclâmpsia. 
Inúmeras estratégias foram estudadas para reduzir a incidência de pré-eclâmpsia. Dieta, perda de peso, atividade física, vitaminas, antioxidantes, nitratos, dipiridamol, heparinas (BPM e HNF) e antiagregantes plaquetários foram investigados, e destes apenas a reposição de cálcio e o ácido acetilsalicílico (AAS) mostraram benefício.
A reposição de cálcio (1,5 a 2,0 g/dia) reduz o risco de pré-eclâmpsia de maneira efetiva na subpopulação com ingesta diária de cálcio abaixo de 600 mg/dia. 
O benefício do uso da aspirina (AAS) em baixa dose (entre 75 e 150 mg) na prevenção da pré-eclâmpsia foi demonstrado e, recentemente, sua recomendação foi incluída em diretrizes internacionais. , , Estudo controlado que inclui 1.776 pacientes, que utilizaram a dose diária de 150 mg de AAS iniciada entre 11 e 14 semanas, mostrou beneficio significativo na redução de eventos de pré-eclâmpsia, ratificando o efeito protetor do AAS em gestantes de alto risco.
A indicação precisa do AAS é para pacientes classificadas como de alto risco para pré-eclâmpsia ( ) e deve ser iniciada entre 12 e 16 semanas.

 

## 4.7.1. Pontos-chaves
A presunção da ocorrência de pré-eclâmpsia em pacientes de baixo risco é muito difícil e depende da avaliação conjunta de história clínica e USG doppler;
A reposição de cálcio em pacientes com baixa ingesta reduz o risco de pré-eclâmpsia;
O uso de AAS baixa dose em gestantes de risco moderado a alto reduz o risco de pré-eclâmpsia e deve ser idealmente iniciado entre 12 e 16 semana de gestação.

## 4.8. Hipertensão Arterial no Puerpério
A hipertensão arterial no puerpério é pouco estudada, pois ainda existe um conceito de que a retirada da placenta favorece a resolução da doença. De certo modo, a dequitação marca o momento em que o estímulo da produção de substâncias inflamatórias e vasoconstritoras cessa, levando a um retorno gradual da pressão arterial aos níveis prévios à gestação; contudo, as alterações inflamatórias e de vasoconstrição podem permanecer ainda por alguns dias no organismo materno.

## 4.8.1. Recomendações
De modo geral, a pressão arterial tende a estabilização e o alcance da normalidade dentro de cinco a sete dias, porém, nesse período, ainda há risco de complicações, principalmente nas pacientes com pré-eclâmpsia, além da possibilidade da própria pré-eclâmpsia e até mesmo a eclâmpsia ocorrer no puerpério.
A hipertensão no puerpério pode ser agravada ou prolongada no seu tempo por situações como sobrecarga de volume (hiper-hidratação) e uso de medicações para dor, como anti-inflamatórios não esteróides (vasoconstrição e retenção de sódio), além dos casos em que ocorre acidente vascular cerebral com vasoconstrição reativa e nas pacientes hipertensas crônicas sem diagnóstico prévio.
Nas puérperas com pré-eclâmpsia, pode ocorrer uma nova elevação da pressão arterial entre o 3º e o 6º dia de puerpério, provavelmente pela reabsorção do edema acumulado no terceiro espaço, que é bastante comum na síndrome da pré-eclâmpsia. 
O objetivo do tratamento é diminuir o risco de lesão de órgão-alvo (edema agudo dos pulmões, acidente vascular cerebral, dissecção de aorta, doença renal aguda) por emergência hipertensiva. Logo, puérperas com hipertensão leve a moderada (PAS < 160 mmHg e/ou PAD < 110 mmHg) que estejam assintomáticas podem ser acompanhadas sem medicação anti-hipertensiva.
No puerpério não há restrições ao uso da medicação anti-hipertensiva devendo-se priorizar aquelas que passem em quantidade menor pelo leite materno.
Revisão da Cochrane Library em 2013 sugeriu que o uso da furosemida poderia ajudar no controle mais efetivo e abreviar o tempo de hospitalização das pacientes com pré-eclâmpsia. A recomendação para o uso do diurético é após o segundo dia, quando inicia a reabsorção do edema periférico. O site de consultas https://toxnet.nlm.nih.gov, revisa as publicações e atualiza as recomendações para o uso de fármacos durante o aleitamento. 
Os IECA captopril e enalapril, que são contraindicados durante a gestação, durante o aleitamento são permitidos por passarem em quantidades muito pequenas pelo leite materno. Quanto ao grupo dos BRA, não há ainda estudos suficientes para liberação do uso dessa classe de medicação. Dentre os BCC, o mais utilizado é a nifedipina, que também passa pouco pelo leite materno. O anlodipino e os demais BCC carecem de estudos para sua liberação sem restrições. Os betabloqueadores devem ser individualizados caso a caso e de forma geral são compatíveis com o aleitamento.
Os diuréticos, como hidroclorotiazida e furosemida, podem depletar o espaço intravascular e diminuir a produção de leite; por isso, devem ser usados em dose baixa. A espironolactona pode ser administrada sem restrição e pode ser indicada para pacientes com hipertensão resistente (hiperaldosteronismo primário).
Um estudo comparando captopril e clonidina para controle de hipertensão grave (PAS ≥ 180 mmHg e PAD ≥ 110 mmHg) verificou que não houve diferença significativa entre essas substâncias, apenas uma tendência de a clonidina ser melhor no terceiro dia do puerpério. Ambas foram consideradas efetivas e seguras para tratar puérperas com emergência hipertensiva. 
A alta hospitalar deve ser com nível de PAS < 160 mmHg e PAD < 110 mmHg, pelo menos durante 24 horas prévias, e o acompanhamento ambulatorial deve ser periódico com reavaliação em curto prazo, no máximo de uma a duas semanas após a alta. 

## 4.8.2. Pontos-chaves
A hipertensão costuma melhorar nos primeiros cinco a sete dias, após o parto. Contudo, após esse período podem ocorrer complicações, inclusive pré-eclâmpsia/eclâmpsia;
Devem ser priorizadas as medicações liberadas para o aleitamento;
O seguimento ambulatorial é importante, visto que a maioria destas pacientes tem alta hospitalar em uso de medicação anti-hipertensiva.

## 4.9. Hipertensão na Gestação e Risco Cardiovascular Futuro
A pré-eclâmpsia é um fator de risco independente para doença arterial coronária, hipertensão crônica, doença vascular periférica e acidente vascular cerebral. Os mecanismos possíveis para aumento da doença cardiovascular (DCV) incluem as disfunções endotelial, vascular e metabólica encontradas durante a pré-eclâmpsia, que possuem uma ligação comum com outros fatores de risco tradicionais, como dislipidemia, obesidade, diabetes melitos e doença renal.
O estudo CHAMPS, que inclui um número superior a 1.000.000 de mulheres sem DCV após a primeira gestação, mostrou um aumento do risco de revascularização miocárdica e internação por acidente vascular cerebral e doença vascular arterial periférica duas vezes maior nas pacientes que tiveram pré-eclâmpsia, hipertensão gestacional, ruptura ou infarto placentário.
Estudos incluindo mais de 3 milhões de mulheres e quase 200.000 gestantes mostrou risco relativo aumentado de 3,7 para hipertensão arterial crônica; de 2,16 para doença isquêmica cardíaca e de 1,81 para acidente vascular cerebral, em pacientes que apresentaram pré-eclâmpsia.
Desse modo, a hipertensão durante a gestação deve ser encarada como marcador de risco cardiovascular futuro relacionado ao gênero. É preciso colocar na rotina o cuidado com a orientação das mulheres após o parto e intensificar o controle dos demais fatores modificáveis visando diminuir o risco cardiovascular desse grupo especial de mulheres. 

## 4.9.1. Pontos-chaves
A pré-eclâmpsia é um fator de risco para doença arterial coronária, hipertensão crônica, doença vascular periférica e acidente vascular cerebral;
Pacientes que apresentaram hipertensão arterial durante a gestação devem intensificar o controle dos demais fatores modificáveis visando diminuir o risco cardiovascular futuro.

## 5. Tratamento e Prevenção das Complicações Cardíacas

## 5.1. Arritmias Cardíacas

## 5.1.1. Epidemiologia
As arritmias são complicações muito frequentes durante a gravidez, associadas ou não a doença cardíaca estrutural ou elétrica. A primeira manifestação pode ser na gestação ou pode ocorrer agravamento de arritmias preexistentes. 
A ocorrência de arritmias durante a gestação exige uma investigação com particular atenção em definir ou excluir uma lesão estrutural ou elétrica do coração, conduta fundamental na determinação do tratamento e prognóstico da paciente. , 
O estudo em gestantes hospitalizadas mostrou que: 60% das arritmias corresponderam a bradicardia ou taquicardia sinusal; 19%, a extrassístoles supraventriculares ou ventriculares; 14%, a taquicardias supraventriculares (TSV); 5%, a TV ou FV; e 2%, a outros distúrbios. 
A FA e a taquicardia paroxística supraventricular (TPSV) são as TSV sustentadas mais frequentemente diagnosticadas na gestação; bradiarritmias, distúrbios de condução, outras taquicardias atriais, TV e FV são relativamente raras. 
Os admitidos riscos dos fármacos antiarrítmicos sobre a organogênese e o desenvolvimento fetal devem ser considerados na prescrição durante a gravidez, uma vez que a maioria das arritmias diagnosticadas não requer tratamento específico. Contudo, as arritmias recorrentes ou persistentes que determinam sintomas importantes ou repercussão hemodinâmica devem ser igualmente tratadas como em mulheres fora da gestação. 
O risco inerente à radiação ionizante utilizada para a realização da ablação por cateter pode ser minimizado com o mapeamento eletroanatômico e, em alguns casos de implantes de dispositivos (marca-passo, CDI e ressincronizador), com o uso do ECO bidimensional. 

## 5.1.2. Apresentação Clínica
Palpitações ocorrem com frequência na gravidez, podendo estar relacionadas a arritmias ou ser consequentes às alterações hemodinâmicas da gestação. A avaliação diagnóstica das palpitações em gestantes não difere da realizada em mulheres fora da gestação e tem demonstrado que, em apenas 10% dos casos, as palpitações estão associadas à presença de arritmias. 
Bradicardia sinusal sintomática é rara e geralmente está associada à síndrome da hipotensão supina gestacional, cujo tratamento é a colocação da gestante em decúbito lateral esquerdo. Síncope ligada a bloqueios atrioventriculares é igualmente pouco frequente, e o BAVT congênito, principalmente supra-hissiano, com QRS estreito, apresenta boa evolução na gestação. A MCS, rara durante a gestação, apresenta maior risco de ocorrência em mulheres com TV associada a cardiopatia estrutural e, na gestação e no puerpério, naquelas com canalopatias (especialmente portadoras da síndrome do QT Longo). , 

## 5.1.3. Risco Materno-fetal
Os distúrbios sustentados do ritmo cardíaco podem levar ao comprometimento hemodinâmico materno, ao risco de tromboembolismo e à MCS. Podem também comprometer o desenvolvimento fetal, determinando baixo peso, parto prematuro, anormalidades fetais e mais indicações de parto cesárea. Por essa razão, tais distúrbios devem ser diagnosticados e adequadamente tratados.
A classificação da OMS modificada quanto ao risco materno considera as extrassístoles supraventriculares e ventriculares isoladas como classe I (na qual não há risco detectável de aumento da mortalidade materna, mas há aumento discreto na morbidade materna); as arritmias supraventriculares estão na classe II (na qual há aumento discreto na mortalidade e moderado na morbidade materna); e as TV são incluídas na classe III (na qual há aumento significativo na mortalidade e morbidade maternas). 
As recomendações atuais propõem que as arritmias durante a gestação sejam classificadas, de acordo com o potencial comprometimento hemodinâmico, em: Baixo risco para MCS (TPSV e FA com estabilidade hemodinâmica, TV idiopática, síndrome do QT longo de baixo risco, síndrome de Wolff-Parkinson-White); Médio risco para MCS (TSV instável, TV em pacientes com cardiopatia estrutural, síndrome de Brugada, síndrome do QT Longo e TV polimórfica catecolaminérgica de risco moderado); Elevado risco para MCS (TV instável em pacientes com cardiopatia estrutural, Torsade de pointes em pacientes com síndrome do QT Longo, síndrome do QT curto, TV polimórfica catecolaminérgica de alto risco). , 
O planejamento do parto no grupo de baixo risco deve ter participação do cardiologista, e o parto deve ser de indicação obstétrica. No grupo de médio risco, o parto se mantém de indicação obstétrica; entretanto, a equipe multiprofissional que acompanha a gestante deve incluir um eletrofisiologista e, durante o parto, deve estar preparada para a utilização de fármacos como adenosina e betabloqueadores, bem como para o uso de um cardioversor-desfibrilador (CD). No grupo de alto risco há indicação de parto cesárea, durante o qual é preciso estar preparado para a utilização do CD e de antiarrítmicos, além dos betabloqueadores; nesse grupo, a gestante poderá necessitar de UTI Não pós-parto. 

## 5.1.4. Tratamento
O tratamento das arritmias em gestantes é semelhante ao realizado em mulheres não gestantes. De acordo com a indicação, podem ser utilizados os seguintes métodos: cardioversão elétrica, manobras vagais, fármacos antiarrítmicos, implante de dispositivos (marca-passo, CDI, ressincronizador cardíaco) e ablação por cateter ( ). O tratamento de arritmias cardíacas na sala de emergência será discutido no tópico 5.7.

 

A carência de estudos clínicos randomizados faz com que a contraindicação ou não ao método seja pautada em dados experimentais em animais, nos registros sobre os efeitos colaterais dos medicamentos usados na prática clínica e em relatos ou séries de casos. Esse fato determina que tais tratamentos devem ser usados apenas quando há comprometimento hemodinâmico materno e fetal em decorrência da arritmia e/ou quando há risco de MCS materna na gravidez e no puerpério. Quando possível, todos os tratamentos devem ser postergados para o segundo ou terceiro trimestre (evitando o período de organogênese); no caso dos fármacos, sempre utilizá-los na menor dose e pelo menor tempo necessário.
A cardioversão elétrica sincronizada, indicada para a reversão de TSV instáveis (FA, flutter atrial, taquicardias atriais, TPSV) e TV instáveis ou estáveis (estas, quando na presença de cardiopatia), é segura em todas as etapas da gestação, não comprometendo o fluxo sanguíneo para o feto. A posição anterolateral das pás deve ser a escolhida, com a colocação da pá lateral abaixo do seio materno esquerdo e monitoramento do ritmo fetal. 
As manobras vagais, como manobra de Valsalva, massagem do seio carotídeo, imersão da face em água a 10ºC ou colocação de uma toalha molhada na face, podem ser utilizadas com segurança para reversão aguda de uma TPSV (determinadas por reentrada nodal ou por uma via acessória, sendo esta última característica da síndrome de Wolff-Parkinson-White) na gestação. , A manobra de Valsalva costuma ser mais efetiva que a massagem do seio carotídeo. A compressão do globo ocular é potencialmente perigosa e nunca deve ser usada.
Quando as manobras vagais falham na tentativa de reversão aguda da TPSV, a adenosina (6 mg iniciais; dose máxima de 24 mg) é a substância de primeira escolha para gestantes, pois não há evidências de efeitos negativos para o feto, e os efeitos na mãe (desconforto torácico e rubor) são de curta duração. , , Mesmo não sendo fármacos da primeira escolha, betabloqueadores (metoprolol, propranolol), verapamil, procainamida e amiodarona também podem ser utilizados nessa tentativa de reversão.
No manuseio agudo das demais arritmias sustentadas supraventriculares (FA, flutter, taquicardia atrial), betabloqueadores, verapamil e digitálicos são indicados para o controle da resposta ventricular, e os demais fármacos, incluindo flecainida, ibutilida e propafenona, podem ser utilizados para a reversão aguda ao ritmo sinusal. , , Na reversão para ritmo sinusal das TV idiopáticas estáveis, indicam-se betabloqueadores, sotalol, flecainida, procainamida e lidocaína. O marca-passo ventricular com frequência acima da TSV é uma alternativa a ser considerada ( ).

 

O tratamento permanente das TSV e TV deve ser igual ao realizado fora da gestação, salvo as restrições ao uso da amiodarona pelas implicações ao feto (hipotireoidismo, hipertireoidismo, retardo do crescimento e prematuridade). Deve ser considerado que bradicardia e hipoglicemia fetal e baixo peso ao nascer podem estar associados ao uso crônico de betabloqueadores; contudo, esse fato parece ser dose-dependente. A prescrição de betabloqueador deve contemplar o benefício da sua utilização excedendo os riscos, exceto o atenolol, que apresenta um reconhecido efeito teratogênico e, portanto, deve ser evitado durante a gestação. Também há relatos de teratogenicidade com o uso de diltiazem. O sotalol não deve ter uso permanente em gestantes com síndrome de Wolff-Parkinson-White para prevenção dos episódios de TPSV ( e ). , , 

 

 

De maneira geral, a ablação por cateter e o implante de dispositivos, quando possível, devem ser realizados fora do período gestacional, pelos riscos inerentes a tais procedimentos, incluindo aquele relacionado à exposição à radiação ionizante. A ablação por cateter durante a gestação tem sido indicada apenas para gestantes que apresentam taquicardias recorrentes ou persistentes com grave comprometimento hemodinâmico e que não respondem aos tratamentos usuais. Há relatos de casos e de pequenas séries de pacientes com TSV submetidas à ablação por cateter com a utilização de estratégias de mapeamento que utilizam cada vez menos radiação ionizante, aumentando a segurança materna e fetal quanto aos riscos futuros dessa exposição. Não há relatos de ablação por cateter de TV até o momento.
Mulheres portadoras de marca-passo e CDI apresentam boa evolução durante a gestação; entretanto, as complicações inerentes à doença cardíaca subjacente e ao dispositivo podem estar presentes, determinando a necessidade de um acompanhamento especializado. Caso sejam absolutamente imprescindíveis, tais dispositivos podem ser implantados com segurança durante a gestação, sem ou com um mínimo de fluoroscopia. 
A reprogramação dos dispositivos (marca-passo e CDI) deve ser realizada antes do parto cesárea, devido a interferência no funcionamento do dispositivo causada pelo bisturi elétrico. Caso o parto cesárea seja de emergência, coloca-se um imã sobre a loja do gerador de marca-passo durante o uso do bisturi elétrico, com colocação da placa do cautério longe da região torácica. Para parto vaginal não é necessária tal reprogramação.
Em gestantes com FA ou flutter atrial crônicos não associados a doença cardíaca estrutural, deve ser realizada a estratificação do risco para fenômenos tromboembólicos, por meio da utilização do escore de risco CHA2DS2-VASc, incluindo a indicação de anticoagulação quando esse escore for maior ou igual a 2. É controverso se o estado de hipercoagulabilidade aumenta o escore de riscos para a indicação de anticoagulantes na gestação. Deve ser enfatizado que os NOACS (dabigatrana, rivaroxabana, apixabana, edoxabana) não devem ser usados em gestantes. , 

## 5.1.5. Pontos-chaves
A conduta inicial em arritmias durante a gravidez é a investigação de lesão cardíaca estrutural;
Arritmias “novas”, na ausência de lesão cardíaca estrutural, devem ser tratadas de acordo com os sintomas maternos ou com a complexidade da arritmia;
O sistema de Holter 24 horas é o exame essencial na decisão terapêutica;
O implante de dispositivos (marca-passo, CD) e ablação de radiofrequência com mapeamento eletroanatômico são seguros na gravidez e devem ser indicados perante a refratariedade farmacológica;
Os dispositivos como marca-passo, CD e ressincronizador cardíaco devem ser reprogramados após o parto cesárea.

## 5.2. Tromboembolismo

## 5.2.1. Epidemiologia
O evento tromboembólico venoso é importante causa de mortalidade materna e, potencialmente, passível de prevenção. , É a principal causa direta de morte materna nos países desenvolvidos e no Brasil; no ano de 2013, foi a sexta causa, atrás de hemorragia grave, hipertensão na gestação, infecção, complicações do parto e abortamento. Além disso, é uma relevante causa de morbidade pela síndrome pós-trombótica. O diagnóstico tardio, o tratamento postergado ou inadequado e a profilaxia imprópria são responsáveis por cerca de 3,5% das mortes maternas. 
O tromboembolismo compreende tanto a trombose venosa profunda (TVP) quanto o TEP, sendo que 75 a 80% dos casos de tromboembolismo associados à gravidez são de TVP e 20 a 25%, de TEP. A verdadeira incidência da doença associada à gestação é desconhecida, mas parece estar entre 7 e 25/10.000 gestações, e a impressão clínica é de que as chances estão aumentadas de 5 a 10 vezes nesse período. O risco parece ser maior no terceiro trimestre, mas é elevado desde o primeiro. No puerpério, ele chega a mais de 20 vezes o risco de uma mulher não grávida e se estende de maneira decrescente até 6 semanas do pós-parto. Entretanto, estudos recentes têm demonstrado um aumento do risco de tromboembolismo em até 180 dias pós-parto em grupos de pacientes com alguns fatores de risco obstétricos, entre eles o parto cesárea e a gestação gemelar. , , 

## 5.2.2. Fatores de Risco
A lista os fatores de risco associados a tromboembolismo na gestação, relacionando os preexistentes, os transitórios e os obstétricos. Sugere-se que a presença de dois ou mais destes fatores aumenta mais ainda o risco da doença; entretanto, é a história de trombose prévia o fator de risco individual mais importante. A recorrência de trombose nesse período está aumentada em 3 a 4 vezes, correspondendo a 15 a 25% de todos os caso de tromboembolismo na gestação. , 

 

## 5.2.3. Trombofilias
Trombofilia compreende um estado de hipercoagulabilidade congênita ou adquirida. O problema isolado, mesmo no contexto de uma gravidez, não resulta necessariamente na ocorrência de tromboembolismo, e a raridade de tromboembolismo na gravidez e a elevada incidência de trombofilias hereditárias não justificam o rastreamento sistemático dessa doença.
A trombose venosa é uma doença poligênica de penetração incompleta, tornando o aconselhamento com base genética incerto. O risco de tromboembolismo associado a diferentes trombofilias e sua prevalência na população geral estão na .

 

O rastreamento das trombofilias tem valor limitado em gestantes com tromboembolismo agudo porque não modifica a conduta clínica. Assim, a pesquisa de trombofilia durante a gestação é recomendada nas seguintes situações, de acordo com as classes de evidências:
Fundamentada no risco clínico (classe IB);
História familiar (parentes de primeiro grau) de tromboembolismo sem causa detectável ou ocorrido durante exposição hormonal, ou fator de risco menor, ou ainda em idade abaixo de 50 anos deve ser pesquisado (classe IIC);
Tromboembolismo com fator de risco transitório menor, como viagem (classe IIC).
A pesquisa de trombofilia não é recomendada nas seguintes situações:
Tromboembolismo prévio sem causa aparente (IB) e tromboembolismo relacionado ao uso hormonal ou em gestação anterior (classe IIC) requerem a indicação da tromboprofilaxia;
História pessoal da doença com fator de risco transitório maior (fratura, cirurgia, imobilidade prolongada) (classe IIB);
História obstétrica de perdas fetais recorrentes, placenta prévia, RCIU e pré-eclâmpsia.

## 5.2.4. Diagnóstico
O diagnóstico final pode ser prejudicado pelos sinais e sintomas inerentes à gravidez normal, tais como edema, dor em membros inferiores ou dor torácica, palpitação precordial e dispneia. Ainda assim, a clínica é substrato essencial para a busca do diagnóstico conclusivo, porque ainda não há um teste de triagem suficientemente sensível para definir a situação. Além disso, a maioria dos estudos que avaliaram exames de diagnósticos por imagem de tromboembolismo e fluxograma para diagnóstico excluiu gestantes por preocupação com a segurança materno-fetal.

5.2.4.1. Trombose Venosa Profunda

O diagnóstico embasado no quadro clínico (anamnese e exame clínico) é preocupante, pois implica a necessidade ou não da terapêutica anticoagulante permanente durante a gestação. Essa situação requer exames subsidiários para a conclusão do diagnóstico, que devem ser agilizados porque a morte súbita não é incomum em gestantes com sinais e sintomas compatíveis com a doença.
Escores de risco estruturados para classificar uma gestante como de risco baixo, intermediário ou alto para TVP, como o de Wells, não foram validados na gestação. Já a regra de LEFT foi proposta como específica para a predição da chance de TVP na gravidez e parece promissora. Se nenhuma dessas variáveis estiver presente, o valor preditivo negativo parece ser de 100%, mas esse método ainda deve ser validado em maiores estudos prospectivos. , 
As variáveis consideradas nos escores de risco para TVP são:
Apresentação da trombose em membro inferior esquerdo;
Diferença ≥ 2 cm na circunferência da panturrilha (edema);
Apresentação no primeiro trimestre da gravidez.
A lista os exames complementares utilizados para o diagnóstico da TVP, as sensibilidades, especificidades e suas vantagens e desvantagens.

 

5.2.4.2. Dímero D

A dosagem do dímero-D está presente no algoritmo clássico para diagnóstico do tromboembolismo; contudo, durante a gravidez, esse marcador perde sua acurácia no diagnóstico do TEP, uma vez que sofre aumento em cerca de 40% a cada trimestre, no puerpério e em complicações como pré-eclâmpsia e descolamento de placenta. Essas incertezas influenciam na discordância sobre o uso do dímero-D no algoritmo diagnóstico de tromboembolismo na gestação. , , 

5.2.4.3. Ultrassonografia Venosa

Uma abordagem prática diante da suspeita de TVP se inicia com a utilização da US de compressão do membro acometido. A análise da compressibilidade das veias por meio desse exame apresenta sensibilidade de 96% e especificidade de 98% para o diagnóstico de TVP acima do joelho, e um pouco menor para aquelas abaixo do joelho, embora, mesmo nestas tenham chance diagnóstica substancial. O conhecimento de que a TVP frequentemente se apresenta nas veias proximais, mas pode ser isolada nas veias ilíacas, pode limitar a capacidade de exclusão da TVP apenas com a US de compressão em gestantes sintomáticas. Uma vez que as manobras de compressão não podem ser realizadas nas veias ilíacas, um trombo na veia ilíaca é diagnosticado por visualização direta de massa ecogênica intraluminal ou ausência de fluxo venoso espontâneo usando o Doppler.
Se a US é positiva, confirma o diagnóstico, e o tratamento é iniciado imediatamente; caso seja negativa e a paciente permaneça com sintomas, deve-se repetir o exame a cada 3 a 7 dias e iniciar o tratamento quando o diagnóstico se confirmar. A mostra dois fluxogramas para o diagnóstico de TVP na gestação: uma US venosa de compressão a partir das veias femorais e a utilização do dímero-D para avaliar a necessidade de investigação do território ilíaco; e uma US venosa completa da perna, incluindo a avaliação da veia ilíaca.

 

5.2.4.4. Ressonância Magnética de Veias Ilíacas

Quando o quadro clínico sugere trombose ilíaca isolada (edema de todo o membro, com ou sem dor em flanco, nádegas ou lombar), situação em que a US não é de boa resolução, deve-se utilizar a ressonância magnética. Ela pode ser empregada para diagnosticar TVP envolvendo veias ilíacas durante a gravidez, mas depende da perícia do examinador. , , 

5.2.4.5. Tromboembolismo Pulmonar

No momento, a abordagem para o diagnóstico do TEP na gestação é incerta e necessita de maiores estudos. Cerca de apenas sete diretrizes consideraram o diagnóstico do TEP na gestação, e as orientações são muito discordantes em relação ao uso de regras de predição de risco, uso da dosagem do dímero-D e escolha de métodos de imagem. A maioria delas não usa a dosagem de dímero-D no algoritmo diagnóstico para TEP. Em relação à US, algumas utilizam inicialmente a busca do diagnóstico de TVP; porém, como sua positividade é de apenas 20 a 40% na TEP, se ela for negativa, o diagnóstico tem de ser confirmado por outros métodos de imagem.
Os exames de eleição para o diagnóstico de TEP são cintilografia pulmonar de ventilação e perfusão (V/Q) ou ATCP; entretanto, ambos os testes carreiam risco de exposição materna e fetal a radiação. A cintilografia pulmonar V/Q expõe o feto a maior dose de radiação do que a ATCP; assim, se a radiografia de tórax for normal, considera-se apenas a cintilografia de perfusão, reduzindo a dose de radiação. A cintilografia V/Q também expõe a criança a maior risco de neoplasia, e a ATCP expõe a mãe a uma dose maior de radiação, levando a aumento pequeno, mas significativo, do risco de câncer de mama (1 caso em 280.000 versus menos de 1 em 1.000.000).
A decisão entre realizar V/Q ou ATCP é divergente. A maioria das recomendações indica a cintilografia V/Q como primeira escolha, especialmente a de perfusão na presença de radiografia de tórax normal. Outras, contudo, recomendam usar a ATCP com baixas doses para o diagnóstico de TEP, embora resultem em maior proporção de resultados inconclusivos na gestação. Cerca de 80% das cintilografias são diagnósticas, isto é, 70% são normais e 5 a 10% são de alta probabilidade. Na encontra-se a dose de radiação absorvida nos testes diagnósticos para TEP na gravidez. , 

 

Pregnancy-Adapted YEARS Algorithm foi aplicado para o diagnóstico de TEP numa população de gestantes e mostrou que, na ausência de fatores como trombose venosa profunda, hemoptise, TEP como diagnóstico mais provável e dímero D não superior a 1000 ng/ml, o diagnóstico de TEP pode ser descartado e, consequentemente, a angiotomografia de tórax poderia ser evitada em 32 a 65% das pacientes.

5.2.4.6. Diagnóstico Diferencial

O diagnóstico diferencial do TEP é amplo, pois a embolia pulmonar tem manifestações clínicas semelhantes às de pneumonia, IC e IAM. Por isso, é prudente descartar a presença de embolia pulmonar coexistente aos quadros com manifestação pneumônica. Do ponto de vista periférico, a TVP de membros inferiores deve ser diferenciada das doenças osteomusculares, tais como tendinite, distensão muscular, cisto poplíteo, aneurisma de poplítea, hematoma, celulite, linfangite e síndrome pós-trombótica ( ).

 

## 5.2.5. Tratamento

5.2.5.1. Abordagem Geral

Diante de forte suspeita clínica de tromboembolismo, a anticoagulação plena e permanente deve ser iniciada antes da confirmação do diagnóstico, exceto quando ela for contraindicada. A heparina é o anticoagulante preferível, enquanto os “novos” anticoagulantes orais, como dabigatrana, rivaroxabana e apixabana, não estão liberados para uso na gestação e no aleitamento materno. Em casos de alergia ou trombocitopenia induzida pela heparina, o fondaparinux pode ser indicado e parece ser seguro no segundo e terceiro trimestres da gravidez.

5.2.5.2. Uso da Heparina

As HBPM e a HNF intravenosa são as opções no tratamento da TEP na gestação. A HBPM é fácil de ser utilizada e parece ser mais segura e eficaz do que a HNF, com dados extrapolados de estudos que não incluíram a gestação. A HNF intravenosa é indicada em pacientes com risco aumentado de sangramento ou hipotensão persistente na vigência de TEP. O uso prolongado da heparina, ou seja, superior a sete semanas, associa-se ao risco de osteoporose, hemorragia, reações alérgicas, necrose de pele e trombocitopenia, sendo menos frequente com o uso das HBPM. A suspensão está indicada diante da queda na contagem de plaquetas abaixo de 150.000 ou equivalente a 50% da contagem inicial. Nesse caso, a substituição pelo fondaparinux, embora controversa, pode ser indicada.
A anticoagulação deve ser continuada durante toda a gravidez e, pelo menos, nas seis primeiras semanas pós-parto. A contagem de plaquetas deverá ser realizada diariamente na busca de trombocitopenia nos primeiros 3 dias de tratamento e, depois, semanalmente.

5.2.5.2.1. Doses Recomendadas

HBPM subcutânea: dalteparina 200 unidades/kg/dia ou 100 unidades/kg/12 em 12 h, ou enoxaparina 1 mg/kg/12 e 12 h. A dose de heparina deve ser controlada pelo nível do fator antiXa na faixa terapêutica entre 0,6 e 1,0 IU/ml quando aplicada a cada 12 h, e na faixa de 1 a 2 UI/ml quando aplicada em dose diária;
HNF intravenosa: bólus de HNF de 80 unidades/kg seguido de infusão a 18 unidades/kg/hora, ajustada a cada 6 h para manter TTPa entre 1,5 e 2,5 vezes o basal. A estabilização da faixa terapêutica permite o controle diário do TTPa;
HNF subcutânea: é razoável iniciar com 17.500 UI/12 e 12 h, ajustada a cada 6 h para manter TTPa entre 1,5 e 2,5 vezes o controle. A estabilização da faixa terapêutica permite o controle diário do TTPa.

5.2.5.2.2. Trabalho de Parto e Parto

O planejamento do parto de pacientes anticoaguladas exige o envolvimento de equipe multiprofissional, pois riscos de sangramento e de trombose devem ser ponderados nas fases do trabalho de parto, do parto e do puerpério. Nos casos de trabalho de parto espontâneo, a heparina deve ser imediatamente suspensa; no parto programado induzido ou cesárea, a HBPM deve ser suspensa 24 h antes, conduta que possibilita a anestesia neuroaxial. Em pacientes em que se julga arriscado suspender a heparina por 24 h, ela deve ser substituída pela HNF intravenosa que deverá ser interrompida 4 a 6 h antes do parto. A anestesia neuroaxial pode ser realizada quando o TTPa retornar ao normal. No caso de parto sabidamente prematuro (trigemelaridade, ruptura prematura de membranas, dilatação cervical significativa, pré-eclâmpsia, RCIU), deve-se descontinuar a HBPM ou a HNF subcutânea nas 36 semanas e trocar por HNF intravenosa.
Na ocorrência de parto em pacientes sob anticoagulação plena, é previsto maior sangramento no intraparto e no puerpério; além disso, o risco de hematoma espinhal contraindica a anestesia neuroaxial. Nesse sentido, sugere-se o uso da ocitocina no terceiro estágio do trabalho de parto. 

5.2.5.2.3. Puerpério

A heparina deve ser reiniciada 12 h após um parto cesárea ou 6 h após parto vaginal, se for assegurado que não há sangramento significativo. A varfarina, quando indicada, deve ser iniciada no segundo dia pós-parto junto com a heparina, até o alcance do INR entre 2 e 3 UI. É imprescindível que a paciente esteja em uso de heparina ao ser iniciado o anticoagulante oral, pois, nos primeiros dias, ele pode estimular a coagulação, podendo causar púrpura vascular. O uso do anticoagulante oral não contraindica o aleitamento.

5.2.5.2.4. Tempo de Anticoagulação

O prazo do tratamento anticoagulante deve ser individualizado. De acordo com estudos na população geral, a duração total deve ser entre 3 e 6 meses em pacientes com fatores de risco apenas transitórios. A anticoagulação deve estender-se por pelo menos 6 semanas pós-parto; porém, pacientes com fatores de risco persistentes podem requerer uma duração de anticoagulação mais prolongada. , 

5.2.5.3. Filtros de Veia Cava Inferior

Os filtros de veia cava inferior removíveis temporários podem ser utilizados na gestação com indicação semelhante à das não grávidas. Isso significa que são contraindicados em casos de anticoagulação convencional, como: acidente vascular cerebral hemorrágico, sangramento ativo e cirurgia recente; tromboembolismo a despeito de anticoagulação plena; necessidade de interrupção da anticoagulação; ou quando a circulação pulmonar estiver significativamente comprometida. O uso do filtro de veia cava é limitado porque está associado a riscos na inserção e remoção, tais como migração do filtro em mais de 20% , fratura do filtro em 5%, perfuração da veia cava inferior em 5% e mortalidade de 0,12 a 0,3%. 

5.2.5.4. Trombólise

A trombólise é reservada a pacientes com TEP maciça com hipotensão associada. Estima-se que a mortalidade materna é de 1%, as perdas fetais são de 6%, e a hemorragia materna é de 8%. A HNF intravenosa deve ser iniciada logo após a trombólise, e a HBPM só deve ser iniciada quando houver estabilização do quadro clínico.

## 5.2.6. Profilaxia
Os esquemas propostos para profilaxia ( ) dos fenômenos tromboembólicos na gestação em diversas situações clínicas são: , , , 

 

HNF profilática: 5.000 unidades de HNF subcutânea, de 12 em 12 h;
HNF dose intermediária: 10.000 unidades de HNF subcutânea, de 12 em 12 h;
HNF ajustada: HNF subcutânea, de 12 em 12 h com TTPa ajustado em 1,5 a 2,5 vezes o basal;
HBPM profilática: dalteparina (5.000 unidades subcutânea de dia), enoxaeparina (40 mg ou 0,5 mg/Kg subcutânea), ou tinzaparina (4.500 unidades subcutânea);
HBPM dose intermediária: dalteparina (5.000 unidades subcutânea, de 12 em 12 h) ou enoxaeparina (40 mg subcutânea, de 12 em 12 h);
HBPM dose ajustada: dalteparina (200 U/kg ou 100 U/kg de 12 em 12 h) ou enoxaeparina (1 mg/kg de 12 em 12 h) em doses ajustadas a 0,6 a 1,2 fator antiXa;
Pós-parto: iniciar com HNF intravenosa ou HBPM subcutânea + varfarina até o INR chegar a 2,0. Posteriormente, manter varfarina por 4 a 6 semanas com INR entre 2,0 e 3,0.

## 5.2.7. Pontos-chaves
O tromboembolismo é uma importante causa de morbimortalidade na gestação;
A gestação e outros fatores relacionados podem aumentar o risco da doença;
O diagnóstico do tromboembolismo deve ser confirmado para justificar o tratamento da doença, que é prolongado, requer medidas profiláticas e tem implicação terapêutica futura;
Na suspeita de tromboembolismo na gestação, a US venosa deve ser o primeiro exame complementar a ser solicitado;
A dosagem normal do dímero-D parece ter alto valor preditivo negativo, apesar de não validado na gestação;
A cintilografia pulmonar V/Q ou a ATCP são os exames de escolha para o diagnóstico de TEP na gestação;
O tratamento de TVP ou TEP de baixo risco na gestação é baseado no uso de HBPM ou HNF;
O tratamento deve ser mantido por toda a gestação e por, pelo menos, 6 semanas pós-parto;
Deve-se usar a profilaxia tromboembólica em gestantes com passado de tromboembolismo. Ela também deve ser considerada na presença de outros fatores de risco;
A investigação de trombofilia deve ser individualizada;
A ausência de fatores como trombose venosa profunda, hemoptise, TEP como diagnóstico mais provável e dímero D não superior a 1000ng/ml torna o diagnóstico de TEP improvável.

## 5.3. Tratamento e Prevenção

## 5.3.1. Insuficiência Cardíaca
A IC destaca-se como a principal causa de complicação associada a mortalidade materna em mulheres portadoras de cardiopatias. Sua prevalência é de 0,04% na população geral de gestantes e de 12,5% dentre as portadoras de cardiopatias. É importante salientar que cerca de 60% dos casos de IC ocorrem no pós-parto. No Brasil, o parto, a despeito de serem assintomáticas, 0,85% das mulheres no puerpério pode vir a apresentar disfunção ventricular. As situações mais frequentes que devem ser consideradas no diagnóstico da IC no ciclo gravídico-puerperal estão apresentadas na . A IC associada a CMPP foi discutida no tópico 3.3.7.

 

O diagnóstico da IC durante a gestação é difícil porque as alterações fisiológicas adaptativas da gravidez acarretam sinais/sintomas, os quais, quando exacerbados, devem ser considerados. Sendo assim, a interface na interpretação dos sintomas fisiológicos da gravidez versus aqueles da IC, como apresentados na , exige a aplicação de conhecimentos específicos para que seja tomada a decisão mais apropriada, quando de uma eventual intervenção terapêutica.

 

Da avaliação inicial ao seguimento clínico, o médico deve voltar sua atenção para os antecedentes pessoais e familiares de cardiopatia, a idade gestacional em que houve a progressão da CF I/II para III/IV e a identificação de fatores como arritmias cardíacas, anemia e infecções ( ).

 

A gravidez em mulheres com FEVE < 40% em CF III/IV (NYHA), fatores considerados preditores de mortalidade, geralmente é mal tolerada e deve ser desaconselhada. Em casos em que a FEVE seja < 20%, a gravidez deve ser contraindicada, e a sua interrupção, quando em curso do primeiro trimestre, deve ser considerada.
A rotina propedêutica para as gestantes com suspeita de IC deve incluir exames subsidiários básicos, a saber: laboratoriais (hemograma, eletrólitos séricos, função renal, glicemia de jejum, hemoglobina glicosilada, perfil lipídico, função tireoidiana e função hepática); ECG de 12 derivações para identificação de arritmias, sobrecarga de câmaras cardíacas, distúrbios de condução; radiografia de tórax para detecção da congestão pulmonar; e ecodopplercardiograma transtorácico bidimensional com análise dos fluxos pelo método Doppler, que é o teste diagnóstico por imagem preferencial para avaliação inicial, não só por sua ampla disponibilidade, como também por prescindir do uso de radiação ionizante. O ECO identifica alterações estruturais cardíacas, incluindo anormalidade do miocárdio, das valvas e do pericárdio, além de avaliar aspectos hemodinâmicos. 
Estudos têm confirmado a validade do BNP como marcador de IC também na gestação. Os valores acima de 100 pg/ml contribuem para dar sustentabilidade clínica no diagnóstico de IC e facilitar a implementação de medidas terapêuticas apropriadas. A incorporação de níveis seriais de BNP na prática clínica pode ser útil, especificamente no julgamento de eventos cardíacos adversos durante a gravidez.
A avaliação do prognóstico da IC durante a gravidez é semelhante à convencional; contudo, os exames invasivos ecotransesofágico, RMC, cintilografia de perfusão miocárdica, PETscan, angiotomografia de coronárias e teste cardiopulmonar devem ser postergados para após a gravidez.
A prevenção da IC durante a gestação exige uma orientação multidisciplinar em conjunto com o obstetra e deve obedecer às seguintes recomendações: (1) visita médica quinzenal ou semanal; (2) controle do peso corporal; (3) insistência em evitar atividades que exijam grandes esforços; (4) restrição hídrica e salina moderada; (5) eventual afastamento das atividades profissionais que exijam grandes esforços; (6) manutenção dos fármacos não teratogênicos; e (7) hospitalização em pacientes que mantêm CF III (NYHA) com medicação otimizada. 
A avaliação obstétrica concomitante ao atendimento cardiológico é importante no estabelecimento da idade gestacional. Assim, a condição da vitalidade e do crescimento fetais e a situação do fluxo placentário são fatores que apoiam a terapêutica e refletem a condição hemodinâmica materna.
O tratamento farmacológico da IC com fração de ejeção reduzida (ICFEr) difere daquele realizado na população de cardiopatas em geral quanto a classe de fármacos utilizada, dose diária e metas terapêuticas, uma vez que os fármacos teratogênicos devem ser substituídos na pré-concepção.
Os betabloqueadores, principalmente os beta-1-cardiosseletivos (metoprolol, bisoprolol e carvedilol), são considerados fármacos de primeira linha, porque determinam benefícios na mortalidade por IC e na MCS, além de melhorarem os sintomas e reduzirem as taxas de re-hospitalizações por IC. Por tais razões, o uso desses betabloqueadores deve ser mantido durante a gestação em casos de ICFEr.
A literatura carece de dados sobre a dose-alvo para o alcance das metas terapêuticas durante a gestação, que não devem ser as mesmas consideradas na população de cardiopatas em geral. Isso porque a frequência cardíaca reduzida e a queda da pressão arterial consequente a altas doses, que habitualmente são fatores usados na população de pacientes com IC, podem comprometer a circulação uteroplacentária.
De modo geral, é prudente que as doses dos fármacos utilizados durante a gravidez sejam fracionadas, inicialmente baixas e aumentadas gradual e cautelosamente, buscando a maior dose tolerada pela mãe e pelo feto. Assim, recomenda-se uma dose inicial do bisoprolol de 1,25 mg/dia, do carvedilol de 3,125 mg 2 vezes/dia e do succinato de metoprolol de 12,5 mg 2 vezes/dia, de acordo com as recomendações na população de pacientes com IC. 
A vitalidade (perfil biofísico e cardiotocografia) e a maturidade fetal devem ser avaliadas com maior frequência quando comparadas às da população de gestantes saudáveis. No período neonatal, a supervisão deve ser durante 24 a 48 horas após o nascimento, considerando os sintomas e sinais mais frequentes, tais como depressão respiratória, bradicardia, hiperbilirrubinemia e hipoglicemia. Por esse motivo, quando próximo do parto, uma medida prudente é a redução progressiva do betabloqueador, buscando a mais baixa dose que tenha eficácia materna. 
A ocorrência de congestão pulmonar demanda o uso de diuréticos de alça, preferencialmente furosemida e tiazídicos, na tentativa de otimizar a pré-carga. Caso não haja congestão, eles devem ser evitados, sob risco de causarem redução do fluxo uteroplacentário. Atenção para os efeitos deletérios do uso permanente de diurético, tais como: piora do fluxo placentário, aumento do ácido úrico (marcador precoce da pré-eclâmpsia), aparecimento de distúrbios eletrolíticos materno-fetais e RCIU.
A hidralazina pode ser usada no tratamento dos sintomas de IC, com ou sem nitratos, como alternativa de tratamento caso a PAS seja > 110 mmHg, principalmente se houver hipertensão arterial associada, disfunção grave de ventrículo esquerdo e/ou evidência de congestão. , Contudo, durante a gravidez, a associação hidralazina/nitratos tem sido relacionada a baixa tolerância materna devido à habitual hipotensão arterial.
A digoxina pode ser usada quando persistir a sobrecarga de volume, apesar da terapia com vasodilatadores e diuréticos. O uso do digital, quando necessário em pacientes com ICFEr, tem um papel importante no controle da frequência cardíaca materna, principalmente na presença de FA. 
A anticoagulação na IC durante a gravidez é controversa. A HBPM ou HNF podem ser consideradas em pacientes nas situações mais frequentes, tais como CMD com FEVE < 35%, hospitalização prolongada e antecedentes de eventos tromboembólicos. É oportuno considerar que o puerpério acrescenta um maior risco de tromboembolismo, daí a anticoagulação ser indicada nessa fase do ciclo gravídico-puerperal.
Quanto às arritmias na IC, a mais comum é a FA, que pode ser tratada com betabloqueadores; se necessário, acrescenta-se a digoxina para controlar a frequência cardíaca. Quanto às arritmias ventriculares frequentes ou à taquiarritmia ventricular sustentada, o tratamento inclui o uso de amiodarona e, quando de maior risco, estão indicados os CDI.
Quando ocorrer instabilidade hemodinâmica e choque cardiogênico, a paciente deverá ser transferida inicialmente para UTI e, se possível, com SMC e em sequência o parto cesárea de urgência; entretanto, em caso eletivo, a via de parto fica por indicação obstétrica, levando em consideração a paridade da mãe, as comorbidades existentes e a gravidade da lesão cardíaca.
No puerpério, deve-se evitar sobrecarga de volume resultante da infusão de fluidos no intraparto e pós-parto. O uso da ocitocina em baixas doses deve ser considerado, a despeito das suas propriedades vasoativas, e a ergonovina deve ser evitada devido ao seu efeito vasoconstritor periférico.

## 5.3.2. Pontos-chaves
Os sintomas e sinais fisiológicos da gravidez podem atrasar o diagnóstico de IC;
O BNP (≤ 100 pg/ml) é um marcador de IC também válido na gravidez;
O BNP seriado na gestação auxilia no diagnóstico de IC e na terapêutica;
Os betabloqueadores são considerados os fármacos de primeira linha e devem ser mantidos durante a gestação em casos de ICFEr;
No planejamento familiar, a gravidez deve ser desaconselhada para mulheres com IC crônica que apresentam FEVE < 40% e contraindicada naquelas em CF III/IV com FEVE < 20%.

## 5.4. Tratamento e Prevenção

## 5.4.1. Endocardite Infecciosa
EI é rara durante a gravidez; ocorre em 0,006% da população geral; porém, em paciente com doença valvar ou cardiopatia congênita, esse percentual chega a 1,2%. , As pacientes portadoras de prótese valvar e cardiopatias complexas cianogênicas, bem como as usuárias de drogas ilícitas, constituem o grupo de maior risco.
Trata-se de uma doença grave com mortalidade materna próxima de 33%, consequente IC e fenômeno tromboembólico. , Durante a gravidez, deve ser dada atenção especial a febre sem causa aparente e à semiologia do coração, uma vez que o aparecimento de sopros cardíacos inocentes ou funcionais é muito frequente durante a gestação normal.
A abordagem da EI demanda uma assistência multidisciplinar em centro terciário de cardiologia, apoiada nas decisões do “heart team” que esteja capacitado a oferecer os recursos disponíveis para diagnóstico, tratamento e seguimento de acordo com as recomendações convencionais. 
A profilaxia da EI durante a gravidez segue as mesmas recomendações utilizadas para pacientes não grávidas. , Promover saúde bucal, orientar sobre a higienização e consulta odontológica periódica na vigilância do aparecimento da gengivite gravídica que favorece a doença periodontal é uma orientação básica na prevenção da EI, uma vez que a porta de entrada para os agentes etiológicos mais frequentes é a cavidade oral.
A antibioticoprofilaxia para tratamento odontológico é controversa; contudo, quando indicada, utiliza-se amoxacilina 2 g por via oral ou clindamicina 600 mg por via oral nos pacientes alérgicos à penicilina, 1 h antes da intervenção.
A antibioticoprofilaxia da EI na ocasião do parto vaginal ou cesárea é também controversa, e a falta de evidências sobre a prevenção da doença pelo uso de antibióticos na ocasião do parto fragiliza tal indicação. Entretanto, deve-se considerar que a ocorrência de EI no pós-parto é grave e as complicações peculiares a esse período, que elevam a bacteremia (extração manual da placenta, curetagem, retenção placentária), não são previsíveis. Vale lembrar que a infecção puerperal no Brasil é uma das principais causas obstétricas de morte materna. Por isso, a decisão de se realizar a antibioticoprofilaxia para a EI na ocasião do parto deve ficar a critério da equipe que atende a parturiente, de acordo com a individualização de cada caso.
Embora, ainda controverso, as situações clínicas de alto risco para a EI que podem exigir a antibioticoprofilaxia de rotina estão apresentadas na , e as recomendações quanto ao modo de aplicação estão na .

 

 

O diagnóstico clínico da EI resume-se a história de febre, calafrio, queda do estado geral, fenômeno embólico, periférico ou central, fenômeno vascular ou imunológico, glomerulonefrite e aparecimento de novo sopro. Quanto aos exames complementares, o doppler-ECO transtorácico deve ser sempre realizado quando houver a suspeita clínica; o transesofágico é indicado quando o transtorácico for negativo para EI e nos casos de prótese valvar. As hemoculturas devem ser coletadas antes da introdução dos antibióticos, mínimo de três amostras, em um intervalo de 30 min, por meio de técnicas estéreis em punção venosa periférica, independente do pico febril; se possível, repetir em 12 horas. O tratamento deve ser iniciado após a coleta das hemoculturas e precisa ser pautado na epidemiologia, na história clínica e no resultado das hemoculturas e do antibiograma, de acordo com as diretrizes convencionais. , 
Vale lembrar que o agente etiológico mais comum da EI no Brasil é o Streptococcus viridans da cavidade oral. A escolha do antibiótico, pela via de administração intravenosa, e o tempo de antibioticoterapia são os mesmos da paciente não grávida, considerando-se os possíveis efeitos tóxicos dos antibióticos sobre o feto. , , , 
Nesse sentido, existem três grupos de antibióticos classificados quanto aos riscos para a gestação: (1) os mais seguros, que compreendem ampicilina, penicilina, amoxacilina, oxacilina, eritromicina, daptomicina e cefalosporinas; (2) aqueles que apresentam risco intermediário e que devem ser monitorados, tais como vancomicina, imipenem, rifampicina e teicoplamina; e (3) os contraindicados, que são aminoglicosídeos, quinolonas e tetraciclina. 
O tratamento cirúrgico nos casos de EI segue as indicações convencionais, tais como falha do tratamento etiológico, IC refratária, fenômeno embólico de repetição, complicações periprótese, abscesso ou deiscência de prótese. Recomenda-se que o parto seja antes da cirurgia cardíaca nos casos de viabilidade fetal. , 

## 5.4.2. Doença Reumática
A febre reumática (FR) é uma doença com resposta autoimune que ocorre após a infecção da orofaringe pelo Streptococcus beta-hemolítico do grupo A, de Lancefield. O primeiro surto reumático acomete crianças na primeira infância e contribui para um contigente importante de mulheres portadoras de doença valvar na idade reprodutiva e, portanto, na gravidez.
A FR aguda é rara durante a gravidez, mas o seu diagnóstico deve ser considerado em gestantes adolescentes sem profilaxia prévia ou que apresentam quadro de IC grave desproporcional a grau de acometimento valvar.
O diagnóstico é orientado utilizando-se critérios clínicos de Jones e exames complementares. Tanto os critérios maiores (cardite, coreia de Sydenhan, artrite migratória, eritema marginatum, nódulos subcutâneos) como os menores (febre, artralgia) são válidos durante a gestação; contudo, reagentes de fase aguda, como a alfaglicoproteína ácida, a proteína C reativa e a eletroforese das proteínas, podem sofrer influência da gravidez. Por isso, o diagnóstico é fortemente baseado na clínica e na história da paciente.
Nesse sentido, vale considerar que a coreia de Sydenhan é uma frequente causa de coreia em pacientes com manifestação prévia e, devem ter seu diagnóstico diferencial com a coreia gravídica, que pode estar associada a outras morbidades que não a FR. Ambas as manifestações de coreia são ligadas a alto risco obstétrico, como perdas fetais, e requerem tratamento diferenciado. 
O mesmo vale dizer sobre a distinção da IC consequente à cardite reumática e da valvopatia crônica: ambas elevam o risco de morte materna e têm tratamentos muito diferentes. 
O tratamento do surto reumático, que é raro durante a gravidez, deve ser igual ao da população em geral. A hospitalização é indicada em todos os casos com suspeita de cardite, artrite incapacitante ou coreia grave, e o repouso domiciliar deve ser por um período mínimo de quatro semanas e, eventualmente, até o parto. 
A profilaxia secundária da FR deve ser mantida durante a gestação de acordo com as seguintes recomendações: penicilina G benzatina 1.200.000 UI por via intramuscular a cada 21 dias ou fenoximetilpenicilina 250 mg por via oral, 2 vezes por dia. Em pacientes alérgicos a penicilina, recomenda-se eritromicina 250 mg via oral, 2 vezes por dia, ou clindamicina 600 mg/dia. O uso de sulfadiazina é contraindicado na gravidez.
A duração da profilaxia independe da ocorrência da gravidez e relaciona-se com os seguintes fatores: FR sem cardite prévia (até 21 anos ou 5 anos após o último surto, valendo o que cobrir o maior período); FR com cardite prévia, valvopatia residual leve ou resolução da lesão valvar (até 25 anos ou 10 anos após o último surto, valendo o que cobrir o maior período); lesão valvar residual moderada a grave (até os 40 anos ou por toda a vida); após cirurgia valvar (até 40 anos ou por toda a vida). Pacientes com risco de faringite de repetição, como aquelas que trabalham em creches e casas de saúde, devem fazer a profilaxia secundária por toda a vida. , 

## 5.4.3. Pontos-chaves e Recomendações
A antibioticoprofilaxia para a EI na ocasião do parto deve ser realizada em pacientes de alto risco para a EI;
A profilaxia da FR deve ser mantida durante a gravidez.

## 5.5. Cirurgia Cardiovascular na Gravidez
A experiência mundial em cirurgia cardíaca durante a gravidez apresenta resultados controversos. Predominam o caráter retrospectivo e a heterogeneidade dos procedimentos, associada às dificuldades na padronização das técnicas cirúrgicas, o que dificulta a análise judiciosa das variáveis de prognóstico e seus reflexos na conduta durante a gravidez. , 
Admite-se que o risco de morte materna pela cirurgia cardíaca não é modificado pela gravidez. No entanto, quando a cirurgia tem caráter de emergência, o risco de mortalidade materna aumenta. Nesse aspecto, verifica-se que o percentual de mortalidade materna de 7,5 a 13,3% foi relativamente elevado quando comparado ao de cirurgia cardíaca na população da mesma faixa etária, e o caráter da cirurgia, ser de emergência, foi a variável preditiva de morte. , , , 
Outro aspecto de importância na indicação da cirurgia cardíaca é a idade gestacional. Presume-se que quanto mais precoce é o aparecimento de complicações em portadoras de lesões graves, maior é a tendência em se indicar a cirurgia precoce, porque a deterioração hemodinâmica é um fato com o progredir da gravidez. Essa linha de pensamento justifica que o melhor período para a programação da cirurgia cardíaca é durante o segundo trimestre da gestação, vez que o feto ainda é inviável e as modificações fisiológicas e mecânicas da gravidez ainda não são tão importantes, além de favorecer um período razoável para a recuperação pós-operatória materna para o parto. , 
A cirurgia durante a gravidez exige cuidados específicos, com destaque para a seleção dos anestésicos, o monitoramento materno-fetal contínuo e o controle adequado da anticoagulação. A equipe obstétrica deve iniciar a monitorização fetal, por meio da cardiotocografia, para controle da dinâmica uterina e do seu batimento cardíaco. A indução anestésica deve ser cuidadosa para evitar períodos de hipóxia e hipotensão, e a escolha dos fármacos, sem efeitos teratogênicos. 
A técnica da cirurgia cardiovascular durante a gravidez não difere das habituais; contudo, a redução do tempo cirúrgico, principalmente o de CEC, além dos cuidados específicos apresentados na , melhoram os resultados finais.

 

Habitualmente, ocorre uma queda da frequência cardíaca fetal Não início da instalação da CEC, retornando à normalidade Não seu término. Esse fato se deve principalmente a mudança para o fluxo contínuo, efeito embólico de microbolhas, hipotensão inicial, hemodiluição, empilhamento de hemácias e alterações na resistência vascular periférica. Tal “disfunção aguda” da placenta consequente ao comprometimento do fluxo uteroplacentário é a razão da alta incidência de perdas fetais, prematuridade, óbito neonatal e malformações. , 
Tem sido recomendado que o parto seja indicado antes da cirurgia cardíaca, se o feto for viável. Vale salientar que o uso de corticoide para maturação pulmonar do feto é muito arriscado para gestantes com quadro hemodinâmico instável e grave, frequente nessa situação. Isso porque o uso do corticoide nas doses preconizadas (duas doses de betametasona, 12 mg intramuscular, 12 h antes do parto) pode levar a agravamento da IC, choque cardiogênico e morte materna.
A prevenção do trabalho de parto prematuro com a progesterona natural (óvulos de 50 mg, a cada 12 h no período do intra e pós-operatório) tem preferência de uso, uma vez que a indometacina pode ocasionar o fechamento do canal arterial, especialmente após 26a semana de gestação. 
A cirurgia cardíaca, ainda que constitua alto risco para a gravidez, deve ser indicada nas condições clínicas sem outras opções terapêutica farmacológica ou percutânea para a sobrevida materna. O procedimento cirúrgico em situação de emergência tem correlação significativa com complicação materna no pós-operatório; por isso, o momento da indicação à cirurgia tem implicação direta nos resultados materno-fetais. , 

## 5.5.1. Pontos-chaves
A cirurgia cardíaca durante a gravidez deve ser indicada nas condições clínicas sem outras opções terapêuticas para a sobrevida materna;
A cirurgia de emergência tem correlação significativa com a complicação materna no pós-operatório;
Cirurgia cardíaca durante a gravidez exige cuidados diferenciados e protocolo hospitalar.

## 5.6. Intervenção Cardíaca Percutânea

## 5.6.1. Princípios Gerais
O uso das intervenções percutâneas durante a gestação tem aumentado gradualmente, impulsionado pela sua maior disponibilidade e pelos riscos impostos pela cirurgia com CEC. Em geral, essas intervenções durante a gestação são consideradas em cardiopatias graves sintomáticas que não podem ser adiadas pelo risco de vida materno. 
A intervenção percutânea quando possível deve ser realizada no início do segundo trimestre porque considera: (1) organogênese quase completa; (2) função tireoidiana fetal não ativa; (3) volume uterino de moderado aumento (distância maior do feto ao tórax materno); (4) facilidade da utilização de dispositivos de barreira para proteção. 
Um método alternativo de proteção ao feto é a utilização do ECO (transtorácico, esofágico ou tridimensional) em substituição à fluoroscopia. Ele possibilita o posicionamento de cateteres e a medida dos diâmetros de orifícios valvares e da posição de saída das coronárias da aorta, além de servir como guia para procedimentos de valvuloplastia por cateter balão, de inserção de próteses valvares incluindo “valve in valve” e de auxílio na liberação de “stents” coronarianos.
A fluoroscopia deve respeitar critérios que incluem o emprego de baixas doses de radiação, o uso de blindagem abdominal e o afastamento da radiação direta na região abdominal. Os procedimentos devem ser os mais curtos possíveis, porque o risco de radiação para o feto deve ser sempre considerado. No entanto, essa preocupação não deve impedir o emprego de procedimentos diagnósticos essenciais, utilizando a melhor modalidade disponível para a situação clínica. 

## 5.6.2. Intervenções Percutâneas Valvares

5.6.2.1. Valvoplastia por Cateter-Balão na Estenose Mitral

A VCB na estenose mitral deve ser realizada, de preferência, no segundo trimestre da gestação e indicada em portadoras de estenose mitral importante, em CF III/IV (NYHA), com resposta insatisfatória ao tratamento clínico convencional. Os resultados da VCB, obedecidas as suas indicações, demonstraram-se superiores aos da cirurgia convencional, com menor mortalidade e melhora clínica em cerca de 80% dos casos. 
Os critérios de indicação da VCB mitral incluem:
Ausência de: (1) insuficiência mitral grave; (2) outra lesão valvar ou coronariana concomitante com indicação de correção; (3) trombo no átrio esquerdo comprovado pelo ECO transesofágico;
Condição anatômica da valva mitral compatível ou seja: (1) certa flexibilidade; (2) calcificação não excessiva; (3) fusão comissural; (4) porção subvalvar passível de abordagem;
Valor do escore ecocardiográfico de Wilkins igual ou inferior a 8, o que permite melhor resultado imediato e tardio. 
É controversa a ampliação dos índices do escore de Wilkins para 10 em função da gravidez, porque o potencial de complicações como insuficiência mitral aguda pode ser plenamente fatal. Em situações muito especiais, a VCB mitral com índice acima de 8 requer discussão prévia com heart team e a disposição de recursos para a eventual necessidade de cirurgia de emergência. 

5.6.2.2. Estenose Aórtica

Pacientes que apresentam estenose aórtica grave com manifestação de IC, angina limitante e síncope durante a gravidez têm indicação de intervenção valvar, e a valvoplastia aórtica por cateter balão (VPAo) pode ser realizada por um operador experiente. Em adolescentes, a VPAo tem bons resultados imediatos e tardios; porém, em pacientes de maior faixa etária, os resultados são piores. Assim, a VPAo pode servir como “ponte” para melhora temporária da condição clínica, tornando possível alcançar a idade gestacional para o parto seguro em condições hemodinâmicas favoráveis. Vale lembrar que o procedimento deve ser realizado com a disponibilidade da cirurgia convencional de resgate, em casos de emergência. Além disso, é essencial que, após a gestação, essas pacientes sejam acompanhadas com exames clínicos e ecocardiográficos periódicos para determinar a eventual necessidade de correção definitiva da valvopatia.

5.6.2.3. Estenose Congênita da Valva Pulmonar

A estenose da valva pulmonar (EP) grave, sintomática, com manifestação de IC, arritmias ou síncope é pouco frequente durante a gravidez. Contudo, nessa situação, a VCB tem sido indicada com sucesso imediato e tardio. 

5.6.2.4. Implante Percutâneo de Próteses Valvares

Nos últimos anos, temos assistido ao desenvolvimento do implante valvar transaórtico (TAVI). Ele tem o grande mérito de evitar a cirurgia cardíaca com CEC, mas requer o uso intensivo de radiação ionizante em dois momentos essências: (1) tomografia da valva aórtica, para o estudo preliminar das estruturas envolvidas (anel aórtico, diâmetro da prótese, altura da emergência das coronárias e sistema arterial torácico e periférico); (2) radioscopia durante o procedimento, para auxiliar no posicionamento dos cateteres e na visualização da expansão da prótese. Assim, o TAVI convencional não é aprovado durante a gestação, em função da alta carga radioativa sobre o feto.
Contudo, a US arterial na avaliação do sistema arterial (ilíacas, aorta, altura das coronárias) em conjunto com o ECO tridimensional (avaliação do anel valvar) trouxe sucesso ao primeiro caso relatado de TAVI durante a gestação, no qual se utilizaram curtos períodos de radioscopia para a fixação da prótese. O fato de as gestantes serem mais jovens, com leito vascular arterial saudável, facilita a navegação dos cateteres; mas por outro lado, o grau de calcificação da valva pode não ser adequado para permitir a fixação da prótese, nesta faixa etária.

5.6.2.5. Procedimento de “Valve in Valve” na Disfunção de Prótese Biológica

A disfunção de PB em mulher jovem é muito frequente e, muitas vezes, requer troca valvar durante a gestação. Nesse cenário, o procedimento do tipo “valve in valve” é promissor para evitar a cirurgia com CEC. As próteses são introduzidas por meio de cateteres, utilizando as seguintes vias: (1) artéria femural ou outros acessos arteriais para a aorta; (2) veia femural seguida da punção transseptal e acesso atrial esquerdo; (3) incisão apical do ventrículo esquerdo (transapical). O relato do caso durante a gravidez descreve o implante transapical de duas próteses, mitral e aórtica, com o auxílio de visão ecocardiográfica transesofágica e uso restrito da fluoroscopia, o que permitiu o alcance do parto vaginal com bom resultado materno-fetal.

5.6.2.6. Angioplastia Coronariana

A intervenção coronária percutânea primária é o tratamento selecionado para a síndrome coronariana aguda durante a gestação, sendo a trombólise menos utilizada. A angioplastia coronária com “stents” convencionais tem sido considerada segura nos casos de doença arterial obstrutiva por doença aterosclerótica.
Enquanto a segurança dos “stents” farmacológicos ainda é desconhecida, a obrigatoriedade da dupla agregação plaquetária por tempo prolongado nesse tipo de stent constitui uma considerável restrição ao seu uso durante a gestação, decorrente dos riscos hemorrágicos. Além disso, o clopidogrel deve ser interrompido sete dias antes do parto, o que acrescenta um risco de trombose do “stent”.
Na dissecção espontânea de coronária, a indicação da angioplastia deve considerar as dificuldades técnicas e a fragilidade vascular peculiar a essa situação, o que eleva o risco de extensão do dano coronariano, além de o sucesso ser considerado subótimo. Por isso, a maioria dos casos de dissecção de coronária se beneficia com o tratamento conservador. , Em situações em que a angioplastia coronária seja indicada, a opção do uso dos “stents” farmacológicos de nova geração que exigem a dupla agregação por menor tempo (3 meses) pode ser uma opção mais segura.
Contudo, o dilema da decisão é a consideração de ambos os riscos obstétricos (hemorragia materna) e cardíacos (trombose dos “stents”) que deve ser julgada “caso a caso” pela equipe multidisciplinar, porque até o momento não existe consenso sobre estas circunstâncias.

## 5.6.3. Pontos-chaves
A intervenção percutânea durante a gestação deve ser indicada em casos de complicações refratárias ao tratamento clínico convencional ou nas condições de risco iminente de vida materna.
A intervenção percutânea deve ser realizada sempre após a discussão com o Heart Team em Serviços terciários de cardiologia.

## 5.7. Emergências Cardiológicas

## 5.7.1. Insuficiência Cardíaca Aguda
A conduta perante a insuficiência cardíaca aguda (ICA) durante a gestação procura a melhora dos sintomas e a prevenção da morte materna). A orientação segue as recomendações de atendimento do paciente em IC na sala de emergência ( ), mas devem ser considerados os riscos quanto ao uso de medicações sobre a mãe, o feto, o trabalho de parto, a aleitamento e os ajustes necessários de acordo com a idade gestacional.

 

Vale ressaltar que além dos sintomas de ICA, a identificação da congestão sistêmica e/ou pulmonar, e de baixo débito, apoiados nos exames subsidiários definem a causa determinante na maioria dos casos. , , 
Exames laboratoriais devem fazer parte da investigação da ICA , e incluem: (1) dosagem de eletrólitos; (2) peptídeo natriurético (BNP); (3) provas de função renal; (4) marcadores de necrose miocárdica; (5) perfil tireoidiano; (6) hemograma completo; (7) marcadores de infecção.
A interação com a equipe obstétrica é obrigatória para a determinação da idade gestacional e dos parâmetros de vitalidade e viabilidade fetal. A eventual indicação de parto terapêutico e a via de parto devem fazer parte do algoritmo no atendimento da ICA na gravidez.
A dispneia aguda durante a gravidez deve ter como diagnóstico diferencial: IAM, CMPP, TEP e miocardite. A orientação para o diagnóstico diferencial pode ser resumida como segue:
IAM dispneia e dor anginosa; idade acima de 35 anos; antecedentes de tabagismo e uso de contracepção com componentes estrogênicos; elevação dos níveis séricos de troponina; ECO com alteração de motilidade segmentar. O diagnóstico definitivo se faz pela cineangiocoronariografia;
Cardiopatia preexistente: a dispneia é mais frequente no segundo e terceiro trimestres. Os níveis séricos de BNP podem estar elevados e o ECO mostra lesão cardíaca estrutural. No Brasil, é comum o edema agudo dos pulmões como primeira manifestação de estenose mitral durante o segundo trimestre da gestação;
CMPP: dispneia nas últimas semanas de gestação, próxima ao parto, ou mais frequentemente após o parto, com importante elevação dos níveis de BNP e disfunção sistólica nova dos ventrículos esquerdo e direito; 
TEP: a dispneia é associada a dor pleurítica. Os níveis de troponina e BNP estão elevados, e a disfunção do ventrículo direito e a HP são sinais de maior de gravidade do evento. Vale ressaltar que a sensibilidade e o valor preditivo negativo do dímero-D na suspeita de edema agudo dos pulmões são limitados; 
Miocardite: dispneia está associada a sintomas inespecíficos relacionados com infecção viral. A troponina pode estar elevada (processo inflamatório miocárdico aumenta sua liberação celular), e o ECO pode demonstrar acinesia segmentar ou hipocinesia difusa. A RMC com identificação de edema miocárdico ou fibrose mesocárdica reforçam o diagnóstico. , 
Durante a avaliação clínica, é primordial a determinação do perfil hemodinâmico. Em pacientes classificadas como perfil B (quentes e congestas), o ajuste da volemia com diuréticos e vasodilatadores, na ausência de hipotensão e choque, deve ser considerado com parcimônia, haja vista a contraindicação formal ao uso de IECA e BRA, dando-se preferência para uso de nitratos e hidralazina, quando possível, em terapêutica combinada.
Os diuréticos de alça são seguros, e o mais utilizado é a furosemida, na dose de 20 a 40 mg iniciais, com possibilidade de otimização a depender do uso crônico prévio, da resposta diurética, da melhora da dispneia e da hipoxemia. Os riscos sobre o feto são consequentes à redução do fluxo placentário frente ao ajuste da volemia além do necessário.
Em pacientes mais graves ou em edema agudo de pulmão, sem hipotensão ou choque, opta-se pelo uso de nitroglicerina ou nitroprussiato de sódio em infusão contínua, guiados preferencialmente por monitoramento arterial invasivo. As doses e a velocidade de infusão estão descritas na . O monitoramento fetal contínuo também deve ser realizado, visto que a redução brusca da pressão arterial materna pode comprometer a vitalidade fetal.

 

Suporte ventilatório não invasivo (VNI) com pressão positiva está indicado para todas a pacientes com saturação arterial periférica < 90%, com esforço ou desconforto respiratórios, que não apresentaram melhora com uso de oxigenoterapia. Também está indicado para pacientes com edema agudo de pulmão, uma vez que são conhecidos os benefícios em não gestantes na redução da necessidade de suporte de ventilação mecânica invasivo. 
Em pacientes com hipotensão sintomática, sinais de baixo débito com disfunção orgânica ou choque cardiogênico, a associação de vasoconstritores, deve seguir indicações à semelhança das pacientes não gestantes. A dobutamina é o agente inotrópico mais usado porque promove aumento do débito cardíaco dose-dependente, embora seu efeito arritmogênico seja limitante e apresente menor eficácia em casos de uso crônico de betabloqueador. A milrinona, além de aumentar o débito cardíaco, é capaz de reduzir a resistência pulmonar e periférica, e, portanto, é indicada em pacientes portadores de CC e hipertensão pulmonar. A levosimendana apresenta efeito inotrópico positivo, contudo, por sua ação de vasodilatação periférica, seu uso deve ser mais criterioso em gestantes. A apresenta os fármacos e as doses recomendadas para o tratamento de ICA durante a gravidez. Em pacientes portadoras de ICA por CMPP, há preferência pela levosimendana, haja vista os efeitos biomoleculares inerentes às catecolaminas. Estudo recente demonstrou efeito benéfico da levosimendana (na dose 0,1 mcg/kg/min) em relação à melhora da função ventricular e da congestão sistêmica em gestantes com ICA devido à CMPP. 

 

A norepinefrina está indicada na ocorrência de hipotensão arterial importante ou choque cardiogênico, porque, além de ter efeito vasoconstritor, modulando a vasoplegia e redistribuindo o fluxo sanguíneo, tem também efeito sobre o débito cardíaco. Em pacientes refratárias, não responsivas às medidas farmacológicas, o sucesso com uso de dispositivos de assistência circulatória mecânica temporária, tais como balão intra-aórtico (BIA) e oxigenação por membrana extracorpórea (ECMO), tem sido descrito. 

## 5.7.2. Arritmia
A principal consideração na prática para arritmias mal toleradas com impacto hemodinâmico é priorizar a vida materna. No entanto, o tratamento também deve ser ponderado em relação aos efeitos colaterais dos medicamentos antiarrítmicos no débito cardíaco e fluxo uteroplacentário, efeitos oxitócicos e efeitos pró-arritmogênicos no feto.
A escolha da medicação antiarrítmica e o ajuste das doses devem ser individualizados a depender da instabilidade hemodinâmica,tipo de arritmia, idade gestacional, presença ou não da doença estrutural materna e do risco de morte súbita cardíaca. 
Dentre as TSV, a taquicardia de reentrada nodal é a mais comum, seguida da taquicardia atrioventricular. Em pacientes estáveis, opta-se pela manobra vagal, seguida do uso de adenosina, em bólus na dose de 6 mg e seguida de 12 mg, se houver persistência da arritmia. Dentre os bloqueadores de canais de cálcio, verapamil é opção segura do ponto de vsita obstétrico e fetal. Diante de instabilidade hemodinâmica, está indicada a cardioversão elétrica sincronizada, sem contraindicação acompanhada pela equipe de anestesia. A indicação de ablação por cateter deve ser considerada em casos refratários à terapêutica farmacológica utilizando o mapeamento eletromecânico.
A ocorrência de fibrilação ou flutter atrial e taquicardia atrial isoladas não são comuns em pacientes sem lesãocardiaca estrutural durante a gestação. Nestas situações com resposta ventricular acelerada, o risco materno e fetal é alto pela deterioração hemodinâmica. Em todas pacientes deve ser investigado causas como infecções, anemia e tireotoxicose. Para o controle da frequência da FA com alta resposta ventricular, opta-se pelo uso de lanatosídeo-C, verapamil ou metoprolol e, na vigência de instabilidade hemodinâmica a cardioversão elétrica sincronizada está indicada. Pacientes com FA e valvopatia têm indicação precisa de anticoagulação. Nos clinicamente mais estáveis, em que se opta por controle do ritmo, a cardioversão elétrica é preferencial à química, haja vista o efeito teratogênico da amiodarona e a pouca evidência de segurança em relação à propafenona em dose alta. Nesses casos, quando o tempo de instalação da arritmia excede 48 horas, é necessária a realização do ECO transesofágico. 
Para paciente com flutter, a preferência é pela cardioversão, uma vez que sua taxa de reversibilidade é alta, respeitando o tempo de surgimento menor de 48 horas ou após a realização de ECO transesofágico para descartar presença de trombo intracavitário.
A TV pode ocorrer em pacientes portadores de doença cardíaca estrutural e disfunção ventricular e a lidocaína é segura e eficaz em pacientes com instabilidade hemodinâmica. O uso da amiodarona deve ser exclusivo em situações isoladas, em que há refratariedade e recorrência da arritmia ventricular após cardioversão elétrica, considerando-se os efeitos dose-dependentes sobre o feto. O implante de CDI em pacientes que apresentam indicação, deve ser realizado durante a gravidez para assegurar o melhor resultado do parto e puerpério. 

## 5.7.3. Infarto Agudo do Miocárdio
O IAM é pouco frequente durante a gravidez, entretanto nas últimas décadas, verificou-se um aumento na sua incidência, decorrente a faixa etária maior das gestantes com maior exposição aos fatores de risco incluindo os contraceptivos hormonais. 
De modo geral, a conduta no tratamento do IAM durante a gestação segue as mesmas orientações para a população geral e em mulheres, incluindo revascularização com angioplastia com “stent” ou revascularização cirúrgica. O atendimento multidisciplinar inclui a avaliação obstétrica e a monitorização fetal, com avaliação da vitalidade fetal e a cardiotocografia.
O tratamento clínico do IAM na gravidez considera: 
Oxigenoterapia: cateter nasal de O2 de 2 a 3 L/min;
Controle da dor: sulfato de morfina, seguro e eficaz, mas pode levar a depressão respiratória no feto se administrado próximo do parto;
Nitratos: atenção quanto ao risco de hipotensão materna e consequente hipofluxo uteroplacentário;
Betabloqueadores: metoprolol, carvedilol ou propranolol. Recomenda-se o monitoramento fetal com cardiotocografia no controle da dinâmica uterina e dos batimentos fetais;
Aspirina: baixas doses (< 150 mg);
O clopidogrel é liberado mas deve ser considerada suspensão de sete dias antes do parto;
Heparinas: HNF e HBPM são empregadas de acordo com a indicação. O fondaparinux somente deve ser usado quando há contraindicação às heparinas.
O tratamento do IAM com supra do segmento ST é a reperfusão coronariana o mais precoce possível, , seja por meio de trombolítico ou, preferencialmente, pela angioplastia coronária primária com “stents”. O trombolítico deve ser restrito aos casos em que a sala de hemodinâmica não esteja disponível em tempo hábil. As restrições ao seu uso se devem ao risco de hemorragia placentária. Se a angioplastia percutânea for indicada, ainda existem controversas sobre a preferência dos “stents” convencionais aos farmacológicos. 
A estratificação de risco para pacientes com síndrome coronariana aguda sem supra de ST é indicada, como acontece em pacientes não gestantes, considerando idade, sinais vitais, fatores de risco, sintomas recentes ou recorrentes, achados eletrocardiográficos e laboratoriais. Em pacientes gestantes de baixo risco, sem sinais de IC, dor refratária ou instabilidade elétrica, o tratamento clínico conservador é indicado. Por sua vez, em gestantes de alto risco, a estratificação invasiva nas primeiras 24 a 48 horas após o início do quadro agudo deve ser priorizada para prosseguir a revascularização miocárdica. 
A dissecção espontânea de artéria coronária é causa frequente entre os casos de IAM na mulher, portanto, deve sempre ser a primeira hipótese diante de um evento isquêmico agudo durante a gestação. O tratamento deve obedecer às medidas recomendadas para pacientes não gestantes. 

## 5.7.4. Síndrome Aórtica Aguda
A síndromes aórticas agudas geralmente ocorrem em portadoras de doenças prévias à gestação, entretanto, pode acometer pacientes saudáveis. Estima-se que a incidência de dissecção de aorta na população seja de 2,4 a 2,9 em 100.000 pacientes/ano, e em mulheres abaixo de 40 anos parece existir uma forte correlação com a gravidez. 
Dor torácica em portadoras de doenças da aorta exige uma investigação com angiotomografia de aorta, de modo a afastar a suspeita de dissecção aguda de aorta. Em pacientes gestantes com dissecção tipo A, com comprometimento da aorta ascendente, há indicação de cirurgia cardíaca de emergência, além do controle pressórico e da frequência cardíaca. O procedimento deve ocorrer em conjunto com a equipe multidisciplinar e o parto cesárea é indicado quando há viabilidade fetal, seguido de correção da dissecção. Na situação de inviabilidade fetal, realiza-se a cirurgia cardiovascular, considerando-se que a prioridade é materna e que o risco de perda fetal é de 20 a 30%. 
Em portadoras de dissecção aórtica tipo B, sem o acometimento da aorta ascendente, não complicada, o tratamento inicial é conservador, mantendo adequado controle da pressão arterial e da frequência cardíaca. O tratamento percutâneo deve ser considerado nas situações tais como; (1) dor persistente; (2) hipertensão arterial não controlada; (3) progressão da dissecção; (4) isquemia em órgão-alvo; (5) sintomas de rotura aórtica. O parto deve ser cesárea após a viabilidade fetal assegurada.

## 5.7.5. Trombose de Prótese Valvar
A incidência de trombose de prótese mecânica durante a gravidez varia de acordo com o esquema de anticoagulação utilizado. O diagnóstico deve ser considerado em gestantes que apresentam dispneia, dor torácica e sintomas de hipotensão. O ECO transesofágico é o exame padrão-ouro na sua definição. 
O tratamento da trombose valvar durante a gravidez ou o puerpério deve ser considerado como indicação de procedimento de emergência que depende da condição clinica,o tamanho do trombo e a posição da prótese acometida. 
O uso de trombolítico deve ser cogitado em pacientes críticos que apresentem grande risco de morte se forem submetidos à cirurgia, em locais onde não há equipe cirúrgica disponível ou no caso de trombose das valvas tricúspide ou pulmonar. As doses recomendadas de trombolíticos são: estreptoquinase, 1.500.000 UI em 60 min sem HNF; ou alteplase (rT-PA), 10 mg em bólus + 90 mg em 90 min com HNF. , Nos casos de sucesso parcial, ou seja, persistência e trombo residual, a paciente deve ser encaminhada à cirurgia após 24 horas da descontinuação da infusão do trombolítico.
Recentemente, foi proposto um protocolo com trombolítico em baixa dose e infusão lenta (rT-PA 25 mg, infusão intravenosa em 6 h, repetindo em 24 h e, se necessário, até 6 vezes, alcançando dose máxima de 150 mg, sem bólus ou uso de heparina concomitante) em gestantes com trombose de prótese. Os resultados mostraram trombólise eficaz, sem mortes maternas e taxa de mortalidade fetal em torno de 20%, que foram melhores do que os das estratégias habitualmente empregadas. Entretanto, com o aprimoramento das técnicas cirúrgicas, não se pode inferir que a trombólise seja melhor que a cirurgia durante a gravidez.
A inconveniência da cirurgia deve-se à alta mortalidade perioperatória (entre 5 e 18%) estreitamente associada à CF (NHYA), principal variável preditora de risco. As pacientes em CF I/III (NHYA) apresentam 4 a 7% de mortalidade, enquanto aquelas em CF IV, 17,5 a 31,3%. No entanto, em comparação com a trombólise, a cirurgia apresenta as maiores taxas de sucesso (81 versus 70,9%). Nesse cenário, a cirurgia de emergência deve ser indicada em pacientes em CFIII/IV (NYHA).
Em pacientes com trombos não obstrutivos, estáveis do ponto de vista hemodinâmico e sem sinais de IC descompensada, opta-se por anticoagulação parenteral em doses terapêuticas, com heparina de acordo com o TTPA e controle de imagem ecocardiográfica. Na falha de resposta ao tratamento, deve ser indicada trombólise ou cirurgia convencional. , 

## 5.7.6. Parada Cardiorrespiratória
As etapas da ressuscitação cardiopulmonar (RCP) em gestantes são muito similares em relação ao protocolo convencional ditado pelo Suporte Avançado de Vida em Cardiologia (ACLS, Advanced Cardiac Life Support), contudo há detalhes resumidos na , que merecem atenção.

 

É importante lembrar que muitos episódios de PCR são precedidos por sinais de instabilidade hemodinâmica. Por estas razoes, a equipe médica de atendimento que devem receber um treinamento para reconhecer e avaliar as condições clinicas, com intuito da execução sincrônica no atendimento de RCP. 
Os efeitos mecânicos do útero gravídico podem agravar a dessaturação e a hipotensão na compressão aortocaval favorecendo o colapso cardiorrespiratório. Na tentativa de reduzir esses efeitos deve ser considerado a manobra manual de tracionamento do útero à esquerda durante todo o atendimento e os cuidados após PCR. 
Quando indicado, a desfibrilação deve ser realizada imediatamente, sem demora ou questionamento. Sabe-se que não faz mal ao feto; é completamente seguro, e as doses de energia estabelecidas pelos protocolos atuais devem ser mantidas. 
Tal qual a indicação de desfibrilação quanto às doses de energia, as medicações e suas doses devem ser as mesmas definidas pelos protocolos utilizados em adultos. , , 
A realização por acessos venosos devem ser acima do diafragma, minimizando então os efeitos mecânicos do útero na compressão aortocaval, o que dificulta a recirculação da medicação. 
Além de considerar as clássicas causas de PCR preconizadas pelo protocolo do ACLS em gestantes, que utiliza uma regra mnemônica com letras de A a H, há diversas outras condições que podem favorecer o colapso cardiorrespiratório e que podem ser corrigidas ( ).

 

A identificação da PCR na gestação, deve considerar a realização do parto cesáreo “perimortem” em gestante com útero acima da cicatriz umbilical. Essa medida se caracteriza por realização de parto cesárea e nascimento do feto após a PCR da mãe, na maioria das vezes durante o período de RCP. Admite-se que o parto cesárea “perimortem” está relacionado à sobrevida materna em 31,7% e sem efeito prejudicial à mãe. 
Um dos propósitos da cesárea “perimortem” é desobstruir a aorta e veia cava dos efeitos compressivos do útero gravídico, quando a sua lateralização é insuficiente para a recirculação materna. O outro propósito é que com o nascimento há redução dos riscos da anóxia fetal durante o período de PCR e, portanto, suas sequelas neurológicas. 
A decisão em realizar o parto cesárea de urgência deve ser tomada até os primeiros quatro minutos após a PCR. O parto deve ser no mesmo local do atendimento da RCP, uma vez que a transferência da paciente pode atrasar o atendimento, aumentando os riscos para o feto e comprometendo as manobras de ressuscitação. Vale ressaltar que todo o protocolo de RCP deve ser mantido enquanto o procedimento é realizado. Em situações em que o quadro materno é considerado irreversível, o parto cesárea “perimortem” deve ser feito imediatamente.

## 5.7.7. Pontos-chaves
Em casos de emergência, a conduta deve considerar prioridade materna;
A conduta de emergência cardíaca durante a gravidez deve obedecer aos protocolos convencionais, como o ACLS;
Considera-se a cesárea “perimortem” em gestante com altura uterina acima da cicatriz umbilical, no intuito de melhor prognóstico materno-fetal.

## 6. Planejamento Familiar

## 6.1. Aconselhamento à Gravidez e Estratificação de Risco Materno
O aconselhamento na preconcepção é essencial para a mulher cardiopata na idade reprodutiva, com ênfase nos riscos materno e fetal relacionados à gestação e na informação sobre a segurança e eficácia da contracepção. Os critérios de avaliação funcional para se permitir ou contraindicar uma gestação incluem anamnese, exame clínico e exames subsidiários, como ECG, radiografia de tórax, ECO transtorácico ou transesofágico, RMC, teste ergoespirométrico e outros mais específicos. A intervenção invasiva para o eventual tratamento de lesões cardíacas, se indicada, deve ser realizada antes da gestação.
Uma vez determinado o diagnóstico da cardiopatia (anatômico, funcional e sindrômico), pondera-se o risco da gravidez junto ao casal ou aos familiares. A identificação de preditivos de risco para gravidez contribui para a determinação do prognóstico materno e a tomada de decisões como consentir ou desaconselhar a concepção.
O estudo prospectivo e multicêntrico conhecido como CARPREG considerou uma casuística constituída por 75% de cardiopatas congênitas e 25% de adquiridas e verificou 13% de complicações cardiovasculares que incluem três mortes maternas. Os preditivos de mortalidade materna propostos nesse estudo estão descritos na .

 

Em sequência, o estudo ZAHARA , definiu preditivos independentes de mortalidade para portadoras de cardiopatia congênita, gerando uma estimativa de risco muito específica. A taxa de eventos em 1.300 mulheres estudadas foi de 7,6%, e as complicações mais frequentes foram arritmia (4,7%) e IC (1,6%) ( ), respectivamente.

 

A OMS classifica as cardiopatias em nível crescente de gravidade em: (1) Risco I, que inclui as cardiopatias de baixo risco (admitido como igual ao da população geral); (2) Risco II, quando há pequeno risco de mortalidade e moderado risco de morbidade; (3) Risco III, quando existe significativo risco de mortalidade ou grave morbidade; (4) Risco IV, quando a cardiopatia associa-se a alto risco de mortalidade materna ( ). 

 

A comparação entre os três estudos, que considerou escore de CARPREG, ZAHARA e OMS, revalidou a classificação pela OMS como a mais aceita e confiável na presunção de risco das cardiopatias à gravidez, apresentada na .
Pacientes incluídas no risco IV-OMS devem ser desaconselhadas à engravidar. O Registry of Pregnancy and Cardiac Disease (ROPAC) validou a classificação da OMS modificada, que inclui uma categoria intermediária (risco II/III-OMS) que significa risco moderado de morbidade e mortalidade. Esse estudo também mostrou diferenças entre países desenvolvidos e emergentes quanto às características das cardiopatias e aos índices de complicações que podem levar a distorções na interpretação do escore de risco. As Diretrizes da ESC sugerem utilização da classificação da OMS modificada para estabelecimento do risco materno.
O Posicionamento da SBC-2020 considera a classificação da OMS como mais aceita e deve ser aplicada para a estratificação do risco das cardiopatias para a gravidez. Vale considerar que fatores complicadores esperados na história natural das cardiopatias tais como arritmias complexas, antecedentes de IC, tromboembolismo ou EI, modificam a pontuação de risco materno. Os recursos de atendimento e distinção da equipe multidisciplinar especializada também devem ser considerados e individualizados no aconselhamento à gestação.
A Diretriz da ESC acrescentou as doenças de aorta associadas a síndrome de Turner (tamanho de aorta indexado de 25 mm/m ); tetralogia de Fallot (diâmetro de aorta > 50 mm), síndrome vascular de Ehlers-Danlos; e circulação de Fontan complicada, no risco IV-OMS.

## 6.1.1. Pontos-chaves e Recomendações
O planejamento familiar é essencial para a portadora de cardiopatia tanto na estratificação de risco à gravidez como na escolha da anticoncepção;
As variáveis preditivas de risco devem ser definidas antes da gestação;
A classificação de risco elaborada pela OMS é, no momento, a mais aceita;
Os recursos de atendimento e a disponibilidade da equipe multidisciplinar especializada devem ser considerados no aconselhamento da gravidez.

## 6.2. Contracepção Não Paciente com Doença Cardiovascular

## 6.2.1. Diferentes Métodos Anticoncepcionais
Contracepção é o uso de métodos e técnicas com a finalidade de impedir que o relacionamento sexual resulte em gravidez. É um recurso de planejamento familiar para a constituição de prole desejada e programada de modo consciente. Atualmente, são conhecidas inúmeras estratégias de anticoncepção, que podem ser agrupadas em métodos hormonais, dispositivos intrauterinos (DIU), comportamentais, de barreira e cirúrgicos.
Os métodos hormonais compreendem aos combinados que são compostos de estrogênio e progestagênio e os de progestagênio isolados. Dentre os combinados, encontram-se as pílulas, os anéis vaginais, os adesivos e os injetáveis mensais e dentre os progestagênio isolados, encontram-se pílulas, os injetáveis trimestrais, o implante subdérmico de etonogestrel e o DIU liberador de levonorgestrel.
A compreensão de que diferentes meios de contracepção apresentam diferentes mecanismos de ação, perfis de eventos adversos, efeitos não contraceptivos benéficos, que variam de acordo com qualquer contexto clínico, é a base para selecionar o método contraceptivo mais adequado; também é indispensável avaliar os desejos e expectativas dos pacientes, além de suas crenças sobre o método, a fim de otimizar a adesão.
Na escolha do métodos considera-se 1) segurança, apoiada nos critérios de elegibilidade dos métodos existentes e disponíveis ; 2) condição clinica da paciente; e, 3) eficácia, baseada no índice de Pearl (número de gestações que ocorrem em cada 100 mulheres utilizando o método ao longo de 12 mesesl ( ).

 

Pacientes incluídas no risco III/IV-OMS devem receber orientação para um método contraceptivo seguro, com baixo índice falha e boa aceitação. Vale lembrar, que estas pacientes têm maior risco cirúrgico, motivo pelo qual os métodos irreversíveis (laqueadura tubária laparotômica, laparoscópica ou histeroscópica) não devem ser recomendados, visto que há outras alternativas de alta eficácia.
Nos últimos anos, um enfoque especial tem sido dado aos métodos de contracepção reversível de longa ação (LARC, “long acting reversible contraception”), em razão de: (1) maior adesão porque não dependem da lembrança da usuária; (2) maior eficácia contraceptiva, com menor número de falhas, (3) não conter estrogênio. Essa categoria inclui os dois tipos de DIU (cobre e levonorgestrel) e o implante subdérmico de etonogestrel. , 

## 6.2.2. Critérios de Elegibilidade Médica
A OMS analisou a segurança dos diferentes métodos contraceptivos levando em consideração cada condição clínica e suas características relevantes, incluindo: se o método piora a condição preexistente ou se cria um risco adicional à saúde; e se a condição faz o método contraceptivo menos efetivo. A segurança deve ser sempre ponderada em comparação com o risco de uma gravidez não planejada. É imprescindível lembrar que, ao recusarmos o acesso das pacientes a todos os métodos contraceptivos por receios relacionados às doenças que possuam, aumenta-se o risco de descompensação dessas doenças caso ocorra uma gravidez.
A evidencia um resumo das categorias dos critérios de elegibilidade médica para a escolha contraceptiva.

 

O acompanhamento de portadora de cardiopatia em idade fértil exige decisões sobre a aplicação de métodos de planejamento familiar e, portanto, orientação sobre contracepção. O estudo pioneiro sobre a eficácia e segurança de contraceptivos que incluiu o combinado oral de baixa dose, o progestágeno injetável trimestral e o DIU em pacientes cardiopatas mostrou boa tolerância e segurança em pacientes que obedeceram aos critérios de elegilibidade. 

## 6.2.3. Contracepção em Diferentes Condições

6.2.3.1. Hipertensão

Em pacientes hipertensas, o uso de métodos contraceptivos combinados pode piorar o controle pressórico. O etinilestradiol aumenta a síntese hepática do angiotensinogênio, o que leva a um aumento de angiotensina II e aldosterona, com maior volume sistólico e maior débito cardíaco, além de aumento da resistência vascular periférica, resultando em maior pressão arterial. Em pacientes suscetíveis, esse aumento pode ser considerável, causando a descompensação clínica. Por esse motivo, pacientes com hipertensão, mesmo que controlada, não devem usar métodos combinados; no entanto, não há contraindicação ao uso de métodos contendo somente progestagênio em pacientes com hipertensão controlada e, naquelas não controladas, apenas o injetável trimestral deveria ser evitado. A evidencia os critérios médicos de elegibilidade dos diferentes tipos de anticoncepção em relação a pacientes com HAS.

 

6.2.3.2. Diabetes Melito

A paciente diabética tem maior risco de eventos cardiovasculares quando comparada com a mulher saudável e está mais exposta a desfechos desfavoráveis durante a gravidez. Por esse motivo, a contracepção em pacientes diabéticas deve ser orientada pelas melhores evidências disponíveis. A resume os critérios de elegibilidade dos diferentes métodos contraceptivos em pacientes diabéticas.

 

Há uma preocupação teórica de que, por seu efeito glicocorticoide, o acetato de medroxiprogesterona de depósito (injetável trimestral) possa contribuir para a piora do controle glicêmico e, nas pacientes com vasculopatia, possa aumentar o risco de eventos tromboembólicos e cardiovasculares, motivo pelo qual é descrito como categoria 3.

6.2.3.3. Doença Valvar

As cardiopatias valvares complicadas são classificadas pela OMS como risco III/IV par a gravidez não programada. , Apesar disso, vários estudos têm mostrado taxas expressivamente baixas de uso de métodos contraceptivos por pacientes cardiopatas. , Para entender os critérios resumidos na , dividem-se as valvopatias em complicadas e não complicadas. São consideradas complicadas aquelas que são acompanhadas de HP, risco de FA e história de endocardite bacteriana subaguda. A evidencia os critérios médicos de elegibilidade dos diferentes tipos de anticoncepção em relação a pacientes com doença cardíaca valvar.

 

Até o momento, a indicação de antibioticoprofilaxia no momento da inserção do DIU é controversa, e as evidências disponíveis não parecem justificar obrigatoriedade. A decisão quanto a utilizar ou não fica a cargo do médico assistente, considerando riscos e benefícios associados. No entanto, é imprescindível lembrar que a melhor maneira de evitar infecção pélvica é realizando antissepsia adequadamente.

6.2.3.4. Evento Cardiovascular Prévio

Mulheres com coronariopatia isquêmica ou acidente vascular cerebral podem iniciar contracepção contendo somente progestagênio com segurança, com exceção do injetável trimestral; no entanto, se elas apresentarem o evento após a introdução do método contraceptivo hormonal, este deverá ser desaconselhado, e a contracepção não hormonal deverá ser discutida com a paciente. Nesse contexto clínico, os métodos combinados devem ser evitados. , A evidencia os critérios médicos de elegibilidade dos diferentes métodos anticoncepcionais em relação a pacientes com eventos cardiovasculares prévios.

 

6.2.3.5. Obesidade

Na ausência de outras condições clínicas, as pacientes obesas não apresentam contraindicação ao uso de nenhum método. Além disso, mesmo que se imponha a investigação de síndrome metabólica e o rastreio de outras condições cardiovasculares pela obesidade, o resultado de exames complementares não deve postergar a introdução de método contraceptivo. 
No que diz respeito ao injetável trimestral (dose de 150 mg de acetato de medroxiprogesterona de depósito intramuscular), há casuística brasileira evidenciando ganho de peso significativamente maior em usuárias do injetável trimestral em comparação com as do DIU de cobre. Por esse motivo, o injetável trimestral não costuma ser nossa primeira escolha; no entanto, não é uma contraindicação formal, e o método pode ser usado.
Especificamente nas obesas, existe uma preocupação teórica de que os métodos possam ser menos eficazes. Ainda que o sejam, sua eficácia continua alta, motivo pelo qual eles não devem ser desaconselhados.

6.2.3.6. Cardiopatia Congênita

A orientação à contracepção em portadoras de CC inicia na menarca, com orientação quanto aos riscos da gestação e à seleção do método de contracepção. As CC não são listadas explicitamente nos critérios de elegibilidade da OMS e devem ser entendidas dentro da fisiopatologia que predomina em cada grupo de cardiopatia e do risco da gravidez não planejada ( ). As CC complexas apresentam lesões estruturais diversas que dificultam a estratificação do risco aos contraceptivos. , De todo modo, as cardiopatias cianogênicas, as que apresentam HAP, a síndrome de Eisenmenger e aquelas com risco elevado de tromboembolismo constituem contraindicação absoluta ao uso de métodos combinados. Para esses grupos de pacientes riscoIII/IV-OMS, recomenda-se o uso de progestágenos isolados. Em casos de menor risco de tromboembolismo o injetável mensal pode ser considerado. - Em pacientes selecionadas a inserção do DIU deve ser hospitalar pelo risco da dor, efeito vagal e arritmias cardíacas, com possibilidade de socorro rápido por anestesiologista com experiência em pacientes cardiopatas.

 

6.2.3.7. Hipertensão Pulmonar

Esta condição, risco IV-OMS, não está incluída nos critérios de elegilibidade porque a experiência na literatura é muito limitada e está na categoria de contra-indicação à gestação. A contracepção deve ser eficaz, com baixo índice de falha, com boa tolerância para melhor adesão e continuidade do método. Por isso, os métodos de barreira ou com base na “percepção de fertilidade” não são recomendados porque o índice de falha é muito elevado. Dentre os contraceptivos hormonais reversíveis, os compostos que contenham estrogênio não são recomendados devido ao risco de TEP, restando os progestágenos isolados na forma injetável, via oral ou implante subcutâneo, que são os mais indicados. , Os DIU-T de cobre têm risco de metrorragia, enquanto os tratados com levonorgestrel (LARC) podem ser recomendados quando a paciente não apresenta lesão cardíaca estrutural.
A gravidez não planejada é muito frequente em mulheres cardiopatas, especialmente pela falta de orientação adequada e o apropriado aconselhamento da contracepção. Na verdade, mitos sobre riscos e o desconhecimento sobre a eficácia e a aplicação dos critérios de elegibilidade são fatores que favorecem a gravidez não programada e a morte materna por cardiopatia na gravidez. 

## 6.2.4. Contracepção na Adolescência
A idade isoladamente não representa contraindicação aos diferentes métodos de contracepção, contudo, na adolescência, podem surgir dúvidas quanto à estratégia de apresentação e prescrição dos contraceptivos. A indicação dos métodos deve se apoiar nos critérios de elegibilidade e o atendimento da adolescente deve considerar aspectos ético-legais envolvidos, por vezes desconhecidos.
A Constituição Brasileira, no artigo 226, garante o direito ao planejamento familiar livre de coerção e o Estatuto da Criança e do Adolescente (Lei Nº 8069 de 13 de julho de 1990) dispõe claramente sobre questões importantes no atendimento de adolescentes que requerem métodos contraceptivos, fundamentados nos direitos de privacidade e confidencialidade.
A adolescente tem direito a privacidade, ou seja, de ser atendida sozinha, em espaço privado de consulta. Por sua vez, confidencialidade é definida como um acordo entre médico e paciente, em que as informações discutidas durante e depois da consulta não podem ser informadas a seus pais e ou responsáveis sem a permissão expressa do adolescente. 
A confidencialidade apoia-se em regras da bioética médica, através de princípios morais de autonomia (artigo 103 do Código de Ética Médica). Dessa forma, a adolescente tem direito à educação sexual, ao acesso à informação sobre contracepção, à confidencialidade e ao sigilo sobre sua atividade sexual e sobre a prescrição de métodos anticoncepcionais, não havendo infração ética ao profissional que assim procede.
A orientação contraceptiva envolvendo métodos de curta duração, como pílulas, geralmente é realizada sem problemas, seguindo esses preceitos. Por outro lado, os métodos de longa ação (métodos intrauterinos e implantes), por necessitarem de procedimento médico para a inserção, podem suscitar dúvidas. A FEBRASGO sugere que, para esses métodos, deve-se considerar o consentimento da adolescente e do responsável, reforçando o aconselhamento contraceptivo. 
No que diz respeito à adolescente portadora de cardiopatia, a anticoncepção deve ser segura e eficaz, no entanto, há uma grande barreira ao conhecimento de diferentes opções e a seu acesso, muitas vezes pelo alto custo inicial. Quando se orienta a contracepção para adolescente com risco III/IV-OMS para a gravidez, há necessidade de apresentar todos os métodos disponíveis que tenham índices baixos de Pearl, boa tolerância e aceitação para continuidade do método, tais como os DIU e implantes. Contudo, as formas mais populares de contracepção em adolescentes são preservativos e o coito interrompido, o que representa um alto índice de falha.
A falta de conhecimento, aconselhamento inadequado, tabus socioculturais, restrições legais e atitudes moralistas quanto a sexualidade na adolescência são comuns, mesmo entre as pacientes que escolhem ou desejam um método contraceptivo. Embora os métodos de longa ação (DIU e implante) sejam priorizados por entidades médicas, as dificuldades no acesso e na aceitabilidade pela adolescente mostram que métodos tradicionais, como os contraceptivos orais combinados e preservativos, devem também ser foco da orientação, visando melhora das taxas de continuidade e, em última análise, redução da possibilidade de gestações de alto risco e da mortalidade materna por cardiopatia.

6.2.4.1. Pontos-chaves

Existem inúmeros métodos de anticoncepção (hormonais, dispositivos intrauterinos, cirúrgicos comportamentais, de barreira) que podem ser prescritos para a mulher cardiopata;
A escolha do método de anticoncepção deve considerar a individualidade da paciente (desejo, tolerância), nos critérios de elegilibilidade propostos pela OMS e no índice de falha de Pearl;
Aspectos éticos e legais devem ser considerados na anticoncepção da adolescente.

## 6.3. Aspectos Bioéticos
O progresso da medicina tornou o provérbio de Michel Peter ultrapassado: “Mulher cardiopata, não case; e, se casar, não engravide.” Essa era a verdade há dois séculos para a preservação da vida da mulher jovem portadora de cardiopatia. Atualmente, vivencia-se uma nova era, em que os riscos da gestação, são em geral menores, com recursos para enfrentar a maior parte das eventuais complicações.
A doença cardíaca e gravidez deve ser um tema abrangente, embasado na ética médica, integrando várias fases durante as quais se estabelece a interface multidisciplinar, no atendimento da gestante e do seu recém-nascido. Os médicos devem aplicar rigor científico, com base em recomendações clínicas validadas, esclarecem os benefícios e eventuais riscos e respeitam o direito do paciente de participar livre e ativamente no processo de tomada de decisão, obtendo consentimento informado para todas as situações.
Desde momentos antes da concepção, ocorrem situações que requerem reflexões sobre a segurança materna para a gestação. A avaliação cardiológica pode revelar graus distintos de riscos materno-fetais devido a situações patológicas, clínicas e terapêuticas. As tomadas de decisões resultam em eventuais conflitos na relação médico-paciente, que exigem a referida combinação de aplicação de fundamentos da bioética. A prudência deve predominar, ou seja, a visão do futuro e a previsão da evolução que possam merecer condutas em prol dos benefícios e, no caminho dessa decisão, o consentimento da paciente, irmanado ao seu direito de responder sim ou não.
Além disso, a formação da equipe multidisciplinar é fundamental no que diz respeito ao aconselhamento reprodutivo, com base na estratificação do risco materno, considerando-se o Artigo 226 da Constituição da República Federativa do Brasil de 1988, que determina: “Fundado nos princípios da dignidade da pessoa humana e da paternidade responsável, o planejamento familiar é livre decisão do casal, competindo ao Estado propiciar recursos educacionais e científicos para o exercício desse direito, vedada qualquer forma coercitiva por parte de instituições oficiais ou privadas” (grifos nossos). Essa norma remete a outros itens: a) dignidade da pessoa humana (artigo 1º, III) e b) direito de liberdade (artigo 5°, caput).”
No decorrer da gestação, a relação médico-paciente exige total acolhimento pelo médico e aderência pela paciente, obviamente com adequada disponibilidade de recursos institucionais e do sistema de saúde.
A interdisciplinaridade é desejável em todos os momentos do ciclo gravídico-puerperal; porém, ela amplia seu valor na aproximação do parto, quando é imprescindível a competência profissional da equipe de atendimento. A seleção do momento e tipo de parto, a busca por apoio tecnológico e de infraestrutura em geral são bem auxiliadas pela aplicação da combinação dos fundamentos da bioética.
O puerpério tem peculiaridades específicas sendo que a mãe portadora de cardiopatia demanda um nível de atendimento superior ao habitual, enquanto o recém-nascido já tem vida própria, com suas exigências particulares. Assim, ocorrendo conflitos, como, por exemplo, o não consentimento para a realização de uma recomendação médica, cabe ao médico – ou ao Serviço – fazer uma reavaliação crítica, fundamentada na Bioética à Beira do Leito, para o caso específico. O acordo feito com a paciente deverá ser rigorosamente cumprido pelo médico.

Este posicionamento deverá ser citado como: Avila WS, Alexandre ERG, Castro ML, Lucena AJG, Marques-Santo C, Freire CMV, et. al. Posicionamento da Sociedade Brasileira de Cardiologia para Gravidez e Planejamento Familiar na Mulher Portadora de Cardiopatia – 2020. Arq Bras Cardiol. 2020 Arq Bras Cardiol. 2020; 114(5):849-942.
Nota: estes posicionamentos se prestam a informar e não a substituir o julgamento clínico do médico que, em última análise, deve determinar o tratamento apropriado para seus pacientes.
 StatementBrazilian Cardiology Society Statement for Management of Pregnancy and Family Planning in Women with Heart Disease – 2020
https://orcid.org/0000-0001-5686-7058AvilaWalkiria Samuel AlexandreElizabeth Regina Giunco CastroMarildes Luiza de LucenaAlexandre Jorge Gomes de Marques-SantosCeli FreireClaudia Maria Vilas RossiEduardo Giusti CampanharoFelipe Favorette RiveraIvan Romero CostaMaria Elizabeth Navegantes Caetano RiveraMaria Alayde Mendonça CarvalhoRegina Coeli Marques de AbzaidAlexandre MoronAntonio Fernandes RamosAuristela Isabel de Oliveira AlbuquerqueCarlos Japhet da Mata FeioClaudine Maia Alves BornDaniel SilvaFábio Bruno da NaniFernando Souza TarasoutchiFlavio CostaJosé de RibamarJunior MeloJosé Xavier deFilho KatzLeila AlmeidaMaria Cristina Costa GrinbergMax AmorimMelania Maria Ramos de MeloNilson Roberto de MedeirosOrlando Otávio de PomerantzeffPablo Maria Alberto BragaSérgio Luiz Navarro CristinoSonia Conde MartinezTania Leme da Rocha LealTatiana de Carvalho Andreuci Torres 
1
Brasil
Instituto do Coração (Incor) do Hospital das Clínicas da Faculdade de Medicina da Universidade de São Paulo (HC-FMUSP), São Paulo, SP – Brasil

2
Brasil
Hospital do Coração (HCor), São Paulo, SP – Brasil

3
Brasil
Hospital das Clínicas da Faculdade de Medicina da Universidade Federal de Minas gerais (UFMG), Belo Horizonte, MG – Brasil

4
Brasil
Hospital Agamenom Magalhães, Recife, PE – Brasil

5
Brasil
Universidade Tiradentes, Aracaju, SE – Brasil

6
Brasil
Hospital São Lucas, Rede D'Or Aracaju, Aracaju, SE – Brasil

7
Brasil
Universidade Federal de Minas Gerais (UFMG), Belo Horizonte, MG – Brasil

8
Brasil
Universidade Federal de São Paulo (UNIFESP), Escola Paulista de Medicina (EPM), São Paulo, SP – Brasil

9
Brasil
Hospital Israelita Albert Einstein, São Paulo, SP – Brasil

10
Brasil
Universidade Federal de Alagoas, Maceió, AL – Brasil

11
Brasil
Cardio Diagnóstico, Belém, PA – Brasil

12
Brasil
Centro Universitário Metropolitano da Amazônia (UNIFAMAZ), Belém, PA – Brasil

13
Brasil
Centro Universitário do Estado Pará (CESUPA), Belém, PA – Brasil

14
Brasil
Secretaria de Saúde do Estado do Ceará, Fortaleza, CE – Brasil

15
Brasil
Instituto Dante Pazzanese de Cardiologia, São Paulo, SP – Brasil

16
Brasil
Hospital Metropolitano Oeste Pelópitas Silveira, Recife, PE – Brasil

17
Brasil
Instituto de Medicina Integral Professor Fernando Figueira (IMIP), Recife, PE – Brasil

18
Brasil
Hospital Barão de Lucena, Recife, PE – Brasil

19
Brasil
Hospital EMCOR, Recife, PE – Brasil

20
Brasil
Diagnósticos do Coração LTDA, Recife, PE – Brasil

21
Brasil
Universidade Federal do Pará, Belém, PA – Brasil

22
Brasil
UDI Hospital, Rede D'Or, São Luís, MA – Brasil

23
Brasil
Centro Universitário de Belo Horizonte, Belo Horizonte, MG – Brasil

24
Brasil
Departamento de Obstetrícia e Ginecologia da Faculdade de Medicina da Universidade de São Paulo (USP), São Paulo, SP – Brasil

25
Brasil
Ministério da Saúde, Brasília, DF – Brasil

26
Brasil
Universidade de São Paulo (USP), São Paulo, SP – Brasil
 Correspondence: Sociedade Brasileira de Cardiologia – Av. Marechal Câmara, 360/330 – Centro – Rio de Janeiro – Postal Code: 20020-907. E-mail: diretrizes@cardiol.br Colaboradores: Alexandre Abzaid, Antonio Fernandes Moron, Auristela Isabel de Oliveira Ramos, Carlos Japhet da Mata Albuquerque, Claudine Maia Alves Feio, Daniel Born, Fábio Bruno da Silva, Fernando Souza Nani, Flavio Tarasoutchi, José de Ribamar Costa Junior, José Xavier de Melo Filho, Leila Katz, Maria Cristina Costa Almeida, Max Grinberg, Melania Maria Ramos de Amorim, Nilson Roberto de Melo, Orlando Otávio de Medeiros, Pablo Maria Alberto Pomerantzeff, Sérgio Luiz Navarro Braga, Sonia Conde Cristino, Tania Leme da Rocha Martinez, Tatiana de Carvalho Andreuci Torres Leal
Development: Department of Women's Cardiology of the Brazilian Society of Cardiology
Norms and Guidelines Council: Brivaldo Markman Filho, Antonio Carlos Sobral Sousa, Aurora Felice Castro Issa, Bruno Ramos Nascimento, Harry Correa Filho, Marcelo Luiz Campos Vieira
Norms and Guidelines Coordinator: Brivaldo Markman Filho
Coordenadoras do Posicionamento: Walkiria Samuel Avila, Elizabeth Regina Giunco Alexandre, Marildes Luiza de Castro
Comitê de Redação: Alexandre Jorge Gomes de Lucena, Celi Marques-Santos, Claudia Maria Vilas Freire, Eduardo Giusti Rossi, Elizabeth Regina Giunco Alexandre, Felipe Favorette Campanharo, Ivan Romero Rivera, Maria Elizabeth Navegantes Caetano Costa, Maria Alayde Mendonça Rivera, Marildes Luiza de Castro, Regina Coeli Marques de Carvalho, Walkiria Samuel Avila

 

Content
1. Introduction 853
2. General Considerations 854
2.1. Physiological Adaptation to Pregnancy, Labor and Delivery 854

2.1.1. Hemodynamic Modifications 854

2.1.2 Modifications in Blood Coagulation 856

2.1.3. Respiratory Changes 856

2.1.4. Structural Vascular Changes 857

2.1.5. Key Points 857

2.2. Maternal and Fetal Assessment 858

2.2.1. Maternal Clinical Evaluation 858

2.2.1.1. Anamnesis and Physical Examination 858

2.2.1.2. Key Points 858

2.2.2. Fetal and Obstetric Evaluation 858

2.2.2.1. Key Points 860

2.3. Complementary Cardiovascular Assessment 860

2.3.1. Electrocardiography 860

2.3.2. Echocardiography 860

2.3.3. Ambulatory Blood Pressure Monitoring 861

2.3.4. 24-hour Holter Monitoring 861

2.3.5. Exercise Test 861

2.3.6. Key Points 862

2.4. Ionizing Imaging Cardiovascular Assessment 862

2.4.1. Administration of Contrast Agents 863

2.4.2. Nuclear Magnetic Resonance 863

2.4.3. Key Points 864

2.5. Cardiovascular Drugs during Pregnancy and Breastfeeding 864

2.5.1. Antihypertensive Drugs 864

2.5.2. Antiarrhythmic Drugs 866

2.5.3. Drugs in Heart Failure 866

2.5.4. Antiplatelet 866

2.5.5. Thrombolytics 867

2.5.6. Anticoagulants 867

2.5.7. Hypolipidemic Agents 868

2.5.8. Key Points 869

2.6. Practice Recommendations during Pregnancy 869

2.6.1. Lifestyle 869

2.6.2. Physical Activity 870

2.6.3. Diet 870

2.6.4. Professional Activity 870

2.6.5. Key Points 870

2.7. Management of Delivery and Postpartum Period 871

2.7.1. Practice during Delivery 871

2.7.2. Practice during the Postpartum Period 872

2.7.3. Key Points 872

2.8. Obstetrical Anesthesia 873

2.8.1. Fasting 874

2.8.2. Anticoagulation and Neuraxial Block 874

2.8.3. Unfractionated Heparin (Subcutaneous) 874

2.8.4. Low Molecular Weight Heparin (Subcutaneous) 874

2.8.5. Hemodynamic Monitoring 874

2.8.6. Intrapartum Uterotonic Drugs 874

2.8.7. Postpartum 875

2.8.8. Key Points 875

3. Assessment and Management of Specific Heart Diseases 875
3.1. Valvular heart disease 875

3.1.1. General Considerations for Treatment 875

3.1.2. Key Points 876

3.1.3. Valve Prosthesis 876

3.1.4. Maternal Risk 877

3.1.5. Fetal Risks 878

3.1.6. Key Points 879

3.2. Congenital Heart Disease 880

3.2.1. Pregnancy Management 881

3.2.2. Key Points 883

3.3. Cardiomyopathies 883

3.3.1. Dilated Cardiomyopathy 883

3.3.2. Hypertrophic Cardiomyopathy 883

3.3.3. Arrhythmogenic Right Ventricular Dysplasia 884

3.3.4. Non-compaction Cardiomyopathy 884

3.3.5. Restrictive Cardiomyopathy 884

3.3.6. Key Points 884

3.3.7. Peripartum Cardiomyopathy 884

3.3.7.1. Key Points 886

3.4. Ischemic Heart Disease 887

3.4.1. Key Points 888

3.5. Dyslipidemia 888

3.5.1. Lipid Changes 888

3.5.2. Key Points 888

3.6. Other Diseases 889

3.6.1. Takayasu Arteritis 889

3.6.1.1. Prevalence 889

3.6.1.2. Prognosis 889

3.6.1.3. Treatment 889

3.6.1.4. Key Points 889

3.6.2. Kawasaki Disease 889

3.6.2.1. Preconception Evaluation 890

3.6.2.2. Key Points 890

3.6.3. Pulmonary Hypertension 890

3.6.3.1. Key Points 891

3.6.4. Aortic Diseases 891

3.6.4.1. Aortic Dissection and Rupture 892

3.6.4.2. Key Points 893

3.6.5. Chagas Disease 893

3.6.5.1. Prevalence 893

3.6.5.2. Diagnosis and Management of T. cruzi Infection during pregnancy 893

3.6.5.3. Chronic Chagas Heart Disease 893

3.6.5.4. Vertical Transmission of Trypanosoma cruzi 893

3.6.5.5. Reactivation of Chagas Disease 893

3.6.5.6. Breastfeeding 894

3.6.5.7. Key Points 894

4. Hypertensive syndrome of pregnancy 895
4.1. Introduction 895
4.2. Recommendations for Measuring Arterial Pressure 895
4.3. Classification 895

4.3.1. Chronic Hypertension, Preexisting (Essential or Secondary) 895

4.3.2. Preeclampsia/Eclampsia 895

4.3.2.1 HELLP Syndrome (Hemolysis, Elevated Liver Enzymes, and Low Platelet Count) 866

4.3.3. Chronic (Preexisting) Hypertension with Superimposed Preeclampsia 896

4.3.4. Gestational Hypertension 896

4.3.4.1. Key Points 896

4.4. Treatment of Gestational Hypertension Syndrome (GHS) 897

4.4.1. Non-pharmacological Treatment 897

4.4.2. When to Treat – Target Arterial Pressure 897

4.4.3. Oral Anti-hypertensive Drugs- Chronic Hypertension /Gestational Hypertension 897

4.4.4 Anti-hypertensive Drugs for Severe Hypertension in Preeclampsia 898

4.5. Practice for Hypertensive Emergency in Preeclampsia (PA ≥ 160/110 mmHg) 899
4.6. Prevention of Seizure in Preeclampsia-Eclampsia and Magnesium SulfateTherapy 900

4.6.1. Key Points 900

4.7. Prognosis and Prevention of Preeclampsia 900

4.7.1. Key Points 901

4.8. Hypertension during Postpartum Period 901

4.8.1. Recomendations 901

4.8.2. Key Points 902

4.9. Hypertension during gestational and Future Cardiovascular Risk 902

4.9.1. Key points 902

5. Treatment and Prevention of Cardiac Complications 902
5.1. Cardiac Arrhythmias 902

5.1.1. Epidemiology 902

5.1.2. Clinical Presentation 903

5.1.3. Maternal-fetal Risks 903

5.1.4. Treatment 903

5.1.5. Key Points 904

5.2. Thromboembolism 904

5.2.1. Epidemiology 904

5.2.2. Risk Factors 905

5.2.3. Thrombophilia 905

5.2.4. Diagnosis 906

5.2.4.1. Deep Vein Thrombosis 906

5.2.4.2. D-dimer 907

5.2.4.3. Venous Ultrasound 907

5.2.4.4. Iliac Vein Magnetic Resonance 907

5.2.4.5. Pulmonary Thromboembolism 907

5.2.4.6. Differential Diagnosis 908

5.2.5. Treatment 909

5.2.5.1. General Approach 909

5.2.5.2. Heparin Use 909

5.2.5.2.1. Recommended Doses 909

5.2.5.2.2. Labor and Delivery 909

5.2.5.2.3. The Postpartum Period 910

5.2.5.2.4. Period of Anticoagulation 910

5.2.5.3. Inferior Vena Cava Filters 910

5.2.5.4. Thrombolysis 910

5.2.6. Prophylaxis 910

5.2.7. Key Points 910

5.3. Therapy and Prevention 910

5.3.1. Heart Failure 910

5.3.2 Key Points 913

5.4. Therapy and Prevention 913

5.4.1 Infective endocarditis 913

5.4.2. Rheumatic Disease 914

5.4.3. Key Points 915

5.5. Cardiovascular Surgery During Pregnancy 915

5.5.1. Key Points 916

5.6. Percutaneous Cardiac Intervention 916

5.6.1. General Principles 916

5.6.2. Percutaneous Valve Interventions 916

5.6.2.1. Balloon Catheter Valvuloplasty in Mitral Stenosis 916

5.6.2.2. Aortic Stenosis 916

5.6.2.3. Congenital Pulmonary Valve Stenosis 916

5.6.2.4. Percutaneous Implantation of Prosthetic Valve 916

5.6.2.5. Valve-in-Valve Procedure for Bioprosthetic Valve Dysfunction 917

5.6.2.6. Coronary Angioplasty 917

5.6.3. Key Points 917

5.7. Cardiovascular Emergencies 917

5.7.1. Acute Heart Failure 917

5.7.2. Arrhythmia 919

5.7.3. Acute Myocardial Infarction 920

5.7.4. Acute Aortic Syndrome 920

5.7.5. Prosthetic Valve Thrombosis 920

5.7.6. Cardiorespiratory Arrest 921

5.7.7. Key Points 921

6. Family Planning 921
6.1. Pregnancy Counseling and Maternal Risk Stratification 921

6.1.1. Key Points 923

6.2. Contraception in Patients with Cardiovascular Disease 923

6.2.1. Different Contraceptive Methods 923

6.2.2. Medical Eligibility Criteria 924

6.2.3. Contraception in Adverse Conditions 925

6.2.3.1. Hypertension 925

6.2.3.2. Diabetes Melittus 925

6.2.3.3. Heart Valve Disease 925

6.2.3.4. Previous Cardiovascular Events 925

6.2.3.5. Obesity 926

6.2.3.6. Congenital Heart Disease 926

6.2.3.7. Pulmonary Hypertension 927

6.2.4. Contraception and Adolescence 928

6.2.4.1. Key Points 929

6.3. Ethical Considerations 929
References 930

## 1. Introduction
The Women’s Cardiology Department (DCM, acronym in Portuguese) presents this document, composed in accordance with the norms established by the Brazilian Cardiology Society (SBC, acronym in Portuguese), with the aim of discussing the most prevalent cardiovascular diseases that affect women during the pregnancy and for which substantial evidence or randomized clinical trials do not exist.
In 1999, with the support of the SBC, what was at that time the Department of Heart Disease and Pregnancy published the First Consensus on Heart Disease and Pregnancy, which was groundbreaking worldwide. It drew attention to the evolution of gestation in women with heart disease, at a time when the prevailing maxim was “Women with heart disease should not get pregnant because maternal mortality is prohibitive.” After 10 years had passed, the experience of the department that has gone on to become the DCM made it necessary to reconsider the restrictions on pregnancy in women with heart disease. For this reason, in 2009, SBC Guidelines for Pregnancy in Women with Heart Disease published the therapeutic strategies available at that time, in a specific and adequate management of clinical situations.
Two decades after the first publication, the DCM validates its dedication by publishing the First Statement for Management of Pregnancy and Family Planning in Women with Heart Disease, which is the result of the experience and work of specialists who write protocols that contribute to therapeutic decisions during the gestational period, as well as counseling for pregnancy and contraception for women with heart disease.
A country’s maternal mortality rate is one of the most sensitive indicators of its population’s living conditions, and it especially reflects the quality of healthcare provided to women during prenatal care. Although the rates continue to be higher than what was estimated for this millennium, over the past three decades Brazil has registered an important reduction in the rate of maternal mortality due to complications during the pregnancy and postpartum time.
Occurring in 4% of gestations, heart disease in itself continues to be the main non-obstetric cause of maternal mortality worldwide. Nonetheless, cardiology’s advancements in improving diagnostic methods and therapeutic alternatives have promoted significant change in prognosis of cardiovascular diseases and in the characteristics of heart diseases that occur during reproductive age. This has made better life expectancy and quality of life possible for women with heart disease, thus encouraging maternity and promoting safer pregnancies with lower risks.
Medicine is increasingly individualizing the approach to diverse diseases, especially in relation to gender, given that the female organism differs greatly from the male one, especially during the pregnancy-postpartum cycle.
The updating of this document fulfills the universal responsibility regarding improving maternal-fetal prognosis. It is, thus, undeniable that the DCM’s accumulated experience contributes to the establishment of protocols that guide therapeutic practice during pregnancy, to the counseling of future pregnancies, to improvements in life expectancy with quality, and to the reduction in maternal mortality due to heart disease.
In consonance with the international literature, this document discusses new concepts of heart disease versus pregnancy, including the following: maternal risk stratification based on the recommendations of the World Health Organization (WHO); aspects of arterial hypertension; reinforcing interdisciplinary approaches, with the participation of a heart team; therapeutic proposals for complications; changes in the classification of maternal-fetal risks with respect to drugs used during pregnancy and breastfeeding; and contraception.
The objectives of this publication are to standardize routine and to divulge yet another tool that will be useful in daily clinical practice. The DCM hopes that the recommendations included in this document will have positive impact throughout Brazil and that they will contribute to better treatment and consequent reduction of cardiovascular risks in childbearing women with heart disease.

## 2. General Considerations

## 2.1. Physiological Adaptation to Pregnancy, Labor and Delivery
Interaction between the embryo and the maternal uterus provokes intrinsic hormonal stimulation in the organism and alterations in the physiology of the cardiovascular system, which are fundamental to the adequate development of pregnancy. These changes, however, lead to a hemodynamic overload that may reveal previously unrecognized heart diseases or aggravate the functional state of underlying heart diseases. For this reason, it is fundamental to comprehend the hemodynamic, blood coagulation, and respiratory modifications that occur during the pregnancy, labor and delivery in order to understand the maternal clinical condition, to predict risks of gestation, and to evaluate fetal health.

## 2.1.1. Hemodynamic Modifications ( )

 

Cardiac output, which is calculated by the product of systolic volume and heart rate, progressively increases, on average, 40% higher than preconception values, beginning of the first trimester of gestation, reaching the greatest increasing in onset of third trimester and tending to reduce at the term of pregnancy ( ). The magnitude of the increase in cardiac output varies individually, and it is 15% greater in multiple pregnancies. Plasma volume is principal responsible for the increase in cardiac output during the first half of gestation. From that moment onwards, heart rate, which does not usually exceed 100 beats per minute (bpm), plays an important role in this increase until the term of pregnancy.

 

The disproportion between increased plasma volume and the production of red blood cells results in haemoglobin dilution or physiological anemia of pregnancy. This is most evident during the end of the second trimester, when plasma volume reaches its peak in relation to the volume of blood cells. When the renal function is normal, blood volume and others elements return to preconception values on account of diuresis, eight weeks after delivery, while hemoglobin begins to increase on the third postpartum day. , 
At the term of pregnancy, blood volume is estimated at 100 ml/kg, almost two times higher than the value of 65 to 70 ml/kg found in women who are not pregnant. Erythrocyte mass begins to increase between the eighth and tenth week of pregnancy, induced by the elevation of plasma erythropoietin.
The hormonal mechanisms of the hypervolemia during pregnancy include increasing levels of estrogen and progesterone, which increases renin levels, causing retention of sodium and total body water; prolactin; placental lactogen; prostaglandins; and the growth hormone.
After the second half of pregnancy, variations may be observed in resting cardiac output consequential to the position adopted by pregnant women. The change from dorsal decubitus to left lateral, for instance, produces an approximately 22% increase in cardiac output, an approximately 6% reduction in heart rate, and a 27% increase in systolic volume. Compression of the inferior vena cava by the enlarged uterus in the supine position provokes what is known as supine hypotensive syndrome, which may manifest with dizziness and/or syncope. 
During pregnancy, a reduction occurs in plasma colloid osmotic pressure in approximately 12% to 18% of cases, as a consequence of the drop in circulating albumin concentrations, which are observed in lower levels during week 24 of pregnancy. This decline prompts edema in lower limbs, and it predisposes pregnant and parturient women who have received excessive intravenous crystalloid infusion to pulmonary congestion. 
The decrease in peripheral vascular resistance during the beginning of pregnancy is not limited to the uterine plexus, and it has a greater magnitude than the concomitant elevation in cardiac output. During the second half of pregnancy, resistance reaches its lowest values, at the moment when cardiac output reaches its maximum values ( ). Arteriolar dilation during pregnancy has been attributed to estrogenic components, prolactin, and increased levels of circulating prostaglandin (PGE2 and PGI2), a substance that is responsible for reducing vascular response to exogenous angiotensin.
A decrease in prostaglandin synthesis or an increase in its metabolism may result in increased vascular responsiveness to angiotensin II, a characteristic that has been observed in pregnant women who develop hypertension. Progesterone and its metabolites also appear to participate in modulation of vascular response to angiotensin II during pregnancy. It has recently been demonstrated that alterations in vascular tone during pregnancy may be partly attributed to changes in the synthesis of endothelium-derived vasoactive substances, especially endothelin, which is theoretically capable of mediating prostaglandin synthesis, and to the reduction in nitric oxide, which has been related to vasodilation during pregnancy. 
It is worth emphasizing that, during pregnancy, the arterial system undergoes remodeling in order to accommodate increased blood volume. Estrogen promotes collagen deposition in the middle layer of the large and medium arteries; circulating elastase favors rupture of the elastic lamina and weakening of the middle layer of vessel walls; and relaxin, an insulin-like growth factor hormone (detected in the plasma), causes a reduction in collagen synthesis. All of these factors explain the predisposition to artery dissection during pregnancy.
Systemic arterial pressure (SAP) decreases from the beginning to the middle of pregnancy, particularly at the expense of diastolic pressure, and it subsequently rises to pre-gestation values as the term approaches ( ). SAP rises during uterine contractions, especially during the second stage of delivery.

 

A clinical picture of orthostatic hypotension may occasionally occur, secondary to reduced venous return when a pregnant woman is in the supine position, with a consequent drop in cardiac output. Considering pulmonary output equal to aortic output in normal adults, changes in pulmonary vascular resistance are parallel to those in systemic vascular resistance. Recent studies have challenged this “dogma,” showing a tendency toward increased arterial pressure in women with body mass index (BMI) > 25 kg/m and women who were obese prior to gestation. 
Normal labor is associated with significant hemodynamic alterations, due to anxiety, exertion, pain, uterine contractions, maternal posture (left lateral versus supine), uterine involution, and bleeding. During labor, blood from the uterine sinusoids is released into systemic circulation with each contraction, increasing the preload by about 500 ml of blood, which leads to increased cardiac output and blood pressure. Thus, during the second stage of labor, cardiac output is around 50% higher in relation to pre-delivery, and, during fetal expulsion, it is 60% to 80% higher than pre-gestational levels. This abrupt change in cardiac output is transient. It remains elevated during the immediate postpartum period, and it is not accompanied by variations in arterial pressure. During normal delivery, around 400 ml of blood are lost. In cesarean section, blood loss may be greater, namely, around 800 ml. After the delivery, a sudden increase occurs in venous return, due to “auto transfusion” of the uterine plexus, decompression in the flow of the inferior vena cava, and reduction in venous system capacity. In addition to this, peripheral vascular resistance is increased by sustained contraction of the uterus, occluding the vessels that open on the maternal placenta surface. The continuous “auto transfusion” that occurs during 24 to 72 hours after delivery represents a high risk of pulmonary congestion in women with heart disease. 
Cardiovascular effects during delivery are also influenced by the eventual occurrence of infection, hemorrhage, and use of anesthetics drugs. 
In general, the patterns of alteration in maternal blood volume during labor, the expulsion period, and the postpartum period are described by the following phases:
Blood concentration during labor, varying with the degree of uterine activity and maternal dehydration;
Reduced blood volume during and immediately after delivery, proportional to blood lose volume;
Immediate, transient elevation in blood volume following placental clearance, attributed to fluid inflow into the intravascular territory, due to uterine emptying;
Slight elevation in blood volume between the second and third days after delivey, secondary to the transient increase in aldosterone secretion;
Reduced plasma volume one week after delivery, in a manner that maternal systolic volume may present a slight drop during this period, returning to normal within a short term.

## 2.1.2 Modifications in Blood Coagulation
During pregnancy, activation occurs in the synthesis of coagulation factors II, VII, VIII, IX, and X and fibrinogen, as well as a reduction of endogenous anticoagulants (especially antithrombin and protein S), all of which are determinants of the state of hypercoagulability, which is characteristic of a healthy pregnancy. These modifications occur progressively after the first trimester of gestation, with shortening of prothrombin, partial thromboplastin, and thrombin times, favoring the weakening of the anticoagulant function. Considering these mechanisms, in conjunction with the mechanical compression of the venous plexus on the lower limbs by the gravid uterus, the characteristic predisposition to thromboembolism during pregnancy is justified. ( ).

 

## 2.1.3. Respiratory Changes ( )

 

Oxygen consumption increases by around 50%, especially during the last 2 trimesters of gestation, and this is not proportional to maternal weight gain. Weight gain during gestation includes not only fetal metabolic activity, but also the weight of amniotic fluid and the increase of fluid in maternal tissues, both of which are considered metabolically inert. During labor, oxygen consumption increases by 250 to 750 ml/min with each contraction. 
The normal respiratory tract undergoes modifications during pregnancy, which induce respiratory alkalosis, with higher arterial oxygen partial pressure (PaO2) and lower arterial carbon dioxide partial pressure (PaCO2), in comparison with the non-pregnant state. Lower PaCO2 favors a diffusion gradient that facilitates the fetus’ ability to eliminate products of aerobic metabolism. 
Increased minute ventilation is accompanied by an increase in tidal volume, without modifying respiratory rate. Maternal hyperventilation is considered to be a protective mechanism for the fetus against the detrimental effects of excessive tissue CO2 concentration, at the same time that PaO2 increases to 100 mmHg.
Modifications in the chest occur with uterine enlargement and diaphragm elevation. Thoracic circumference increases by around 5 to 7 cm; the substernal angle widens, and vertical diameter decreases. These modifications are accompanied by alterations in the distribution of air throughout the diverse pulmonary compartments.
Histological examination of the upper respiratory tract mucosa during pregnancy reveals: hyperemia, glandular hyperactivity, increased phagocytic activity, and increased mucopolysaccharide content. Nasal congestion and epistaxis, which are frequent during gestation, are possibly caused by these changes. Airway and respiratory function is preserved during pregnancy, as reflected by an unchanged forced expiratory volume in one second (FEV1) and an unchanged ratio of FEV1 to forced vital capacity (FVC). 
The 25% reduction in lung functional residual capacity (FRC) is associated with a similar increase in inspiratory capacity (IC). Consequently, vital capacity (VC) does not show any modifications during pregnancy.
The decrease in FRC to 300 ml during pregnancy is not accompanied by increased airway resistance, which, on the contrary, undergoes a significant reduction, possibly due to relaxation of smooth muscle tone secondary to hormonal action. This reduction serves to decrease work of breathing.
With hyperventilation, an increase in PaO2 occurs, and the hemoglobin dissociation curve shifts to the right. Normal blood gases in pregnant women should have a pH between 7.40 and 7.47, PaCO2 between 30 and 32, and a slight increase in PaO2. Respiratory alkalosis is partially offset by increased renal excretion of bicarbonate, which maintains serum levels of HCO3 between 18 and 21 mEq/L (a baseline deficit of 3 to 4 mEq/L). The decrease in pulmonary FRC and the increase in oxygen consumption reduce the maternal oxygen reserve, which, in the event of respiratory failure, represents a state of alert for adopting early measures of respiratory or ventilatory support, in order to avoid harm to the fetus or the mother. 
The mechanism behind dyspnea during normal pregnancy is not completely clear. Hyperventilation induced by progesterone is probably at least partially responsible, perhaps due to the elevation of ventilation above the level necessary to meet the increased metabolic demand.

## 2.1.4. Structural Vascular Changes
Hormonal changes during pregnancy may alter the structure of the vascular, resulting in weakening of the arterial walls. Estrogen influences abnormal collagen deposition inside the middle layer of the large and medium arteries. Circulating elastase may provoke a rupture of the elastic lamina and weakening of the middle layer of vessel walls. In addition to this, relaxin, an insulin-like growth factor hormone (detected in the plasma), causes a redction in the synthesis of collagen and predisposes pregnant women to artery dissection. 

## 2.1.5. Key Points
Knowledge regarding physiological modifications related to the pregnancy and postpartum period is fundamental to clinical practice for management of pregnancy and risk stratification of women with heart disease.

## 2.2. Maternal and Fetal Assessment

## 2.2.1. Maternal Clinical Evaluation

2.2.1.1. Anamnesis and Physical Examination

Initial clinical investigation of pregnant women with heart disease requires questions about family history with respect to genetically transmittable heart diseases. Family history of the following stand out: premature sudden death, cardiomyopathy, congenital heart disease, Marfan syndrome, long QT syndrome, catecholaminergic ventricular tachycardia (VT), and Brugada syndrome.
Physiological modifications during pregnancy influence the evaluation of cardiovascular status, and specialized knowledge is required to differentiate between healthy and unhealthy patients ( ).

 

Complaints of shortness of breath (hyperventilation), easy fatigue, decreased functional exercise capacity, and basal crackles that disappear with coughing or deep breathing are symptoms that arise with uterine growth and its mechanical effect on diaphragm compression, especially toward the end of gestation. In addition to this, peripheral edema and varicose veins are frequent during later stages of gestation. Systemic arterial pulse is characterized by a rapid increase and a rapid collapse (“small battering ram”) starting with the first trimester.
During chest palpation, cardiac ictus is noted to be shifted to the left, anterior, and rotated in the direction of a transverse position to the extent that the uterus enlarges. As a result, the apical impulse is shifted to the fourth intercostal space, laterally to the hemiclavicular line. The left ventricular impulse is relatively hyperdynamic, but it is not sustained; the right ventricle may be palpable, because, like the left ventricle, it supports a greater volume of blood, which is ejected against relatively low resistance. As pregnancy advances, enlargement of the breasts and the abdomen makes precise heart palpation difficult and at times impossible. 
The changes in auscultation that accompany normal gestation begin at the end of the first trimester and generally subside within one week of delivery. Higher basal heart rate, higher precordial heart sounds, split first and second sounds in the third trimester, and systolic ejection murmurs (as high as grade 2/6) above the pulmonary and tricuspid areas are regularly detected during cardiac auscultation. The third sound may be present in the majority of pregnant women; the fourth heart sound is rarely heard, and it is, in general, pathological. Venous hum is almost universal in healthy women during normal gestation, and it is most audible over the right sternal border. The hum is attributable to an increase in venous return. Breast murmur (systolic or continuous) is audible over the anterior thorax at the end of gestation, and it is peculiar to pregnancy due to increased mammary blood flow. It is especially common after childbirth in breastfeeding women. 
Diastolic murmurs are not common in normal gestations. When they occur, they may reflect an increase in flow through the tricuspid or mitral valve or physiological dilatation of the pulmonary artery. Alternatively, these murmurs may represent a pathological condition, requiring investigation with further examinations. 
The hyperdynamic state of pregnancy may manifest with episodes of tachycardia, and baseline resting heart rate may oscillate around 90 bpm. Bradycardias are rare; when they occur, more detailed investigation is necessary. Sinus rhythm should be prevalent among pregnant women, but the presence of supraventricular or ventricular extrasystoles is very common.
When measuring pregnant women’s blood pressure, the fourth Korotkoff sound is accepted as diagnosis of diastolic pressure. After this point, the sounds begin to change, and it is not easily reproducible at times. For this reason, it is fundamental to measure arterial pressure in the left lateral decubitus position using a standardized method. Arterial hypotension is a common finding during the first trimester, continuing until week 22 to 24, with arterial pressure returning to pre-pregnancy levels near the term of pregnancy.

2.2.1.2. Key Points

Detailed anamnesis considering current and past symptoms;
Family history;
Detailed physical examination to differentiate between normal and heart disease.

## 2.2.2. Fetal and Obstetric Evaluation
Obstetrical and perinatal complications are significantly greater in women with heart disease – the leading cause of maternal death during the pregnancy-postpartum cycle. The lack of healthcare protocols for pregnant women with heart disease and fragile multidisciplinary interaction contribute to these poor outcomes in pregnancy. Within this scenario, it is necessary to develop healthcare protocols aligned with prevention and treatment of complications during pregnancy, delivery, and the postpartum period, for pregnant women with cardiac disease. The Heart Disease and Pregnancy Service of the Obstetrics Department of Universidaddse Federal de São Paulo, in this document, have proposed a protocol presented in .

 

The care plan includes the following: preparation and readiness for delivery at a reference hospital; routine compliance on the part of anticoagulated patients and patients in premature labor; prevention of postpartum hemorrhage (PPH); and infective endocarditis (IE) prophylaxis.
The principal maternal factors that affect fetal growth and development are low cardiac output (heart failure [HF] and obstructive cardiac lesions), hypoxemia (pulmonary hypertension [PH] or cyanotic heart disease), medication use (anicoagulants, beta-blockers, diuretics, or antiarrhythmics), heredity (genetic transmission), maternal infections (by Trypanosoma cruzi [T. cruzi]), and obstetric complications ( ).

 

Fetal consequences include greater frequency of prematurity, intrauterine growth restriction (IUGR), miscarriages, cardiac and non-cardiac anomalies, and death. Maternal clinical complications associated with low cardiac output lead to a greater frequency of low birth weight –, with an average weight 300 g lower when compared to pregnancies that progressed without complications – and Apgar score less than 7. 
Maternal hypoxemia in women with cyanotic heart disease increases fetal risk, even though there is a compensation mechanism to facilitate fetal oxygen delivery. Most newborns with maternal hypoxemia are small for gestational age and premature. A higher frequency of miscarriages has also been observed, proportional to the elevated hematocrit and maternal hemoglobin levels.
Anticoagulant use during pregnancy causes expressed fetal loss. It is estimated that the incidence of spontaneous abortion during the first trimester is 28.6% versus 9.2% in pregnant women using warfarin versus heparin, respectively. Sodium warfarin, when used during the first trimester, causes fetal warfarin syndrome in 5% to 10% of cases. This occurs between the sixth and ninth week of gestation ( ). The incidence is variable, as, in many cases, the syndrome may not be identified from the clinical point of view; according to geneticists’ evaluation, however, the frequency is much higher. The risk of warfarin syndrome, when compared to the general population, is OR 3.86 (1.86-8.00- IC 95%). For these reasons, these children should receive detailed genetic evaluation during early childhood, and their scholar development should be followed.

 

Newborns whose mothers have used amiodarone, sotalol, angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitors (ACEI), angiotensin receptor blockers (ARB), or other medications during gestation should receive specific assessment of these drug-related abnormalities during the neonatal period. For patients who have been previously operated or who have undergone previous blood transfusion, it is essential to investigate hepatitis B and human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infections, given that the use of drugs for these conditions may decrease vertical transmission.
The frequency of fetal evaluation should be decided by the obstetrician according to case severity and the parameters to be evaluated. Severe patients, including those with New York Heart Association (NYHA) functional class (FC) III/IV, severe obstructive valve disease, cyanotic heart disease, complex congenital heart disease, and PH, may require fetal reassessment by ultrasound, as often as weekly. Fetal Doppler of uterine arteries during the second trimester aims to predict preeclampsia. This includes evaluation of the umbilical, middle cerebral, and uterine arteries, the cerebroplacental ratio, and the ductus venosus ( ).

 

During fetal ultrasound evaluation, it is important to estimate gestational age, vitality, morphology, amniotic fluid volume, and fetal growth profile. In the event that an abnormality is detected, evaluation should be complemented by more specific examinations, such as fetal Doppler, fetal biophysical profile, and fetal echocardiography (echo). The latter should be performed routinely, always after week 20, when there are maternal or fetal indications. Maternal indications are diabetes mellitus, a parent with congenital heart disease, maternal infection related to teratogenicity (rubella, cytomegalovirus, HIV), Chagas disease and toxoplasmosis (related to cardiomyopathy or fetal myocarditis), maternal age > 35 years, phenylketonuria, connective tissue disease (most associated with fetal atrioventricular block), and exposure to teratogenic agents. Fetal indications for complementary evaluation include findings of other abnormalities on morphological study, chromosomal disease, and fetal arrhythmias.

2.2.2.1. Key Points

Perinatal morbimortality is higher in newborns whose mothers have heart disease, in comparison with the general population;
Multiple maternal factors are associated with the higher incidence of fetal loss, malformations, IUGR, and prematurity;
Obstetricians and neonatologists must be attentive to neonatal complications related to maternal heart disease.

## 2.3. Complementary Cardiovascular Assessment

## 2.3.1. Electrocardiography
Electrocardiography (ECG) is the first method used for diagnostic confirmation in clinical cardiology practice. The criteria for performing ECG in pregnant women are the same as those defined for the general population; it should not, however, be part of routine prenatal screening for heart disease. ECG should serve as evaluation and follow up for pregnant women with previous heart disease and for investigation of arrhythmias. 
Physiological changes during gestation should be considered in the interpretation of the ECG record. The following stand out: electrical axis slightly shifted to the left; T-wave inversion in the DIII, V1, V2, and, at times, V3 leads; prominent q wave in the inferior and anterolateral walls; increased P-wave duration and prolonged QT interval. Measurements of P-wave duration and QT interval during the 3 trimesters of pregnancy have shown prolongation of the P wave during the second trimester, followed by a plateau, as well as prolongation of the maximum QT interval at the term of the gestation. 
ST-segment depression may be observed in 25% to 47% of pregnant women during cesarean delivery or 30 minutes afterwards, regardless of the type of anesthesia utilized. No alterations suggestive of ischemia have been observed during vaginal birth in healthy pregnant women. , 

## 2.3.2. Echocardiography
Echo is the examination of choice for diagnostic investigation of most heart diseases, owing to its easy use, the absence of maternal-fetal risks, and lower costs when compared to other methods. Indications are the same as those for the general population, for initial diagnosis when heart disease is suspected, for risk stratification by measurement of ejection fraction or global longitudinal strain, and for determining clinical therapeutic practice or percutaneous or surgical intervention in cases with important stenoses in mitral and aortic valves.
Pregnancy hypervolemia may cause slight dilatation of the cardiac chambers (up to 20% in the right chambers and 10% to 12% in the left chambers), mild mitral and tricuspid valve reflux, appearance of minimal physiological transvalvular gradients, and increase in prior valve gradients, as in obstructive lesions of the heart. 
Transesophageal echo is relatively safe, and its conventional indications continue to apply; the risk of vomiting and aspiration mainly increases after week 20 of gestation. This requires the presence of an anesthetist, who will assist in selecting the most appropriate sedation, in controlling ventilation, and in fetal monitoring during the procedure.
During the final periods of gestation, small pericardial effusions may be perceived as a consequence of excessive hydrosaline retention, which disappears during the postpartum period. These effusions are not pathologically significant, and they are usually asymptomatic; they do, however, require reevaluation 6 weeks after delivery.
Fetal echo may be used to detect congenital heart disease, and it may be performed transvaginal beginning with week 12 of gestation and transabdominally beginning with week 18. Although the main indication for fetal echo is the presence of an alteration in the routine ultrasound examination, some maternal indications are important, including pre-gestational diabetes mellitus or diabetes identified during the first trimester of gestation, phenylketonuria, systemic lupus erythematosus (SLE), and Sjögren syndrome with positive anti-SSA and/or anti-SSB antibodies. In these cases, both the presence of fetal complete atrioventricular block during a previous gestation and neonatal SLE increase the possibility of fetal involvement during a subsequent gestation, or, at times, alteration in fetal cardiac rhythm determines better maternal evaluation for investigating autoantibodies.
Other indications are cases of assisted reproduction, maternal congenital heart disease, infections such as rubella during the first trimester of gestation, or other viruses, when there is a suspicion of associated fetal myocarditis or pericarditis. Less precise indications refer to maternal medication use during the first trimester of gestation, such as anticonvulsive drugs, lithium, ACEI, retinoic acid, vitamin A, paroxetine, and non-hormonal anti-inflammatory drugs, due to risks of both fetal malformation and ductal constriction. 

## 2.3.3. Ambulatory Blood Pressure Monitoring
Ambulatory blood pressure monitoring (ABPM) is considered a safe examination. It is mainly indicated for identification of early arterial hypertension, which occurs during the first 20 weeks of gestation. It is estimated that approximately one third of pregnant women present white coat hypertension, almost half of whom may develop true arterial hypertension which requires treatment. 
Blood pressure monitoring during different trimesters has shown conflicting results regarding pressure behavior, and it has little utility for identifying pregnant women who develop late hypertension or even for predicting adverse events in hypertensive patients. Reference values are the same as those used for the general population, and there are no studies which recommend routine use of ABPM for diagnosing or monitoring blood pressure as a substitute for conventional measurement with a tensiometer. 

## 2.3.4. 24-hour Holter Monitoring
Holter monitoring is mainly used for detecting or stratifying arrhythmias during gestation. It is mainly indicated for investigation of palpitation, unexplained syncope, or pre-syncope, or, less frequently, investigation of neurological events in whose etiology atrial fibrillation (AF) may be implicated. 
Holter monitoring is an examination method for identifying and characterizing arrhythmias as simple or complex and symptomatic or asymptomatic, which is fundamental information for practice during pregnancy. It is particularly indicated for investigating paroxysmal AF, other tachyarrhythmias, symptomatic sinus bradyarrhythmias, and different degrees of atrioventricular block. Holter is also of great value for evaluation of patients with a pacemaker or an implantable cardioverter-defibrillator (ICD) when symptoms such as palpitation, syncope, or pre-syncope occur, or when there is suspicion of device command failure.

## 2.3.5. Exercise Test
The main indication for ergometric test during gestation would be investigation of ischemic coronary disease. Performance of a submaximal test, reaching 80% of maximum expected heart rate, seems to be a safe method during gestation, but the lack of studies does not make it possible to validate its indication for defining ischemic disease. For this reason, there are no recommendations for performing exercise tes during gestation to investigate ischemic coronary disease. In the same manner, the use of stress with dobutamine should be contraindicated during pregnancy.
In contrast, during preconception, abnormal chronotropic response identified on ergometric test in women with heart disease seems to be predictive of adverse events during future pregnancies. In the same line of investigation, ergospirometry test is valid for evaluation of myocardial reserve, especially in women with congenital heart disease. 

## 2.3.6. Key Points
ECG and echo should be indicated when heart disease is suspected;
Fetal echo is indicated for congenital heart disease or when fetal involvement is assumed due to maternal disease;
24-hour Holter monitor assists in identification and stratification of cardiac arrhythmias;
The main indication for ABPM is identification of “early” arterial hypertension, which occurs during the first 20 of gestation;
Exercice testing is not indicated for investigation of ischemic coronary disease during gestation;
Ergospirometry testing assess to risk stratification for women with heart disease when planning gestation.

## 2.4. Ionizing Imaging Cardiovascular Assessment
The use of ionizing imaging diagnosis in adult with heart disease corresponds to 12% of all examinations to which these patients are exposed and to 40% of the total dose of radiation which they will receive during their lifetime. For this reason, they are a cause of concern regarding the safety of examinations that emit radiation during pregnancy and lactation.
Measurements of ionizing radiation may be in sieverts (Sv), which express the equivalent dose of radiation in the tissue, or in gray (Gy), which indicate total radiation dose. Sv is the measure of greatest biological significance. 
There are two biological effects of radiation, namely, the deterministic effect, which leads to cell death when the maximum recommended dose of radiation is exceeded and which becomes evident after a few days, weeks, or months of the procedure (cataract, leukopenia, anemia, sterility, and others); and the stochastic effect, which causes cellular transformation with random alteration in single-cell DNA (deoxyribonucleic acid) that continues to reproduce. When the damage occurs in germ cells, genetic or hereditary effects may occur. There is no dose threshold, and damage may be caused by a minimal radiation dose. Moreover, the effects are difficult to measure experimentally due to the long latency period. The main examples include cancer (leukemia from 5 to 7 years, solid tumors from 5 to 10 years or more) and genetic effects. It has been verified that stochastic effects are highest in children and higher in women than in men, and they are reduced by 50% among octogenarian men. 
During pregnancy, the biological effects of radiation on the embryo depend on dose and gestational age, and they may be divided into the following 4 categories: intrauterine death, malformations, growth and developmental disorders, and mutagenic and carcinogenic effects. , 
It is accepted that the non-carcinogenic risk, which includes miscarriage and malformations, is insignificant at doses below 50 mGy, in comparison with other risks of pregnancy. In contrast, it is estimated that doses above 100 mGy present potential effects on the fetus/embryo in accordance with gestational age, such as fetal death when exposure occurs between the first and second week of gestation; severe abnormalities in the central nervous system (hydrocephalus, microcephaly, and mental retardation) between weeks 3 and 15; mental retardation, microcephaly, and fetal growth restriction between weeks 16 and 30; following week 32 of gestation, teratogenic effects are absent, but there continues to be an increased risk of developing malignancy during childhood and adulthood. Indication for interrupting gestation may be considered in cases of radiation doses between 100 and 500 mGy, based on individual circumstances, such as maternal malignant diseases that require serial imaging during gestation, interventional procedures, or radiation therapy. 
Accordingly, it is important to remember that the natural incidence of congenital anomalies in the general population generally varies between 0.5% and 5%, and exposure to a radiation dose of 10 mGy is associated with 0.5%, 0.4%, and 0.1% probabilities of malformations, microcephaly, and mental retardation, respectively. In this line of investigation, studies have demonstrated that uterine exposure to even low radiation doses (20 mGy) increases the risk of cancer during childhood and the occurrence of leukemia, by a factor of 1.5 to 2.0, when compared to the natural incidence of these diseases. The main radiological methods and the doses of radiation absorbed by the fetus, the patient, and the breasts (during lactation) are shown in .

 

It is necessary to remember that no single radiological examination exposes the fetus to doses above 250 mGy, which could occur as a result of a combination of examinations or during the course of a treatment that is essential to the mother.
When they do not directly involve the uterus or direct abdominal exposure, fluoroscopy, radiography, cardiac catheterization, and interventional radiology result in radiation doses that are not very significant to the fetus. Accordingly, it is necessary to consider strategies that may reduce radiation, at times by around 30% to 65%. The following stand out: use of lead protectors on the abdomen, X-ray beam collimation in the area of interest, use of permanently calibrated and measured equipment, preference for digital radiography, and reduction of fluoroscopy time and number of images acquired. Furthermore, enlargements should be carried out using a lower number of images and exposures.
In nuclear scintigraphy examinations, fetal ionizing radiation exposure comes from accumulated radioactivity in the maternal organism and from radiopharmaceutical transport and diffusion through the placenta. Ventilation/perfusion (V/Q) scintigraphy is the most frequent scintigraphy imaging method with reduced maternal dose, compared to computed tomography pulmonary angiography (CTPA). CTPA, however, provides lower doses when the fetus is still small and farther from the field of view or the thorax.
V/Q scintigraphy and CTPA are efficacious for diagnosing pulmonary embolism during pregnancy, although CTPA demonstrates advantages for identifying other pulmonary diseases. When clinical suspicion of pulmonary embolism exists, simple chest X-ray and bilateral lower limb Doppler ultrasound are considered to be the initial examinations for guiding indication for V/Q scintigraphy, which should be preferable to CTPA when both are available. Pharmacological stress with the use of vasodilators, either adenosine or dipyridamole, is not recommended during gestation, owing to the risks resulting from orthostatic hypotension.

## 2.4.1. Administration of Contrast Agents
Iodinated contrast agents do not present any teratogenic effects, and they may be used orally or intravenously in cases where examination information is important for immediate management; otherwise, the examination should be postponed until after delivery. This is due to the fact that fetal thyroid maturation begins at week 12, and it functions minimally at week 20 of gestation. There is, thus, a concern that iodinated contrast agents might induce development of hypothyroidism, even though, over the past 3 decades, there have been no reports of this occurring in this situation. In cases of allergic reaction to the contrast, phenylephrine and corticosteroids may be used safely. In preventive situations, prednisone and dexamethasone should be considered, given that most of these agents are metabolized in the placenta before reaching the fetus. There are, however, case reports of fetal adrenal suppression with corticosteroid use, and methylprednisone has been correlated to cleft lip when used before 10 weeks of gestation. 
More recently, multislice tomography, with multiple rows of detectors, has been used, providing undeniable advantages, especially related to speed and definition in abdominal and angiographic studies (CT angiography). These benefits, however, have been accompanied by a significant increase in absorbed radiation doses in abdominal organs of around 90% to 180%, when compared to helical devices with a single row of detectors. At the same time that multislice technology is consolidated as an extremely useful tool for thoracic-abdominal studies, it is necessary to invest in optimizing and adjusting protocols with the aim of controlling and limiting emitted radiation dose, especially during gestation.

## 2.4.2. Nuclear Magnetic Resonance
Cardiac magnetic resonance (CMR) is advisable in cases where other non-invasive methods have not been sufficient to define diagnosis, and it is preferable to imaging examinations that emit ionizing radiation. Exposure during the first trimester of gestation has not been associated with harmful effects to fetuses or children during early childhood.
Evidence regarding the use of gadolinium contrast during pregnancy is controversial. Gadolinium (Gd+3) is a paramagnetic metal ion whose pharmacological behavior in the organism is similar to that of iodinated contrast medium, i.e., it acts as an extracellular agent, rapidly spreading from the intravascular compartment to the interstitial space. No mutation or teratogenic effects have been documented following inadvertent administration of gadolinium-based contrast media during pregnancy. Nevertheless, depending on the dose, its use appears to be associated with greater risks of rheumatic, inflammatory, and infiltrative cutaneous manifestations, in addition to fetal loss. 
In its free form, the gadolinium ion is neurotoxic; its bond to a chelating agent, however, forms a stable complex, thus protecting the organism from adverse effects. Gadolinium chelates cross the placental barrier, and they may accumulate in the amniotic cavity; nonetheless, some studies have shown that only 0.01% of the dose is present in fetal circulation 4 hours after contrast administration, and only traces are detected after 24 hours.
During lactation, both iodinated contrast agents and gadolinium have low lipid solubility, and their concentration in breast milk is lower than 1% and 0.04%, respectively. For this reason, the American Academy of Pediatrics and the WHO recommend not suspending lactation.
Obtaining patients’ informed consent and clarifying the inherent risks of tests that are necessary for medical practice are essential measures that should be part of the interdisciplinary decision to indicate radiation examination during gestation, which involves the obstetrician and the radiology team.

## 2.4.3. Key Points
Indication for a radiological examination should consider the real benefit for determining therapeutic practice during pregnancy and the impossibility of substitution with an alternative radiation-free method (ultrasound, echo, and magnetic resonance);
The radiologist is the professional who is most prepared to evaluate the best diagnostic option in a given clinical situation, ensuring the safety of the pregnant woman and the fetus;
Radiological examinations should be performed in institutions that are able to guarantee the adoption of effective protection measures and that have modern equipment that is regularly calibrated and measured;
CMR is a complementary examination for defining diagnosis of heart disease. It is safe during gestation. Nevertheless, the use of gadolinium should be avoided;
The need for an examination with radiation demands interdisciplinary discussion involving a radiologist, a cardiologist, and an obstetrician, in addition to the patient’s informed consent.

## 2.5. Cardiovascular Drugs during Pregnancy and Breastfeeding
Requirement of pharmacological therapy is very frequent during pregnancy and lactation. It is estimated 34% of pregnant women with heart disease use cardiovascular medications, with the following distribution: beta-blockers (22%), antiplatelet drugs (8%), diuretics (7%), ACEI (2.8%), and statins (0.5%). In this series, the prevalence of adverse events to the fetus, especially IUGR, was twice as high when compared to the women who did not take medication. 
It is estimated that 10% to 15% of women with heart disease present cardiac complications that lead to medication treatment during gestation like systemic arterial hypertension (SAH), cardiac arrhythmias, HF, and thromboembolism. , However, prescription drugs during pregnancy requires basic knowledge of pharmacokinetics and drug classification for maternal and fetal safety during pregnancy and lactation.
The pharmacokinetics of medications are influenced by the physiological changes of pregnancy, often leading to a reduction in drug plasma concentration such that any dose adjustments should be considered to achieve therapeutic efficacy. summarizes the aspects deserve the following considerations:

 

Absorption of orally administered drugs is reduced due to delayed intestinal motility. Besides, the use of antacids and iron as a supplement appears to induce drug chelation at increased gastric pH, resulting in reduced drug bioavailability; 
The volume of drug distribution is increased during pregnancy due to plasma volume expansion contributing to a reduction in peak drug concentration; 
Liver metabolism is accelerated during pregnancy because liver perfusion is greater. This means that the fraction of the drug removed from the liver circulation is increased such that drugs such as propranolol, nitroglycerine, and verapamil are extracted faster from the systemic circulation. Drugs such as warfarin, which do not depend on flow but on liver activity and plasma free fraction are not influenced their concentration during pregnancy. On the other hand, nifedipine and metoprolol plasma levels are reduced in pregnancy due to increased enzyme catalytic activity; 
85% increase in renal blood flow compared to pre-gestational levels. , However, a tubular function is variable, with a reduction in uric acid excretion and glucose absorption, and an increase in protein excretion. 
As for safety, most drug studies in pregnancy are performed on animals and have little applicability because the effects are generally species-specific. Human studies are almost always retrospective and include small series. Pregnant women, except in rare circumstances, are excluded from large clinical trials. Thus, the medical literature on drugs in pregnancy has, for the most part, questionable scientific evidence.
In 1979, the Food and Drug Administration (FDA) introduced the classification of drugs according to categories A through X, which are widely used in daily practice. This classification labeled drugs according to animal and female studies in categories that they ranged from drugs that did not pose a risk to the fetus (category A) to teratogenic ones (category X).
In 2015, the classification (A, B, C, D, and X) was replaced by the so-called Pregnancy and Lactation Labeling Rule (PLLR), which is currently being accepted more. It provides a descriptive summary and detailed information on animal studies and clinical trials, as outlined in .

 

## 2.5.1. Antihypertensive Drugs ( )

 

Nifedipine: hypotensive and tocolytic action; not teratogenic. May require shortening of intake range or higher dose due to CYP3A4-mediated accelerated hepatic metabolism. Increased hypotension with concomitant magnesium sulfate use. - 
Methyldopa (β2-adrenergic receptor agonist): Non-teratogenic, considered safe and effective in the treatment of gestational hypertensive disease with favorable outcomes in primary and secondary outcomes such as blood pressure control, fetal growth, and prematurity. Warning maternal effects such as postural hypotension, lupus-like syndrome, depression, nasal congestion, drowsiness, and liver toxicity have been reported in 1% of treated cases. , 
Hydralazine: direct arteriolar vasodilator for oral or intravenous use in hypertensive emergencies. Adverse effects are maternal symptoms of "like" lupus and fetal thrombocytopenia. 
Clonidine: alpha-2 agonist has divergent hemodynamic effect in reducing vascular resistance versus reduction in cardiac output, and the consequent impact on fetal growth. Abrupt suspension may cause rebound hypertension. It is not teratogenic. It is available transdermal. 
Diuretics are indicated in hypervolemia and HF; however, the reduction in plasma volume, cardiac output, and placental flow is the major restriction on diuretic use during pregnancy. Its use during pregnancy has not been related to detrimental effects to the fetus. Furosemide is the most commonly used, while hydrochlorothiazide has been related to lower birth weight, jaundice, and neonatal thrombocytopenia. 
Beta-blocker: atenolol is not recommended because its use is associated with IUGR and low birth weight newborns. 
Amlodipine: may be considered second-line treatment without reference to being teratogenic when used in the first trimester of pregnancy. 
ACEI, ARB, direct renin inhibitors and aldosterone antagonists are contraindicated in pregnancy and should not be prescribed in women who wish to become pregnant. These medications cause renal dysgenesis, oligohydramnios, renal failure, IUGR, neonatal anuria, and fetal death, particularly in the second and third trimesters of pregnancy. However, ACE inhibitors may be used in lactation. Aldosterone antagonists have antiandrogenic effects on the male fetus and are contraindicated in lactation. , 

## 2.5.2. Antiarrhythmic Drugs ( )

 

Adenosine: nucleoside with a half-life of seconds. It is safe, but adverse effects include bradyarrhythmias, dyspnea, chest pain and flushing. , 
Beta-blockers: These are the most commonly used drugs during pregnancy. They are not teratogenic. Controlled studies show a higher frequency of neonatal bradycardia and hypoglycemia, as well as a higher risk of prematurity and small newborns for gestational age. - 
Atenolol: hydrophilic with renal elimination, is contraindicated by the high risk of IUGR. , Propranolol is safe; however, depending on the dose, IUGR, hypoglycemia, polycythemia, and hyperbilirubinemia may occur. Metoprolol is well tolerated, with high clearance in the second half of pregnancy. Succinate is safer than tartrate because doses are lower and maybe fractionated. , Sotalol is associated with point torsades due to QT interval prolongation. Sotalol is higher in breast milk and should be suspended during lactation. In cases of lactation maintenance, electrocardiographic control should be performed in the mother and the newborn. According to ESC Guidelines, 2018, sotalol was contraindicated in pregnancy and lactation because of the risk of sudden maternal-fetal death. The proposal is a replacement for propafenone or flecainide. However, the restriction on the use of sotalol during pregnancy and lactation is still controversial, as the results in controlling complex arrhythmias have been satisfactory in the practice of the specialists. Although there are no adequate studies, sotalol appears to be safer compared to amiodarone. - 
Amiodarone: lipophilic, accumulates in skeletal muscle and adipose tissue, with half-life from weeks to months. Warning effects are thyroid dysfunction (causing neonatal hypothyroidism in 17 to 25% of cases) and impaired neurological development. Should be contraindicated in pregnancy. - 
Lidocaine: more studied as an anesthetic agent than antiarrhythmic. Sixty percent of it is bound to plasma protein and rapidly entering the maternal circulation and placenta. It may lead to depression of the fetal central nervous system when used at high doses. , 
Propafenone: recommended for the prevention of supraventricular tachycardia in patients with Wolff Parkinson White syndrome, atrial tachycardia and atrial fibrillation refractory to nodal blocking agents. 
Procainamide: associated with maternal lupus syndrome. 

## 2.5.3. Drugs in Heart Failure ( )

 

Carvedilol: There is a lack of studies. It is the first choice of cardioselective beta-blocker. It is not teratogenic and has not been associated with IUGR. 
Bisoprolol: Not associated with an increased risk of miscarriage or fetal malformation when used in the first trimester of pregnancy. However, IUGR cannot be ruled out during prolonged use throughout pregnancy. , 
Hydralazine: A drug that replaces ACEI and ARB. 
Nitrates: Not routinely used and not teratogenic. Low maternal tolerance due to hypotension and headache. 
Sacubitril / valsartan: is contraindicated during pregnancy and although there are no studies on human milk excretion, there is no recommendation for use during breast-feeding.
Ivabradine: Animal studies show its association with malformation, bradycardia and altered fetal growth.

## 2.5.4. Antiplatelet ( )

 

Aspirin: It is safe at low doses at any stage of pregnancy. , , Not teratogenic, risk of maternal and fetal bleeding. Should be discontinued five days before delivery. , , 
Clopidogrel: There are no studies to ensure its use during pregnancy. It does not appear to be teratogenic. The use of clopidogrel should be recommended in very specific cases, as discontinuation of clopidogrel may impair the treatment of the disease for which it is indicated. , 

## 2.5.5. Thrombolytics ( )

 

They do not cross the placental barrier but are at risk of maternal bleeding. 

## 2.5.6. Anticoagulants ( )

 

When used in the first trimester, causes fetal warfarin syndrome in 5 to 10% of cases. The incidence is variable because the syndrome from the clinical view can often be inconspicuous, although in the opinion of geneticists. , its frequency is much higher. The risk of spontaneous abortion (less than 20 weeks of gestation) is almost 30% and that of stillbirth (more than 20 weeks of gestation) is 10%, both caused by warfarin poisoning. Maternal hemorrhage in delivery patients warfarin is serious; more severe, however, is neonatal intracranial hemorrhage and its sequelae. , For patients on oral anticoagulants who undergo premature labor, cesarean section is indicated.
The hypothesis that doses of less than 5 mg warfarin may cause a lower risk of embryopathy is not supported by appropriate studies to guide anticoagulation guidance in the first trimester of pregnancy. The teratogenic property of a drug is understood to be independent of its dose. Recent reports have shown the occurrence of embryopathy even at doses below 5 mg warfarin. It is concluded that it is “good practice” that the warfarin dose is adequate in pursuit of the therapeutic goal, controlled by the index. International Standardized Study (INR) and individualized for each clinical situation.
Heparin: does not cross the placental barrier. presents the advantages of low molecular weight heparin (LMWH) over unfractionated heparin (UFH). Both are associated with a 10 to 15% risk of miscarriages due to placental bleeding. Permanent use of UFH during pregnancy presents maternal risks such as bleeding (2%); osteoporosis (30%); spontaneous fractures (2%) and thrombocytopenia (5 to 15%) However, it appears that these adverse effects are minor with LMWH. Control of UFH anticoagulation should be daily, according to activated partial thromboplastin time (TTPA), with a target of 1.5 to 2 times greater than baseline. Control of LMWH should be weekly according to therapeutic values between 0.6 and 1.2 IU/ml of anti Xa factor in patients with mechanical valve prostheses.

 

Anticoagulation is still a therapeutic challenge. It requires knowledge of the risk of thrombosis for each clinical situation and the side effects of anticoagulants at various moments of the pregnancy-puerperal cycle. The fact is that when there is an indication of anticoagulation, pregnancy should not influence the accuracy and conventional goals. Fondaparinux has proven to be a safe alternative when heparins are not tolerated. , 
New oral anticoagulants (NOACS): There is no data available on exposed pregnant women. These drugs should not be used during pregnancy.

## 2.5.7. Hypolipidemic Agents ( )

 

The first choice is cholestyramine, considered the safest. Statins do not appear to be teratogenic. Its correlation with congenital anomalies is not clear; however, due to the lack of studies, its use should be discouraged during pregnancy and should be discontinued at conception. - Gemfibrozil, fenofibrate and ezetimibe are considered to have teratogenic potential. 
The treatment of pulmonary arterial hypertension (PAH) will be discussed in topic 3.6.3. Drugs released for use during pregnancy include: , 
Prostaglandins: epoprostenol, treprostinil, Iloprost;
Phosphodiesterase 5 inhibitors: sildenafil and tadalafil;
Calcium channel blockers (BCC): diltiazem and nifedipine;
Nitric oxide: via inhalation.
Contraindicated drugs during pregnancy are: , 
Endothelin receptor antagonists: bosentan, ambrisentan, and macitentan;
Guanylate cyclase stimulators: riociguat.

## 2.5.8. Key Points
The basic recommendations for prescribing medications during pregnancy, when possible, are:
Considerer pharmacokinetics of drugs during pregnancy, before prescription;
Prescribe when treatment is indicated, and its benefit outweighs the potential risk;
Guide to the prescription by the PLLR classification;
Avoid medication in the first trimester of pregnancy;
Use the lowest dose, as long as it is effective, for the shortest time, and, fractionate the daily dose;
Use drugs that are already widely accepted and safe in pregnancy;
Consider that drugs with molecular weight less than 1,500 Da cross the placenta and reach fetal circulation;
Guide preconception for women who make permanent use of medicines;
Consider that the priority of treatment is maternal, but obstetric and fetal risks should be considered.

## 2.6. Practice Recommendations during Pregnancy

## 2.6.1. Lifestyle
Pregnancy is an ideal moment for lifestyle change. This is because pregnant women, owing to concerns about their children’s health, are motivated to improve unhealthy habits, for example, quitting smoking and alcoholism, consuming a more balanced diet, or controlling weight.
Tobacco use is related to complications such as placenta praevia, premature placental detachment, low fetal weight, and prematurity, even in passive smokers. Consumption of alcoholic beverages should be avoided, because it can cause fetal growth retardation, as well as abnormalities in the face and the central nervous system. 
Pregnancy in women with heart disease should be accompanied by a multidisciplinary team. Consultations with a cardiologist should be monthly during the first half of gestation, biweekly following week 21, and weekly until delivery, and they must respect constant interaction with an obstetrician, which ensures the best practice during the various stages of gestation.
These routines should, however, be adjusted according to case severity. Accordingly, pregnant women who permanently use anticoagulants are recommended to undergo weekly evaluation for clinical and laboratory control. Women with WHO class IV heart disease should be hospitalized during the third trimester of gestation for clinical stabilization and delivery planning. In addition, care should be recommended regarding diet, physical activity, sleep quality, and reduced stress and workload, depending on the patient’s profession and heart disease. Furthermore, review and adjustment of continuously used medications, as well as suspension or replacement of drugs that are harmful to the fetus, are practices that should take place before conception, i.e., during the pregnancy planning phase.

## 2.6.2. Physical Activity
During pregnancies without complications, the benefits of physical activity are unquestionable. They include improved physical resistance and cardiorespiratory function; reduced stress, anxiety, and risk of comorbidities related to sedentarism; and weight gain. , Nevertheless, the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists contraindicates exercise during pregnancy in patients with heart disease with hemodynamic repercussions, patients classified as WHO risk III or IV, and in cases of preeclampsia, pregnancy-induced hypertension, severe anemia, and restrictive pulmonary disease. 

## 2.6.3. Diet
A balanced diet provides nutrients that are essential to fetal development, and it prevents complications related to weight loss in pregnant women. Obesity is associated with miscarriage, newborns with low birth weight, macrosomia, gestational diabetes, thromboembolism, and gestational hypertension, whereas malnutrition is linked to low birth weight and perinatal death. Notwithstanding an adequate diet, nutritional goals also require oral supplementation, as shown in . Consumption of foods rich in folic acid and supplementation with doses of 1 to 5 mg daily before conception and during the first trimester prevent neural tube defects in 72% of cases. Calcium supplementation (≥ 1 g daily) is associated with a significant decrease in the risk of preeclampsia (especially in women with low calcium consumption), as well as a decrease in prematurity and the occurrence of the composite outcome of “maternal death or severe morbidity.” The WHO recommends 1.5 to 2 g of calcium daily for pregnant women with low calcium consumption in their diets.

 

Fish consumption is the main source of non-occupational maternal exposure to methylmercury, which is found in all fish tissues and is absorbed in over 95%. Notwithstanding the risk of mercury poisoning, cohort studies have shown that greater maternal consumption of fish during the prenatal period was associated with better neurological development in newborns and that moderate consumption (up to 3 meals weekly) before week 22 of gestation was linked to reduced repeat prematurity. However, a recent systematic review and meta-analysis of randomized trials did not show statistical significance for the effect of long chain polyunsaturated fatty acids (n-3 PUFA) on reducing prematurity or any other fetal defects, such as neurological, cognitive, or visual acuity development. , 
Regarding caffeine consumption, given the lack of adequate studies, it is recommended to limit consumption to less than 200 mg daily. It is important to emphasize that coffee, which the main source of caffeine in many countries, contains 50% to 70% more caffeine than tea and other products. It is accepted that there is a theoretical relationship between caffeine and arrhythmogenesis, especially in women with heart disease.
Saline consumption, with no significant restrictions on salt, is generally recommended, especially close to delivery. However, pregnant women with risk of HF should be instructed to consume of 3 to 4 g of sodium chloride daily, without adding salt to food after cooking and avoiding salty items. Diets with 2 g of sodium daily should be restricted to more severe cases (NYHA FC III/IV), in addition to instructions regarding water restriction in these cases.

## 2.6.4. Professional Activity
Currently, most pregnant women work until one month before delivery, and only a small percentage suspend their professional activities earlier. The risk of developing complications is not related to work activity or to the psychosocial stress of work. However, demands and working conditions should be evaluated individually in women with limiting heart disease or obstetric situations, such as preeclampsia and IUGR. Changes or adaptations in work activities, reduced stress at work, or increased rest and relaxation periods are often beneficial measures, especially if the condition worsens or limiting symptoms appear.
Pregnant women with symptomatic heart disease or heart disease with hemodynamic repercussion should rest at home from the beginning of the third trimester of pregnancy, or be it, week 28 of gestation. During this phase, cardiac reserve limited by heart disease is insufficient to adapt to maximum hemodynamic changes, thus favoring the occurrence of HF, arrhythmias, IUGR, and prematurity.
Under pregnancy protection laws, all women are entitled to at least 6 leaves to perform examinations and consultations, proven by a medical certificate, for the time necessary to perform the procedures, as specified by the certificate. 

## 2.6.5. Key Points
Prenatal care for women with heart disease is multidisciplinary, with regular consultations with a cardiologist. Frequency should be in accordance with disease severity and/or possible complications;
Lifestyle orientations should be individualized in accordance with cardiac risk, as classified by the WHO;
Pregnant women should be made aware of diet, weight control, physical activity restrictions, and controlling stress at work. Measures such as ceasing tobacco use, ceasing consumption of alcoholic beverages, and consuming caffeine moderately are essential during the prenatal period;
Nutritional orientations include controlled calorie intake and a balanced and nutrient-rich diet, avoiding consumption of industrialized products and undercooked and poorly washed foods;
Supplementation of essential vitamins and minerals should be a part of the prenatal routine for women with heart disease.

## 2.7. Management of Delivery and Postpartum Period
The interdisciplinary view of delivery and the postpartum period in women with heart disease should consider clinical and obstetric evolution during pregnancy and the functional status preceding delivery. Programming delivery in women with heart disease requires prior hemodynamic stabilization; screening for possible intercurrences such as infection, anemia, arterial hypertension, and arrhythmias; and adjustment of cardiovascular therapy.
From the obstetric point of view, the following are mandatory: discussion with a cardiologist and an anesthetist regarding timing and route of delivery, maternal-fetal monitoring during labor, and special attention to water balance. Accordingly, pregnant women with WHO class III/IV heart disease require assistance in tertiary hospitals with possibility of transfer to intensive care unit (ICU) during the postpartum period.
The labor team for women with heart disease should be prepared to prevent and treat the main complications during the intrapartum and postpartum period. The most frequent cardiac complications that stand out are HF, acute pulmonary edema, arrhythmias, thromboembolism, and dissection of the aorta, while preeclampsia, hemorrhage, and infections are included among obstetric complications.

## 2.7.1. Practice during Delivery
The general consensus is that route of delivery should be indicated by the obstetrician. However, in patients considered WHO risk I/II with favorable clinical and hemodynamic conditions, spontaneous delivery at term of gestation is recommended. The consensus regarding type of delivery is based on the opinion of specialists, who believe that vaginal delivery is more advantageous, because it is associated with less blood loss, quicker recovery, and lower risk of thrombosis and infection. For this reason, it is the preferred type of delivery for women with heart disease whose clinical pictures are stable and uncomplicated.
Regarding cesarean delivery, its indication for patients with heart disease varies between 21% and 55%, worldwide. Available Brazilian data indicate that the rate of cesarean delivery in the general population is around 52%, and, according to the Brazilian Network for Surveillance of SevereMaternal Morbidity, the rate reached 76% among women with heart disease. There is no plausible clinical justification or explanation for such a high rate.
The rate of cesarean deliveries reflects the level of access to this intervention and its use; the task of defining the “desirable” rate in a given population, however, continues to pose a great challenge, as this number would adhere to medical indications, while avoiding “unnecessary” cesarean sections.
The European Registry of Pregnancy and Cardiac Disease has shown that the frequency of scheduled vaginal delivery was 69%; among cesarean deliveries, 44% had cardiac indication. In its conclusions, the registry showed that, in terms of maternal results, programmed cesarean section showed no benefits over vaginal birth, and it was associated with worse fetal evolution. 
Maternal indications for cesarean delivery include very specific clinical situations, such as labor in patients under oral anticoagulation, diseases with increased aortic diameters (WHO risk III/IV), severe coarctation of the aorta, Takayasu arteritis, dissection of the aorta, PAH, acute HF, peripartum cardiomyopathy (PPCM) with severe HF, or other clinical situations in which maternal condition is critical. 
Although it is controversial, there are recommendations for assisted delivery, either by vacuum extraction or forceps, in situations where there are real maternal-fetal benefits to shortening the active phase of the second stage of labor and the efforts of a prolonged expulsive period. The recumbent left lateral position is recommended to avoid compression of the aorta and the inferior vena cava by the gravid uterus, thus favoring better maternal venous return and facilitating effort during the expulsive period.
Basic monitoring during delivery includes non-invasive blood pressure measurement, pulse oximetry, and continuous electrocardiography, in addition to fetal monitoring (auscultation of fetal heartbeats by Doppler sonar every 15 minutes during the first stage and every 5 minutes during the second stage, or continuous cardiotocography). The need for additional monitoring should be determined on a case-by-base basis. Excessive fluid infusion should be restricted in order to avoid excessive hydration and pulmonary congestion.
The benefits of analgesia for preventing arterial hypertension and tachycardia and reducing cardiac stress are unquestionable. A safe and effective way to reduce anxiety during this moment is with humanized delivery care, i.e., authorizing the presence of a companion chosen by the parturient and allowing her to ambulate freely and to choose the most comfortable position during labor.
Delivery in patients under oral anticoagulation should be scheduled from week 37 of gestation. Patients with high thrombotic risks need to use UFH around 36 hours before delivery, and the infusion should be interrupted 4 to 6 hours before birth and reintroduced 6 afterward, with APTT control. In cases with low thrombotic risks, LMWH is used until the day before delivery, and the night dose should be omitted if induced delivery or cesarean section is scheduled for the following morning. Regional block is possible in cases where 24 hours have elapsed since the last dose.
Induction of delivery should be considered at week 40 of gestation in all women with heart disease, because the benefits of this practice outweigh the eventual risks. Mode of induction mainly depends on evaluation of the uterine cervix and fetal vitality. Both misoprostol (PGE1) and dinoprostone (PGE2) are recommended for preparing the uterine cervix. The Krause method (balloon), amniotomy, and oxytocin infusion are also considered safe. 
In contrast, inhibition of premature labor should be considered with great caution and even contraindicated in women with heart disease. The degree of prematurity should be weighed with the risks of tocolysis and corticosteroid therapy, given that both may lead to complications, such as severe HF and cardiac arrhythmias.
When indicated, tocolysis should be maintained for 48 hours, which is sufficient time for the action of the corticoid, with the aim of reducing the occurrence of respiratory distress syndrome, peri- and intraventricular hemorrhage, and necrotizing enterocolitis in the newborn. The drugs used for inhibition, such as nifedipine, may induce hypotension, and they are synergistic when used in conjunction with magnesium sulfate. Terbutaline has intense beta-mimetic effect, and it may lead to maternal HF. In this situation, atosiban, a competitive oxytocin receptor antagonist, has been the safest tocolytic agent, when used in intravenous infusion of about 400 ml of solution (0.9% saline solution, Ringer lactate solution, or 5% glucose solution) for 48 hours (approximately 200 ml/24 h).

## 2.7.2. Practice during the Postpartum Period
Maternal care should be intensified during the postpartum period, and preventive measures for the main complications (HF, PPH, and thromboembolism) should be part of high-risk maternity hospitals’ protocols.
Maternal blood volume undergoes significant variations during the immediate postpartum period, due either to increased venous return following placental clearance or to estimated blood loss, which is as high as 500 ml in vaginal delivery and 1000 ml in cesarean delivery (as defined by the WHO and the Pan American Health Organization). The impact of these maternal hemodynamic oscillations explains the occurrence of severe complications, such as HF, acute pulmonary edema, and cardiogenic shock. Negligence regarding hemodynamic oscillations during the postpartum period is, in part, responsible for maternal mortality; for this reason, it is mandatory for patients with severe heart disease, even when they are stable, to remain in the ICU 24 to 48 hours after delivery for effective hemodynamic monitoring.
PPH is equally important; it occurs in approximately 10% of vaginal deliveries, and it is considered severe in approximately 3%. In women with heart disease, the incidence of PPH reaches 21%, and it is related to cesarean delivery, assisted delivery with forceps, general anesthesia, and use of heparin before delivery. The increase in maternal morbidity due to transfusion, infection, and thromboembolism is, in fact, the leading cause of death in women with heart disease.
For this reason, all maternity hospitals should have specific conduct protocols for preventing and treating PPH, including the use of uterotonic drugs, which are recommended during the third phase in both types of delivery, in order to prevent PPH.
Oxytocin is the recommended drug, given its benefit in preventing hemorrhage; it should be administered intramuscularly, at a dose of 10 IU for vaginal or cesarean delivery. Intravenous administration is also an option, especially during cesarean delivery, in doses of ≤ 5 IU and slow infusion (> 30 seconds) every 3 minutes, up to 3 infusions. Intravenous prophylaxis should be associated with continuous-infusion maintenance dose.
Misoprostol (600 to 1,000 µg) may be used safely for both prophylaxis and treatment of PPH, but oxytocin administered via bolus should be avoided due to the risk of hypotension. Ergometrine and methylergometrine should be avoided due to their association with coronary vasoconstriction and SAH.
It is accepted that there is a high risk of thrombosis during the postpartum period; therefore, measures such as early ambulation, which more feasible with vaginal delivery, and heparin anticoagulation should be recommended within the first 48 hours after delivery. Nevertheless, thromboembolism prevention should be individualized, and it will be discussed subsequently.
When there is an indication for definitive sterilization, bilateral salpingectomy may be performed via infraumbilical incision during the first 48 to 72 hours following vaginal birth. Generally speaking, discussions about contraception should take place before discharge from the maternity hospital.

## 2.7.3. Key Points
Multidisciplinary assistance during delivery and the postpartum period should take the following into consideration: risk stratification of heart disease and elaboration of protocols for prevention and treatment of HF, PPH, infection, and thromboembolism;
Assistance during delivery and the postpartum period should take place at a high-risk maternity hospital;
Spontaneous vaginal delivery at term is recommended for most women with heart disease;
Maternal indications for cesarean delivery are the following: severe HF, aortic disease with significant dilatation, severe obstructions of the left heart, severe forms of PH, and ventricular dysfunction;
Cesarean delivery is indicated in patients who have gone into spontaneous labor while using oral anticoagulants (vitamin K antagonists) or who have suspended them for a period of less than 15 days;
Delivery in patients under oral anticoagulation should be scheduled from week 37 of gestation, with adjustments to anticoagulation, using heparin as an intra-delivery “bridge”;
Indications for preparing the cervix and inducing delivery are misoprostol (PGE1) and dinoprostone (PGE2);
Indications for inhibiting labor are, initially, contraindicated. In exceptional cases, atosiban is the indicated tocolytic agent;
It is mandatory for maternity hospitals to have a specific protocol for preventing and treating PPH;
Women with severe heart disease should remain in the ICU for a 24- to 48-hour period following delivery;
Contraception should be discussed before discharge from the maternity hospital;
There should be awareness that the postpartum period is as important and risky as pregnancy;
Breastfeeding should always be encouraged.

## 2.8. Obstetrical Anesthesia
Obstetric anesthesia plays a fundamental role in reducing maternal-fetal morbi-mortality, especially in pregnant women with heart disease. The complexity of heart disease requires the involvement of an anesthesiologist in multidisciplinary discussions during prenatal planning and the intrapartum and postpartum periods.
Frequency of evaluations should be individualized according to the risk of the heart disease and the patient’s clinical situation. In general, evaluation should take place trimesterly in patients in WHO risk class II and in 2- to 4-week intervals in patients in WHO classes III and IV. Formal planning should be discussed between weeks 32 and 34 of gestation by the whole team, so that the patient will be admitted to delivery with consolidated advice. This assists in the flow of attendance, and it reduces team stress during emergencies and the chance of negative outcomes.
The anesthesia team will have an opportunity to get to know the evolution of the gestation and its eventual complications, to adjust medications when selecting anesthesia and analgesia, and to make it possible for the patient to interact with greater clarity in understanding the conduct adopted during the intrapartum period. It is important not to neglect the risks of airway management and aspiration of gastric contents, adjustments of eventual medications, and administration of uterotonic drugs during the intrapartum period.
The current indication for pregnant women with heart disease is vaginal delivery with neuraxial analgesia. This type of anesthesia is more efficacious for controlling pain during labor analgesia than other techniques, such as the use of systemic opioids or inhaled nitrous oxide. , When effective, spinal analgesia decreases circulating endogenous catecholamines, considering that partial sympathectomy induced by the effect of local anesthesia on the neuroaxis leads to decreased systemic vascular resistance and alterations in heart rate related to sympathetic block and cardiac reflexes.
During cesarean delivery, neuraxial analgesia has become prominent for managing pregnant women with heart disease, due to the growing expertise of anesthesiologists in using spinal block techniques that allow for better measurement of anesthesia in a gradual manner, thus decreasing hemodynamic impact. World literature demonstrates rates above 60% in elective cesarean deliveries performed with neuraxial block; this number is lower in emergency deliveries, in which case general anesthesia is chosen due to the complexity of factors to be evaluated for decision making. , 
Among the neuraxial techniques most used for pregnant women with heart disease, both of the following stand out:
Sequential epidural anesthesia;
Sequential combined spinal-epidural anesthesia, with low dose in the spinal component.
These techniques are called “sequential,” because they allow the installation and cephalic progression of the sympathetic block to be performed gradually, preventing sudden installation with its cardiovascular repercussions. Small doses of local anesthesia associated with opioids are initially used, and additional supplements are performed through the epidural catheter until T6 sensory level is reached. 
In cases with contraindications to the use of neuraxial block for cesarean section, general anesthesia should be performed. The main objective of managing and planning with this anesthesia is to minimize the deleterious hemodynamic effects of systemic anesthetics and the hypertensive response to laryngoscopy, which is the reflex to sudden, exacerbated sympathetic stimulation. In this scenario, preanesthesia evaluation contributes to the identification of dural anomalies and severe scoliosis, which are common in Marfan, Loeys-Dietz, and Ehlers-Danlos syndromes.
Fast-acting drugs with short half-lives are used in doses adapted to maternal hemodynamics, in order to attenuate sympathetic responses to laryngoscopy, avoid large blood pressure variations, and prevent increased heart rate. Opioids such as alfentanil or remifentanil, as well as the use of other classes of drugs, may be useful for managing this. In adequate doses, short-acting beta-blockers and local anesthetics, such as esmolol and lidocaine, respectively, may be presented as good options. Additionally, in some circumstances, the use of inducers, such as ketamine and etomidate, may be a better option than propofol, which has higher cardiodepressive potential when used in bolus or in unadjusted doses.
When maintaining general anesthesia, it is necessary to pay attention to the potential negative inotropism of inhaled anesthetics and the decrease in systemic vascular resistance, which also occur with venous anesthetics. Dose-dependent uterine hypotonia, related to the use of inhaled anesthetics, may also occur, with greater potential for bleeding. , 
In cases where general anesthesia has been utilized, a good plan for postoperative analgesia should be performed with the objective of reducing circulating catecholamines. In these cases, there are some options, including spinal options or epidural analgesia, abdominal wall block (transversus abdominis block and lumbar block), or use of systemic analgesia.

## 2.8.1. Fasting
For elective cesarean delivery, it is recommended to fast from solids for 6 to 8 hours, depending on the fat content ingested and on eventual anatomical or physiological alterations that cause longer delay in gastric emptying. Clear liquids may be consumed up to 2 hours before surgery. Pharmacological prophylaxis for aspiration of gastric contents is recommended, with non-particulate antacids, H2 receptor antagonists, and dopaminergic antagonists. During labor, women with low risks may consume moderate quantities of clear liquids, such as water, tea, gelatin, and isotonic beverages.
In the event of maternal hemodynamic instability, the team should maintain the mother’s fast until it is safe to reintroduce liquids. Delivery analgesia and proximity to the second phase of labor are points that clearly exemplify this practice, given the possibility of hemodynamic instability and bleeding, respectively. In the most severe cases or when faced with a greater probability of cesarean delivery, the patient should continue fasting.

## 2.8.2. Anticoagulation and Neuraxial Block
It is estimated that spinal hematoma occurs in 1:200.000 to 1:250.000 , deliveries. Although rare, it is a severe event; therefore, strategies should be taken to prevent it. Current recommendations consider that doses of anticoagulants and prior period of suspension are parameters for ensuring safe neuraxial anesthesia. This is the case for patients receiving a single anticoagulant, weighing more than 40 kg, with normal renal function, and without any other conditions that would contraindicate neuraxial block. In summary, the recommendations are hereafter explained.

## 2.8.3. Unfractionated Heparin (Subcutaneous)144
Low dose (5,000 IU, 2 to 3 times daily): Wait 4 to 6 hours, with normal APTT or undetectable anti-Xa factor;
Intermediate dose (7,500 to 10,000 IU, 2 times daily; up to 20,000 IU daily): Wait 12 hours or more, with normal APTT or undetectable anti-Xa factor;
High dose (More than 10,000 IU per dose; more than 20,000 IU daily): Wait 24 hours or more, with normal APTT or undetectable anti-Xa factor.

## 2.8.4. Low Molecular Weight Heparin (Subcutaneous)144
Prophylactic dose (enoxaparin 40 mg or deltaparin 5,000 IU, once daily): Wait 12 hours or more;
Therapeutic dose (enoxaparin 1 mg/kg, twice daily or deltaparin 120 IU/kg, twice daily, or 200 IU/kg, single dose): Wait 24 hours.
Any anticoagulation regimes different from those mentioned above should be evaluated and individualized by the team, taking not only the risk of spinal hematoma into consideration, but also the thromboembolic risks, fasting time, maternal-fetal conditions, and the evaluation of predictors of difficult intubation for general anesthesia.
Time period for reinitiating anticoagulation should mandatorily include the participation of the anesthesiologist in cases where the approach is neuraxial. Reintroduction of anticoagulation should be individualized, because there are technical conditions for performing spinal or epidural anesthesia that interfere with the practice of reintroducing anticoagulation.

## 2.8.5. Hemodynamic Monitoring
The use of invasive monitoring in high-risk patients should be necessary, with the objective of reducing time between recognition of hemodynamic deterioration and their respective treatments. Before performing neuraxial block and inducing general anesthesia in patients in WHO-risks II/IV, invasive blood pressure (IBP) monitoring may be fundamental to a better outcome. 
Lack of validation of the use of non-invasive methods for monitoring cardiac output during delivery in women with heart disease makes it possible to individualize cases and indicate the utilization of invasive methods, such as central venous catheter (CVC) and pulmonary artery catheter (PAC). Nevertheless, the information obtained may be imprecise due to the complexity of the heart disease, in addition to the risk of inducing arrhythmias and other risks of complications. For this reason, there is low adherence to these forms of monitoring. In cases of cesarean delivery with general anesthesia, intermittent transthoracic echo and transesophageal echo have gained prominence as options for monitoring, and they may assist in the evaluation of ventricular function and filling. 

## 2.8.6. Intrapartum Uterotonic Drugs
The most used uterotonic drug during the peripartum period is oxytocin, which has an immediate effect on systemic vascular resistance, when administered in high doses or rapid transfusion. These regimes should be avoided for all pregnant women, especially in those with heart disease. The infusion of 2 IU of the drug for 10 minutes appears to be effective and not to have significant cardiovascular effects in pregnant women with heart disease. In general, it is possible to maintain an infusion of 2 to 5 IU for an interval of 15 to 30 minutes with low cardiovascular effects. Ergot derivatives induce smooth muscle contraction with vasoconstriction and consequent hypertension. Misoprostol may cause hyperthermia and tremors, and it results in increased oxygen consumption, which is harmful at times, especially in women with severe heart disease.
The rule that is most commonly used by anesthetists for oxytocin administration in patients without comorbidities is controversial, namely, the “rule of 3s,” consisting of 3 IU, every 3 minutes, up to 3 times, whereas an infusion of oxytocin at 2 IU for 10 minutes appears to be too slow. , 

## 2.8.7. Postpartum
Follow up of pregnant women with intermediate to high risks should take place in the ICU for 24 to 48 hours. This observation period is important, keeping in mind that most deaths occur during the postpartum period. Inadequate monitoring and inappropriate blood volume management may lead to cardiovascular dysfunction. 

## 2.8.8. Key Points
Anesthesia planning for delivery in women with heart disease should be discussed with a multidisciplinary team between weeks 32 and 34 of gestation;
The indication for pregnant women with heart disease is vaginal delivery with neuraxial analgesia;
In cases of cesarean delivery, neuraxial analgesia has gained prominence, when using spinal block techniques;
General anesthesia is indicated in cases of severe heart disease;
Anesthesia should be individualized in patients under anticoagulation;
Maternal monitoring is indispensable during delivery and during the immediate postpartum period.

## 3. Assessment and Management of Specific Heart Diseases

## 3.1. Valvular heart disease
In Brazil, rheumatic disease is the most frequent cause of heart disease during pregnancy, with an estimated incidence of 50% in relation to other heart diseases. Rheumatic fever is an episode from early childhood and/or adolescence, the onset of the clinical phase coincides with fertile age in women.
Cardiovascular adaptation of heart valve diseases to the increase in cardiac output directly influences flow through the heart valves, with functional worsening of stenotic lesions. On the other hand, the drop in peripheral vascular resistance reduces the volume of regurgitation in insufficient valves. For these reasons, the evolution of stenotic lesions is generally worse, and it is correlated to the anatomical degree of the valve lesion, whereas, in patients with regurgitation, it is related to the condition of ventricular function. 
These initial considerations assist in risk stratification of valve disease, both for adequate family planning counseling and care during gestation. Accordingly, the classification elaborated by WHO was adapted for pregnancy in women with heart valve disease.
The WHO considers that patients classified as I and II present acceptable or low risks that do not impose serious restrictions to gestation, whereas risk III would make pregnancy inadvisable, and risk IV would contraindicate it. In this position paper, women with heart valve disease are classified in the following manner: risk I, acceptable; risks II and III, intermediate; and risk IV, high risk to pregnancy ( ).

 

It is worth adding that a high-risk situation in heart valve disease does not fulfill the criteria for indicating interruption of gestation (therapeutic abortion), given that these patients may be treated by either surgical or percutaneous intervention following the embryogenesis phase.
During family planning, evaluation of heart valve disease should establish etiological, anatomical, and functional diagnosis and investigate the presence of unfavorable factors that are part of the natural history of heart valve disease and previous surgical correction. These factors modify maternal prognosis, and they do not depend on structural cardiac injury per se; the following deserve special emphasis:
AF;
PH;
Ventricular dysfunction;
Associated aortic diseases;
History of HF, thromboembolism, or infectious endocarditis (IE).
Cardiovascular evaluation before gestation should be assess the history, physical examination, and subsidiary tests that support in classification of risk of pregnancy, such as the following:
ECG: evaluates rhythm and heart chamber overload;
Echo: informs the type and severity of heart valve disease, degree of ventricular dilatation, presence of ventricular dysfunction, PH, and associated defects;
CMR: useful when heart valve disease is associated with aortic disease;
Ergometric test: valid for estimating functional capacity and arterial pressure in severe aortic stenosis in asymptomatic patients and when there is a dissociation between symptoms and the anatomical degree of mitral stenosis, indicated only during pregnancy planning;
Biomarkers: a controversial application in heart valve disease.
The recommendations put forth by Brazilian , and International Guidelines for practice during family planning and pregnancy in cases of acquired, congenital, and prosthetic heart valve disease are shown in to .

 

 

 

 

## 3.1.1. General Considerations for Treatment
Moderate restrictions on salt and physical activity, weight gain control (not exceeding 10 kg), and iron supplementation after week 20 of gestation are initial recommendations, taking care to rule out factors such as anemia, infection, hyperthyroidism, and cardiac arrhythmias. Prevention of rheumatic attacks should be maintained with 1,200,000 IU benzathine penicillin every 21 days or, for patients who are allergic to penicillin, 500 mg erythromycin stearate every 12 hours. Sulfadiazine is contraindicated. Prevention of IE for delivery is done with 2 g intravenous ampicillin associated with 1.5 mg/kg intramuscular gentamicin (with a maximum dose of 120 mg) 1 hour before delivery. The safety and efficacy of pharmacological treatment requires periodic dose adjustments.
Before conception, drugs with recognized teratogenic effects should be substituted. In women with mitral stenosis, the use of propranolol or metoprolol in doses that do not exceed 80 and 75 mg, respectively, stand out for preventing and controlling pulmonary congestion, always paying attention to perinatal side effects, such as hypoglycemia, hyperbilirubinemia, and polycythemia, which have not been verified in these recommended doses.
Acute AF should be promptly reversed by electric cardioversion in women with mitral heart valve disease, given that this procedure is considered harmless to the fetus, and it has the advantage of avoiding use of drugs at levels that are, at times, toxic. Additionally, atrial or ventricular ectopic beats and asymptomatic atrial tachycardia do not require the use of antiarrhythmic drugs. In order to control heart rate in patients with permanent AF, beta-blockers, or non-dihydropyridine calcium channel blocker (CCB) should be considered, in addition to anticoagulation.
The need for intervention in heart valve disease during gestation is due to cases that are refractory to clinical treatment. Percutaneous procedures should be preferable to cardiopulmonary bypass (CPB) surgery. In aortic stenosis, balloon catheter valvuloplasty (BCV) has been indicated for heart valve disease whose etiology is congenital or in attempts to save the mother’s life in extremely severe cases. In mitral stenosis, it requires the absence of thrombi in the left atrium, at most mild mitral insufficiency, and Wilkins echocardiographic score ≤ 8. 

## 3.1.2. Key Points
Stenotic valve lesion leads to more complications than regurgitation;
NYHA FC I/II in stenotic lesions do not guarantee good maternal evolution;
Complicating factors significantly increase the risk of heart valve disease;
Percutaneous intervention should be considered before gestation in women with severe mitral and aortic stenosis, even in asymptomatic patients;
Pregnancy does not change the criteria for indicating BCV;
Pharmacological treatment of complications during gestation should be considered as the first therapeutic option;
Prophylaxis of rheumatic disease should be maintained throughout gestation;
Postpartum consultation, in addition to maternal clinical examination and evaluation of the baby’s health, includes medication adjustments, lactation stimulation, and contraceptive counseling.

## 3.1.3. Valve Prosthesis
The prevalence of rheumatic disease in Brazil and the growing number of patients with congenital heart disease who require valve replacement have led to an increase in women with valve prostheses in childbearing age. One favorable factor, in this age range, is left ventricular performance, which is generally preserved.
From the hemodynamic point of view, valve prostheses improve functional capacity and promote clinical evolution during pregnancy. Biological prostheses have attributes that are favorable to evolution of pregnancy, as they do not require anticoagulation, and they are considered WHO-risk II. Nevertheless, they have limited durability, with the possibility of short-term reoperation, including during pregnancy.
Bioprosthetic valve (BPV) dysfunction due to calcification has poor evolution, and it leads to pulmonary congestion and low cardiac output, both of which are refractory to clinical treatment, in addition to causing a high risk of sudden death (WHO-risk IV). The occurrence of BPV calcification during pregnancy makes surgical indication for valve replacement mandatory, regardless of gestational age. 
In contrast, gestation in women with mechanical valve prostheses (MPV) is considered WHO risk III. The risk of thrombosis due to maternal hypercoagulability and difficulties with long-term anticoagulation are associated with a variable incidence of embolic accidents, spontaneous abortion, warfarin embryopathy, and maternal and neonatal hemorrhagic phenomena. 
It is estimated that the probability of pregnancy to be maternal-fetal free of events is 58.3% for BPV and 46.9% for MPV , and no differences in mortality rates for both prosthesis types, were observed . Although it is controversial, BPV may be considered the more adequate form of replacement for women of fertile age, except in adolescent patients, where premature calcification of BPV would favor the choice of MPV.
The following factors are related to prognosis of pregnancy:
Prosthesis functional status;
Cardiac rhythm (AF);
Ventricular dysfunction;
NYHA FC;
Prior incidence of IE, HF, or thromboembolism.

## 3.1.4. Maternal Risk
Women with MPV present an estimated risk of 5% for valve thrombosis during gestation; maternal mortality varies between 9% and 20% associated with thromboembolic complications. This incidence of thrombosis in MPV varies according to the anticoagulation regime, but it is signicantly higher during heparin use - The incidence of thromboembolism with LMWH is due to fluctuations in anti-Xa factor that occur over 24 hours, even with the therapeutic value (0.6 to 1.2 IU/ml) during peak action 4 hours after application, resulting in a suboptimal anticoagulation level. Regarding UFH, prolonged use is associated with thrombocytopenia and osteoporosis; , its efficacy is inferior to that of LMWH, and its subcutaneous use for anticoagulation practice has been prohibited. Owing to the high incidence of thromboembolism with heparins (UFH and LMWH), there is a tendency to prioritize the use of warfarin throughout the entire pregnancy, as it is believed to be safer for maternal-fetal outcomes. - 

## 3.1.5. Fetal Risks
In all anticoagulation regimes, the obstetric risks of hemorrhage, placental abruption, prematurity and fetal death are very high. - The warfarin cross the placental barrier, it is teratogenic when used in the first trimester of pregnancy and causes embryopathy in 0,6 a 10% of cases, even at doses less than 5 mg. - 
The anticoagulation regime for women with MPV who wish to become pregnant or who are in the course of gestation during the first consultation continues to be controversial. Factors that should be taken into consideration when deciding on the best anticoagulation treatment include the patients’ preferences, the attending physician’s expertise, and availability of adequate coagulation control.
Recommendations for preventing thromboembolism in mechanical prostheses intend to meet to the ideal requirements of a position based on documentation in the literature and on the authors’ experience, in a manner that is effective for the reality which different healthcare services face. It is understood that permanent anticoagulation should be divided into five different stages, including preconception, each trimester, and the postpartum period, as explained hereafter.
First Stage: Preconception. Patient/couple awareness. Advice regarding early diagnosis of pregnancy. Patients in pregnancy planning should receive clarification regarding the need to maintain anticoagulation, the regimes available, and their risks during all phases of gestation, childbirth, and the postpartum period. In order to achieve this, frank dialogue with the couple is fundamental. Counseling also includes information regarding the importance of early diagnosis of pregnancy in order to reduce the occurrence of embryopathy. During this consultation, the patient receives an examination request for chorionic gonadotropin beta dosage, which should be taken at the first sign of delayed menstruation.
Second Stage: First trimester. Anticoagulant substitution (avoiding teratogenesis). Substituting warfarin with heparin makes it possible to reconcile the benefits of preventing maternal thrombosis and the harmful effects of embryopathy. During this period, there are different options, which are shown in . The first choice is to use LMWH, which requires weekly anti-Xa factor control. If this option is not available, intravenous UFH is indicated between the sixth and ninth week of gestation. In patients whose first medical consultation takes place after week 6 of gestational, warfarin should not be suspended. In these cases, the couple should be informed regarding the possibility of embryopathy and that the risks of substituting with heparin are no longer justified.

 

Third Period: Second and third trimesters. Resuming oral anticoagulant, and anticoagulation control. Resuming warfarin use is justified by the assumption that shortening the use of heparin reduces adverse effects to the mother and leads to a lower risk of embryopathy. The proposal is to maintain warfarin doses in accordance with pre-gestation goals, with weekly or biweekly INR control. Reintroduction of warfarin should follow the dynamics of transition, or be it, simultaneous with subcutaneous LMWH or intravenous UFH until INR target value has been reached ( ).
Fourth Stage: Delivery planning. Consider hospitalization, redirect to parenteral anticoagulation, control anticoagulation and plan delivery. Hospitalization should be scheduled at week 36 of gestation for use of subcutaneous LMWH or intravenous UFH in therapeutic doses ( ). Route of delivery must be discussed with the obstetrician; vaginal delivery is considered safer due to the fact that there is less bleeding and to the advantages of analgesic techniques. In cases of premature delivery under anticoagulation, route of delivery is cesarean, and the use of prothrombin complex concentrate may be considered.

 

Fifth Stage: The postpartum period. Reintroduction of oral anticoagulation and hospital discharge. Six hours after delivery, in the absence of maternal complications, intravenous UFH or subcutaneous LMWH may be reintroduced in therapeutic doses. Warfarin should be prescribed 48 hours after delivery, following the dynamic of transition, in conjunction with heparin, until INR value reaches 2.0, at which point the patient is discharged from the hospital.

## 3.1.6. Key Points
BPV do not require anticoagulation, except in patients with AF or previous thromboembolic accident;
Pregnancy does not influence structural degeneration of BPV;
Calcified, stenotic BPV are indicated for surgery regardless of gestational age;
MPV require anticoagulation with permanent adjustments seeking to meet conventional goals;
MPV thrombosis requires immediate intervention with a thrombolytic agent or emergency surgery with CPB, regardless of gestational age;
Choice of BPV as a preferable substitute for a woman who plans pregnancy, considering that it does not requires anticoagulation and the future perspective of percutaneous valve-in-valve replacement;
Percutaneous valve-in-valve procedures require a specialized center with a heart team and resources for valve and arterial tomography, 3-dimensional esophageal echo, and an interventional hemodynamic and surgery team on standby;
Patients with MPV should be referred to tertiary services and reference centers in valve disease for follow up during pregnancy;
Permanent anticoagulation in patients with mechanical prostheses or mitral valve disease with AF should follow the algorithm which divides the pregnancy and postpartum into five stages;
Notwithstanding adequate and effective anticoagulation control at all times, there are still uncertainties regarding the success of pregnancy in women with MPV;
A multidisciplinary team should discuss choice of valve prosthesis and prospects for future pregnancy together with the patient.

## 3.2. Congenital Heart Disease
Advances in clinical and surgical cardiology treatments have demonstrated that a progressively higher number of women with congenital heart disease are able to reach childbearing age then they wish to become pregnant with a great likelihood of successful maternal-fetal outcome. 
In Brazil, a growing tendency has been observed in the percent of pregnant women with congenital heart disease, similar to European countries. They are considered the second-leading indirect cause of maternal mortality, accounting for up to 20% of deaths due to heart disease. 
Preconception assessment risk should be based on following variables: (1) time of heart disease diagnosis; (2) prior palliative or corrective surgery; (3) NYHA functional class; (4) laboratorial tests such as: hematocrit, hemoglobin, oxygen saturation, natriuretic peptide values; and liver and thyroid function tests.
Structural and functional diagnosis is defined by electrocardiography, transthoracic echo, magnetic resonance and cardiopulmonary testing.
The WHO classification has been very well accepted as a parameter for evaluating maternal-fetal risk according to structural cardiac injury. In addition to this classification, there are clinical conditions that are predicted over the natural history of congenital heart disease (which modify the prognosis of pregnancy and are independent of structural cardiac injury), which are shown in .

 

Eisenmenger syndrome: It is considered to have a high risk for maternal death, which reaches 50% during the pregnancy e postpartum. Pulmonary arterial disease restricts circulatory adaptation to the variations in cardiac output and to the drop in peripheral vascular resistance during pregnancy and postpartum period. This leads to the main complications that cause death, such as HF, hypoxia crises, and arrhythmias. The risk during the postpartum period is as high as during gestation, due to hemorrhage and thromboembolism. Patients with Eisenmenger syndrome appear to be predisposed to thrombocytopenia, deficiency in vitamin K-dependent coagulation factors, and bleeding. The fetal risks of spontaneous abortion, prematurity, and perinatal mortality are proportional to the degree of cyanosis.
Cyanosis: Almost 30% of patients with cyanotic congenital heart disease, whether or not they undergo previous surgery, present complications during gestation, such as: HF, systemic-pulmonary thrombosis, arrhythmias, and hypoxemia, are presumptive. The degree of arterial oxygen saturation is a prognostic factor for maternal-fetal survival, and the hypoxia has a significant correlation with maternal death, spontaneous abortion, and perinatal death. The indication of phlebotomy in maternal erythrocytosis is only been performed with hematocrit above 65% in patients with symptoms of headache, fatigue, visual or cognitive impairment, and myalgia. Fetal outcome, including miscarriage, prematurity, and perinatal death, is related to the degree of arterial oxygen saturation. It is estimated that oxygen saturation < 85% is associated with only 12% live newborns. 
HF: dyspnea is a clinical parameter used to aid practice and estimate prognosis of congenital heart disease, however, have limitations when applied to pregnancy. Dyspnea may be consequence of hypoxemia or pulmonary congestion, which is related to congenital heart disease involving the left heart. 
Cardiac arrhythmias: Frequent in adults with congenital heart disease, arrhythmias are the result of sequelae of cardiac defects such as ventricular dysfunction, myocardial hypertrophy, fibrosis or surgical injure, conduction tissue trauma, and the presence of endocardial grafts.
Previous intervention of pregnancy: Surgical or percutaneous correction of congenital heart disease is associated with better maternal-fetal prognoses in comparison with patients who have not undergone operation for heart disease. The eventual need for intervention should be taken into account before conception.

## 3.2.1. Pregnancy Management
Giving continuity to preconception evaluation, initial prenatal visit should include (1) history; (2) type of corrective or palliative surgery; (3) immediate or late postoperative evolution; (4) current clinical and functional situation; and (5) periodic laboratory examinations (hematocrit, hemoglobin, oxygen saturation, and natriuretic peptide). 
Attending during gestation, delivery, and the postpartum period for patients with congenital heart disease should rely on a team of specialists, a tertiary hospital, and periodic attendance. It is worthwhile to recall that the hereditary nature of congenital heart disease makes routine fetal echo necessary from the second trimester of gestation on. 
Pregnant women classified as WHO risks III/IV should receive advice regarding routine hospitalization starting between 28 and 32 weeks of gestation, for compensation of maternal condition, continuous fetal monitoring, therapy adjustment, and delivery planning. Decisions regarding the management of delivery and anesthesia should be made jointly, in accordance with the mother’s clinical situation and fetal vitality and maturity.
Congenital heart diseases associated with PH: It is recommended the interruption of pregnancy in women with PH and Eisenmenger syndrome during the first trimester of gestation. Nonetheless, when the patient decides to continue with the pregnancy, the multidisciplinary team should follow the protocols that include hospitalization after week 28 of gestation, enoxaparin (LMWH) use in a prophylactic dose (1 mg/kg daily), and oxygen therapy (supplemental oxygen for saturation below 92%) are essential measures for controlling hypotension, hypoxemia, and metabolic acidosis.
Specific vasodilators, such as phosphodiesterase inhibitors (sildenafil), may lead to arterial hypotension, and they should be indicated individually in accordance with clinical situation and maternal tolerance. , Sildenafil or other phosphodiesterase inhibitors have been used, as well as the eventual addition of prostaglandins when symptoms persist. Endothelin receptor antagonists should be suspended during pregnancy. , 
Full-dose or prophylactic LMWH should be considered as substitute of warfarin during the first trimester and after 36th week of gestation for patients whose already using it before conception ( ). The antiplatelet agents (such as aspirin) or LMWH should be prescribed with great caution, because patients with PH present a high risk of hemoptysis and thrombocytopenia.
Congenital heart diseases with obstructive structural lesions: Patients with severe left ventricular outflow tract obstructions should be advised to surgical or percutaneous correction previous of gestation. If the patient is, however, already pregnant, the triad of symptoms (HF, angina pectoris, and syncope) percutaneous or surgical intervention should be considered, even during gestation. In patients with severe valve pulmonary stenosis whose present heart failure, the percutaneous balloon valvuloplasty is indicated, and it is safest during the second trimester of pregnancy, when the embryogenesis phase has passed; the fetal thyroid is still inactive, and the uterus still has a small volume, allowing for greater distance between the ionizing radiation and the conceptus during the procedure.
Cyanotic heart diseases without pulmonary hypertension: General measures include restricting physical activity, supplementing oxygen, and preventing venous stasis due to the known risk of paradoxical embolism. The use of LMWH in prophylactic doses is recommended, because thromboembolism is one of the main complications. Iron supplementation may be used, depending on polycythemia, similarly to Eisenmenger syndrome. , 
Heart disease with shunt without pulmonary hypertension: Atrial septal defect (ASD) is well tolerated during pregnancy and is considered WHO- risk I. Arrhythmias, which are generally supraventricular, are common and they may be controlled with digoxin, beta-blockers (propranolol or metoprolol), or CCB (verapamil) in fractionated low doses. Patients with uncorrected ASD are considered to present a risk of thromboembolism, which may suggest that LMWH should be used. Although it is not routine, symptomatic patients with left-right flow and hemodynamic instability may benefit from percutaneous closure of this defect.
Patients with small or operated interventricular communication (VSD) tolerate pregnancy well and are considered WHO-risk I, especially when ventricular function is normal.
The evolution of atrioventricular septal or canal defects that have not been corrected depends on the magnitude of valve regurgitation and the size of communication between chambers. It is considered WHO- risk I. The most frequent complications are arrhythmias, pulmonary congestion, and HF in patients with ventricular dysfunction. Treatment includes use of digoxin, diuretics (furosemide), vasodilators (hydralazine), or beta-blockers (carvedilol).
Coarctation of the aorta: Pregnancy is tolerated in patients with corrected coarctation of the aorta, which is considered WHO-risk II. , Nonetheless, in when it has not been corrected prior to conception, there are associated complications which lead to high risks to pregnancy, such as arterial hypertension with the additional risk of preeclampsia, aortic aneurysm, dissection of the aorta, and rupture of cerebral aneurysm, which goes on to become WHO-risk IV. It is fundamental to control arterial pressure, using conventional therapy.
Tetralogy of Fallot: Tetralogy of Fallot is the most common cyanotic heart disease in adults, and patients whose have undergone corrected surgery they tolerate pregnancy very well. In this group, risk factors are right ventricular dysfunction and pulmonary insufficiency, which adequately adapt to pregnancy in most cases. The current practice of replacing the pulmonary valve in the population of patients with significant right ventricular dilatation has contributed to an increasing contingent of pregnant women with pulmonary biological prostheses. Cardiac arrhythmias are common events during the late postoperative period but do not compromise obstetric and fetal outcomes. Experience with unoperated tetralogy of Fallot is very limited, and it should follow the recommendations for cyanotic heart diseases.
Ebstein anomaly: Prognosis for pregnant women with Ebstein anomaly is related to the presence or absence of cyanosis and HF. Hemodynamic instability is associated with tricuspid insufficiency or right ventricular dysfunction. Pregnancy should be planned following surgical correction in symptomatic patients with HF or cyanosis. Pre-excitation syndrome is commonly associated with the anomaly, and arrhythmias may be a complicating factor during gestation, even in patients who have undergone operation. 
Transposition of the great arteries (TGA): In cases of dextro-TGA, late evolution following atrial (Senning or Mustard procedure) or arterial (Jatene surgery) switch has been positive, and pregnancy is well tolerated. The presence of right ventricular dysfunction or significant tricuspid insufficiency is an important factor for poor prognosis and restricting pregnancy. Practice for treating complications should follow conventional recommendations. In cases with levo-TGA, also known as ventriculoarterial and atrioventricular discordance or ventricular inversion, evolution of pregnancy depends on FC, systemic right ventricular function, arrhythmias, and associated lesions. In adults, the main concern is ventricular dysfunction. For these young women, pregnancy should be advised against.
Fontan procedure: Successful gestations have been reported in patients who have undergone Fontan surgery, although there is a risk if Fontan circulation is not adequate, at which point the consequent complications of low cardiac output, arrhythmia, or hepatic disease arise; these cases are considered WHO risk III. Pregnancy is not advised for patients whose arterial oxygen saturation is lower than 85% or patients with severe atrioventricular insufficiency, depressed ventricular function, or enteric protein loss; these cases are considered WHO-risk IV. Practice is to treat and prevent HF, arrhythmias, and thromboembolism. Obstetric and fetal evolution in patients who have undergone the Fontan procedure is uncertain and complicated due to the high incidence of spontaneous abortion, prematurity, small for gestational age newborns, and neonatal death. There is also a high risk of PPH, which is peculiar to this clinical situation. , 
Heredity: Children of mothers with congenital heart disease have a higher risk of presenting congenital cardiac lesions, which vary according to the type of maternal defect and which are not necessarily the same as the maternal structural lesion. Fetal echo is used to detect the recurrence of congenital heart disease, which is around 2.7% to 10% of cases. It has been verified that there are genetic syndromes associated which specific defects, such as IAC in Holt-Oram syndrome, conotruncal anomaly in DiGeorge syndrome, among others, which are transmissible. These data reinforce the recommendation for fetal echo as part of the prenatal routine for the group of women with hereditary congenital heart disease.

## 3.2.2. Key Points
Pregnancy planning requires determination of structural and functional diagnosis of heart disease based on laboratory and imaging examinations;
Preconception counseling should be based on WHO risk classification;
The presence of PH, cyanosis, arrhythmias, ventricular dysfunction, previous thromboembolic events, or HF adds risks to the WHO categories;
When indicated, surgical or percutaneous intervention should be performed before conception;
Pregnant women with WHO risk III/IV should be referred for specialized care in tertiary centers with the support of a Pregnancy Heart Team;
Heredity of congenital heart disease requires the performance of fetal echo as well as genetic and preconception counseling.

## 3.3. Cardiomyopathies
Cardiomyopathies are cardiac muscle diseases that structurally and functionally compromise the heart in the absence of coronary artery disease, arterial hypertension, or valvular or congenital heart disease, which would justify the observed myocardial abnormality. According to phenotype, cardiomyopathies are classified as hypertrophic, dilated, restrictive, arrhythmogenic right ventricular, and non-compaction. This classification is fundamental for risk assessment and estimating prognosis of gestation, regardless of probable etiology. PPCM will be discussed subsequently.
A retrospective study on cardiomyopathies during gestation has shown a 35% incidence of complications with 11% maternal mortality, data which are related to the form and the degree of myocardial impairment. , WHO risks III/IV includes cardiomyopathies with reduced left ventricular ejection fraction (LVEF) below 30%, with manifestations of HF, PH, and complex arrhythmias. 
HF is the main complication, especially after the second trimester of gestation and during labor. During the immediate postpartum period, which is as sensitive as gestation, the following recommendations should be followed: caution with the use of oxytocic drugs; moderation when infusing fluids during the intrapartum period; attention to PPH, pain control, and infection prevention; and transfer to the ICU within the first 24 to 48 hours after delivery.

## 3.3.1. Dilated Cardiomyopathy
Approximately 50% of cases of dilated cardiomyopathy are idiopathic, and 20% to 35% are hereditary; genetic mutations have been identified in almost 40%. The following acquired causes stand out: viral myocarditis (coxsackievirus, parvovirus, echovirus, adenovirus), H1N1, Epstein-Barr virus, and other causes related to drug use.
During family planning, when the patient intends to become pregnant, the following are recommended: (1) adjustments to maternal therapy regarding HF control, considering that essential drugs which are contraindicated during pregnancy (ACEI, ARB, neprilysin inhibitors, spirolactone, ivabradine) should be substituted; (2) patient awareness of the possible immediate and long-term impact of pregnancy on heart disease; (3) genetic counseling, given that the disease is associated with autosomal dominant inheritance, followed by autosomal recessive inheritance, and to X-chromosome linked diseases. 

## 3.3.2. Hypertrophic Cardiomyopathy
Global prevalence of hypertrophic cardiomyopathy (HCM) is around 0.02% to 0.2% of the population, and it was estimated at 0.015% in a cohort study of pregnant women with heart disease. Pregnancy constitutes a potential risk for women with HCM; its prognosis, however, is still uncertain.
The great variation in the rate of cardiovascular complications during pregnancy, estimated between 5% and 40%, has been attributed to the heterogeneity of the phenotype of this heart disease. - Although they are often asymptomatic, the most frequent complaints of pregnant women with HCM are chest pain, dyspnea, syncope, and palpitation. The factors associated with worse prognosis for pregnancy are history of HF, ventricular arrhythmia, and sudden death in the family. Complications during pregnancy result from left ventricular outflow tract obstruction, diastolic dysfunction, and myocardial ischemia.
Among the most frequent arrhythmias, the following stand out: atrial extrasystoles, sustained supraventricular tachyarrhythmias, and AF, which favor maternal hemodynamic instability. From the obstetric point of view, the most frequent complications are spontaneous abortion in approximately 20% of cases and low birth weight in 10%. - 
Another important issue is the risk of transmitting the disease to the fetus, because HCM is an autosomal dominant Mendelian trait, which is also caused by mutations that encode the components of the cardiac sarcomere. The complexity of this disease still does not allow for determination of its true incidence in apparently healthy newborns who do not present abnormalities on 2-dimensional echo. In most cases, echo during the neonatal period does not identify HCM because myocardial hypertrophy occurs over the course of development, only becoming apparent after adolescence. Nonetheless, it is worth highlighting that the disease’s obstructive form and family history of sudden cardiac death (SCD) are risk factors for early manifestation of hypertrophy in children. , 
Genetic study of asymptomatic children and adolescents with family history of HCM may identify “healthy” carriers of the mutation. There are, however, important obstacles to the clinical application of this investigation, such as genetic plurality, low frequency of the mutation responsible in the diseased population, difficulties in techniques for identifying the pathogenic mutation, and high costs.
In symptomatic patients, initial pharmacological treatment is with the use beta-blockers, propranolol, or metoprolol succinate, which may or may not be associated with CCB, such as verapamil. Association of these drugs requires caution with respect to maternal tolerance, arterial pressure, and fetal vitality. The use of prostaglandins to induce delivery is not advisable, due to their vasodilating effects. Vaginal delivery is considered to be safe, whereas cesarean delivery is reserved for special situations. Epidural or spinal anesthesia should be contraindicated in severe obstructive forms.
During pregnancy planning in patients with arrhythmias that are difficult to control pharmacologically, it is necessary to consider discussing the possibility of percutaneous intervention with an electrophysiologist. Examples include radiofrequency ablation in cases of complex and/or symptomatic tachycardias or even ICD in patients included in conventional class IA recommendations.

## 3.3.3. Arrhythmogenic Right Ventricular Dysplasia
Arrhythmogenic right ventricular dysplasia is a hereditary, autosomal dominant cardiomyopathy, with reduced penetrance and variable expressivity. For these reasons, genetic counseling is mandatory.
Pregnancy is well tolerated in women with this disease, but patients with preexisting biventricular disease have a higher risk of developing HF as pregnancy progresses. Symptom control and prevention are done with beta-blockers (propranolol, metoprolol succinate). In the event that they are necessary, antiarrhythmic drugs should be maintained, respecting fetal toxicity limits. If indicated, ICD implantation should preferably take place before gestation. 

## 3.3.4. Non-compaction Cardiomyopathy
The non-compacted myocardium is characterized by distinctly trabeculated myocardial morphology. It is a family disease in up to 60% of cases, with autosomal dominant inheritance. Its prevalence is unknown, and evidence regarding practice during pregnancy is limited. The clinical picture is highly variable, ranging from asymptomatic patients to patients with refractory HF and severe arrhythmias. There is no specific treatment for non-compaction cardiomyopathy, and therapeutic conduct should be supported by experience with other cardiomyopathies. The risk of thromboembolism, however, is considered to be greater due to the myocardial morphology in itself, which justifies permanent anticoagulation during gestation.

## 3.3.5. Restrictive Cardiomyopathy
Idiopathic restrictive cardiomyopathy is characterized by non-hypertrophic, non-dilated ventricles, with diastolic dysfunction, resulting in atrial dilatation. It may be idiopathic or associated with other diseases, such as amyloidosis, endomyocardial fibrosis, sarcoidosis, and hemochromatosis. Scarcity of experience in the literature, limited and controversial therapy, and frequently severe clinical evolution are factors which make pregnancy unadvisable.

## 3.3.6. Key Points
Women with cardiomyopathy should participate in family planning, including genetic counseling;
Risk stratification for subsequent pregnancies should consider the functional and structural status of the cardiomyopathy;
Children of women with HCM, even when they are apparently healthy, should receive differentiated follow up until adolescence;
Therapeutic optimization should follow conventional guidelines, considering classical drug contraindications during gestation;
Permanent anticoagulation should be practiced in pregnant women with noncompaction or dilated cardiomyopathy, intracavitary thrombus, or prior embolic event;
Genetic studies are promising for changing prognosis in cardiomyopathies.

## 3.3.7. Peripartum Cardiomyopathy
PMFC is defined as an idiopathic form of cardiomyopathy that manifests with HF secondary to left ventricular systolic dysfunction, with LVEF (< 45%), which occurs in late pregnancy or months after delivery or miscarriage, when none other cause of HF has been found. 
The pathophysiology of PPCC, not yet fully understood, is based on hypotheses that suggest hormonal, inflammatory, autoimmune, infectious, genetic and environmental mechanisms. New concepts on etiopathogenesis have been presented, involving oxidative stress, angiogenic imbalance, and prolactin in the genesis of PPCM. , 
The most recent studies show that PPCM is triggered by increased oxidative stress in pregnancy, in combination with lower expression of angiogenesis regulators. Oxidative cleavage of prolactin by cathepsin D, the major endoprotease responsible for the generation of adenohypophyseal vasoinibins, generates an antiangiogenic subfragment, prolactin 16kDa, with apoptotic and proinflammatory properties. The 16kDa prolactin in endothelial cells suppresses vasodilation depends on nitric oxide (ON) and angiogenesis. In addition, the endothelial cell secretes microparticle exosomes (microRNAs), specifically miRNA (miRNA), which, when absorbed by cardiomyocytes, interferes with their cellular metabolism and, consequently, leads to cellular apoptosis. , MicroRNA-146a is a highly specific marker for the diagnosis of CMPP Prolactin blockade by bromocriptine or cabergoline, a dopamine-D2 receptor agonist, has shown promising results in therapy and recovery of myocardial function in PPCM. - 
The main risk factors for PPCM are hypertensive pregnancy syndromes (gestational hypertension, preeclampsia, eclampsia or HELLP syndrome), chronic hypertension, multiple pregnancies, obesity, smoking, pre-diabetes and diabetes mellitus, advanced age or adolescence and prolonged use of beta agonists. 
Mortality rates may be lower than 5%, or they may be as high as 50% of cases. The causes of maternal death are HF, ventricular arrhythmia, and thromboembolism, which mainly occur during the first 6 months of the disease until the first postpartum year (late maternal death), which may lead to underreporting of the disease. , 
The main clinical manifestations are progressive or sudden dyspnea with acute pulmonary edema or cardiogenic shock. Cardiac arrest, severe arrhythmias or thromboembolic events [stroke, mesenteric ischemia or acute myocardial infarction (AMI)] and cardiogenic shock as the first manifestation of the disease are not uncommon. 
The diagnosis of PPCM should always be considered when cardiac decompensation occurs in the last months of pregnancy or the months following delivery in previously healthy women. The diagnosis of PPCM is by exclusion and should have differential diagnosis with myocarditis, acute myocardial infarction, pulmonary thromboembolism (PTE), severe preeclampsia, amniotic fluid embolism, pre-existing cardiomyopathies, Takotsubo syndrome, congenital or valvular preexisting disease, and systemic infections. Do not value the symptoms, such as exertion, chest pain, or fatigue, which usually occur in late pregnancy and postpartum, contribute to delay in the diagnosis of PPMC , and consequently, a worse prognosis and less chance of recovery of myocardial systolic function. , , , 
Complementary examinations include the following: 
ECG: in most cases presents nonspecific changes in ventricular repolarization, sinus tachycardia or ventricular arrhythmias. Normal ECG does not exclude the diagnosis of PPCM;
Chest X-ray: The most frequent alterations are cardiomegaly, redistribution of blood flow the pulmonary apices, and “butterfly” pattern;
Biomarkers: Natriuretic peptides (B-type natriuretic peptide [BNP] / or NT-proBNP) are valid markers in HF investigation because, when elevated, they help establish the diagnosis and, when normal, exclude the diagnosis. BNP level is not significantly elevated in pregnancy and postpartum, the significant increase in BNP or NT-proBNP levels in pregnancy can diagnose PPCM; reference values for HF diagnosis are NT-proBNP > 300 pg/ml and BNP > 100 pg/ml; BNP has a good predictive value for persistent left ventricular systolic dysfunction after delivery and is correlated with left ventricle echocardiographic parameters;
Troponins: Troponin may be slightly elevated in PPCM; have predictive value for persistence of ventricular dysfunction 6 months after the onset of the disease;
Transthoracic Doppler echocardiography is the “gold standard” examination for diagnosing PPCM. Left ventricular hypokinesis findings predominate, with LVEF below 45% and may present with regurgitation of the atrioventricular valves and pericardial effusion. LVEF below 30% and final left ventricular diastolic diameter > 60 mm are correlated with worse maternal prognosis;
CMR provides information on the degree of myocardial involvement and should be considered for estimation of prognosis and treatment in the late course of the disease;
Coronary cineangiography and myocardial biopsy are not indicated for diagnosing PPCM.
Time to diagnose PPCM is crucial for patient survival. The immediate goals in acute treatment are to stabilize the hemodynamic state, providing symptomatic relief and ensuring maternal and fetal well-being. Emergency physicians should be aware of PPCM in the differential diagnosis of dyspnea in pregnancy-related emergencies and play a role in early diagnosis. Care should be provided by a multidisciplinary team including cardiologists, intensivists, obstetricians, neonatologists, anesthetists and cardiac surgeons. For rapid diagnosis and decision making in all pregnant women with acute heart failure, a pre-specified management algorithm and the establishment of a multidisciplinary team is crucial. , 
The pharmacological treatment of PPCM , follows the guidelines of HF with reduced echocardiographic ejection fraction (EF). Beta-blockers, preferably β1-selective (carvedilol, bisoprolol, and metoprolol), are initiation with low doses associated with loop diuretics; digoxin may be considered in heart rate control indicated at initially low doses associated with loop diuretics; digoxin may be considered in heart rate control. It is important emphasis that ACEI, ARB, sacubitril/valsartan, ivabradine, spironolactone, and warfarin are contraindicated during gestation, but they may be considered during lactation. Is recommend anticoagulation with heparin to avoid cardio-embolic complications in patients with LVEF ≤ 35% with LMWH or oral anticoagulation at least in prophylactic dose.
The use of bromocriptine (ergot alkaloid) and cabergoline (dopamine D2 receptor agonist) has shown satisfactory results in the immediate response and late recovery of PPCM ventricular dysfunction. - The eventual contraindication to the use of these medications should also be weighed. If bromocriptine is not available, cabergoline may be used as an alternative to bromocriptine. As thromboembolic events have been reported during the use of bromocriptine (albeit mostly at higher dosages), bromocriptine treatment should always be accompanied by anticoagulation at least in prophylactic dosages heparin; full doses of heparin (fractional/unfractionated) is mandatory in the presence of intracardiac thrombus or systemic embolism, as well as in paroxysmal or persistent AF. The proposed schedule shows that safe doses with good tolerance and efficacy are 2.5 mg twice daily for 2 weeks, followed by 2.5 mg once daily for 6 weeks for bromocriptine; and 1 mg single dose for cabergoline for its prolonged effect from 14 to 21 days. - The abbreviation BOARD has been proposed for chronic treatment of patients with PPCM following delivery. The abbreviation stands for Bromocriptine, Optimization of HF therapy, Anticoagulation, VasoRelaxants, and Diuretics. 
Bromocriptine treatment must always be accompanied by anticoagulation with heparin (LMWH or UFH), at least in prophylactic dosages; in patients with intracardiac thrombus detected by imaging or evidence of systemic embolism, as ell as in patients with paroxysmal or persistent atrial fibrillation. 
Regarding the non-pharmacological treatment of PPCM, ICD, cardiac resynchronization, ventricular assist devices, and cardiac transplantation are considered. - ICD has been considered for primary prevention of sudden death, following guidelines for patients with ventricular EF below 35%. Wearable defibrillator cardioverter is an alternative during the first months following diagnosis with PPCM, considering that most of these patients recover ventricular function 6 months after the acute phase of the disease.
Cardiac resynchronization may be proposed 6 months after the onset of the disease, in accordance with conventional indication criteria, or be it, advanced HF, NYHA FC III-IV with optimized treatment, sinus rhythm, EF below 35%, QRS > 150 ms, or QRS > 120 ms with desynchronization on echo or magnetic resonance.
Left ventricular assist devices may be an option in critically severe patients as a “bridge to transplant” or a “bridge to recovery.” Cardiac transplant is indicated in approximately 10% of PPCM cases in patients who do not recover after 12 months with mechanical circulatory support.
During long-term clinical follow-up, the following recommendations should be followed: 
If the cardiac function does not improve, maintain beta-blocker, ACEI or ARB; spironolactone if EF < 40%, ivabradine if heart rate > 75 bpm, with a maximum dose of beta-blocker (reaching heart rate < 60 bpm); diuretics if there is edema / pulmonary congestion;
If ventricular function shows complete and sustained recovery, supported by bi-annual echocardiographic follow-up, maintain pharmacological treatment (beta-blocker, ACEI, spironolactone) for at least 6 months and diuretics only if there are symptoms of congestion or lower limb edema; during the period between 6 and 12 months thereafter, discontinue spironolactone and ivabradine (if in use), but continue beta-blocker and ACEI/ARB for at least 6 months following discontinuation of spironolactone; after 12 months, gradually reduce and discontinue ACEI/ARB, and maintain beta-blocker for 6 more months; after 18 months, suspension of the beta-blocker is controversial, because some studies claim that it should be maintained for at least 5 years;
Advising against subsequent pregnancy in patients who have completely recovered left ventricular systolic function following PPCM is controversial, giving that there is no conclusive evidence supporting this advice in medical practice. 
The following points resume recommendations for practice in cases of acute HF: , 
Transcutaneous monitoring of oxygen saturation;
Oxygen therapy: oxygen saturation < 90% (pulse oximetry); PaO2 < 60 mmHg (arterial-blood gas test);
Endotracheal intubation performed in acute respiratory insufficiency with hypoxemia (PaO2 < 60 mmHg), hypercapnia (PaCO2 > 50 mmHg), and acidosis (pH < 7.35);
Diuretics if there are signs of congestion (furosemide, 20 to 40 mg) in an intermittent bolus or a continuous infusion;
Vasodilators if SAP > 110 mmHg; intravenous nitroglycerin, at an initial dose of 10 to 20 μg/min, up to a maximum of 200 μg/min;
Inotropic agents (dobutamine, dopamine, levosimendan, phosphodiesterase III (PDE III) inhibitors in hypotensive patients (SBP < 90 mmHg) and/or signs of low cardiac output; experimental evidence and clinical experience suggest that catecholamines such as dobutamine are less favorable in patients with PPCM due to metabolic impairment levosimendan can be considered as the preferred inotropic agent, with continuous infusion of 0.1 µg/kg/h for 24 h without an initial bolus dose for patients with severe PPCM; if levosimendan is not available, dobutamine is the other option, while adrenaline should be avoided.
Vasopressor agents for cardiogenic shock; noradrenaline should be the first-line vasopressor.
Anticoagulation with full-dose LMWH, provided there are no contraindications;
Mechanical circulatory support as a “bridge to decision” for cardiac transplantation.

3.3.7.1. Key Points

The etiopathogenesis of PPCM has yet to be fully clarified;
Immediate diagnosis and treatment at the onset of symptoms are fundamental to ventricular recovery;
The use of prolactin inhibitors (bromocriptine or cabergoline), combined with optimized treatment for HF is differential for the recovery of ventricular function;
Approximately 50% of patients with PPCM recover myocardial function within 6-month period with therapy for HF;
Even if ventricular function is recovered, follow up should be periodic for at least 5 to 10 years, following diagnosis;
As a result of the lack of evidence regarding the actual recurrence of PPCM during subsequent gestations, there is no justification for advising against conception in patients who have truly recovered ventricular function;
Patients with PPCM who have received transplantation have an immediate and late postoperative prognosis like that of patients with other forms of dilated cardiomyopathy.

## 3.4. Ischemic Heart Disease
Ischemic heart disease (IHD) is not common during pregnancy; most publications consider acute coronary syndrome rather than stable ischemic disease. Data from the WHO have shown that the rate of acute infarction is 3.34 events per 100,000 pregnancies, it being most frequent during the third trimester of gestation. The incidence of infarction without ST-segment elevation is higher during gestation. 
Risk factors for IHD during gestation are maternal age (over 40 years old; for each year of life, there is a 20% increase in the risk of infarction), family history of premature coronary disease, tobacco use, arterial hypertension, dyslipidemia, and diabetes mellitus. 
Additional risk factors include preeclampsia, thrombophilia, postpartum infection, cocaine use, multiparity, autoimmune diseases, aortic valve stenosis/aortic valve prosthesis thrombosis, mitral stenosis, and PPH. 
The etiology of IHD during gestation differs from the general population. In a contemporary review, the mechanisms related to infarction were identified with following incidences: spontaneous coronary artery dissection (43%), atherosclerosis (27%), coronary thrombosis (17%), normal arteries on angiography (9%), vasospasm (2%), and Takotsubo syndrome (2%).
Spontaneous coronary artery dissection is the most common cause of AMI during gestation and the postpartum period, with a prevalence of around 1.81 events per 100,000 pregnancies, occurring most frequently during the third trimester. The outcome of dissection associated with pregnancy appears to have a worse prognosis than dissection unrelated to pregnancy. 
Demographic variables and associated comorbidities include the following: black race, chronic hypertension, gestational hypertension, preeclampsia, lipid abnormalities, chronic depression, migraine, advanced maternal age, first delivery, and infertility treatment. 
The etiology of coronary dissection has yet to be made clear, but it appears to be related to degradation and weakening of arterial walls, as a consequence of the influence of hormones during gestation. The most common maternal complications described are cardiogenic shock (24%), ventricular fibrillation (VF) (16%), and mechanical support (28%), which result in hospital death in 4% of cases. 
Atherosclerosis: IHD caused by atherosclerosis is linked to the presence of classic risk factors and to those referred to as emerging risk factors, including gestational hypertensive disease, gestational diabetes, history of premature delivery, autoimmune diseases (lupus erythematosus, rheumatoid arthritis, scleroderma), treatment with thorax radiotherapy/chemotherapy, and depression/general anxiety. 
Thrombosis: Coronary thrombosis, in the absence of atherosclerosis, is more probable due to hypercoagulability during pregnancy, and it may result in paradoxical embolization.
Normal arteries: Mechanisms of AMI with normal coronary arteries continue to be unclear; they include transitory coronary spasm (increased vascular reactivity and/or use of ergotamine derivatives) or undetected coronary dissection, reflecting the limitations of the diagnosis. 
Vasospasm: It may be spontaneous or induced by drugs, hypertensive syndromes during pregnancy, increased vascular reactivity to angiotensin II and norepinephrine, endothelial dysfunction, or renin release by the gravid uterus. Vasospasm may be induced by routine obstetric drugs, such as beta-agonists (terbutaline, salbutamol), inhibition of premature labor, ergot derivatives for labor induction or PPH prevention, and bromocriptine, indicated for inhibiting lactation. 
Other causes: coronary artery aneurysm related to Kawasaki disease. 
Diagnosis of AMI is not influenced by the status of pregnancy, and it includes symptoms (dyspnea and chest pain), laboratory examinations (increased troponin), ECG (specific and classic alterations of AMI), and echo (alterations in segmental wall contractility). Differential diagnosis of AMI during pregnancy should be done with pulmonary embolism, amniotic fluid embolism, dissection of the aorta, PPCM, and myocarditis. Additional examinations for diagnosis risk stratification and treatment of AMI include scintigraphy, magnetic resonance, and coronary angiography.
Patients with acute coronary syndrome should receive defined diagnosis and treatment before delivery. Therefore, in cases with chest pain or suspected acute ischemic disease, we are in favor of indicating coronary angiography, which, in addition to concluding diagnosis, increases the chance of treating the artery “responsible” for the acute ischemic condition. The risks of angiography are relatively low in relation to the benefits for planning delivery and anesthesia in these patients.
Treatment for AMI during pregnancy is similar to that of the general population, including revascularization techniques. In cases of coronary dissection, clinical treatment has been the first choice. Percutaneous or surgical intervention is reserved for cases with left coronary trunk involvement or proximal anterior descending lesion. The most frequent complications are HF and cardiogenic shock (38%), arrhythmias (12%), recurring angina and reinfarction (20%), maternal mortality (7%), and fetal death (7%). Clinical practice for cardiogenic shock and cardiorespiratory arrest follows conventional guidelines, with the strategy of emergency delivery in cases with fetal viability. 
Pharmacological treatment of AMI is similar to that recommended for the general population. Aspirin is safe in low doses; there is, however, little information regarding P2Y12 inhibitors. Clopidogrel is approved for use, but it should be suspended 7 days before delivery. There is no evidence on the benefits of using this medication for coronary dissection; additionally, glycoprotein IIb/IIIa inhibitors, bivalirudin, prasugrel, and ticagrelor are not recommended. The use of beta-blockers, excluding atenolol, has already been established for acute coronary syndrome. Recombinant tissue plasminogen activator (TPA) does not cross the placenta, but it may induce hemorrhagic complications (subplacental bleeding). Benefits of short-term heparinization probably outweigh the risk of hemorrhagic complications.
Patients with previous IHD may receive approval for subsequent pregnancy if there are no residual ischemia or signs of ventricular dysfunction. There are no high-quality data defining how much time pregnancy should be delayed following acute coronary syndrome. However, the recommendation of 12 months seems reasonable; it should be individualized according to comorbidities, cardiovascular status, and need for medical therapy.

## 3.4.1. Key Points
The growing incidence of IHD during pregnancy is due to higher maternal age and the growing presence of risk factors;
The incidence of AMI without ST-segment elevation is higher during pregnancy, and the anterior descending artery is the most affected;
The clinical picture of coronary artery dissection seems to be more severe during gestation, in comparison with the general population;
Coronary vasospasm may occur as a consequence of obstetric medications;
Symptoms, ECG, elevated serum troponin, and alterations on echo define diagnosis of acute coronary syndrome;
Coronary cineangiography should be indicated to define diagnosis and make percutaneous treatment possible;
Treatment follows the general rules, with eventual restrictions on gestation;

## 3.5. Dyslipidemia

## 3.5.1. Lipid Changes
During pregnancy, a substantial increase occurs in plasma concentration of lipoproteins, as result of the increase in circulating estrogen and progesterone. Triglycerides increase 2- or 3-fold in relation to pre-gestational values, reaching their peak by the end of gestation, with a progressive return to baseline values at the end of the postpartum period. In the same manner, there is a progressive increase in total cholesterol levels, corresponding to 2- to 5-fold before pregnancy values. Their decrease is slightly slower than that of triglycerides, and they may take longer than 6 weeks after delivery to normalize. 
Lipoprotein fractions also present qualitative increase of high density lipoprotein cholesterol (HDL-c), low density lipoprotein cholesterol (LDL-c) and amount of triglycerides. The HDL-c has slightly different behavior from total cholesterol and triglycerides, because it raises a progressive values at 24th week, of 50% in comparison with preconception period. Subsequently, it presents a drop, equivalent to 15% higher than pre-gestational values until the end of pregnancy. LDL-c levels increase in synchronization with total cholesterol. However, they showed decrease and may fall after the eighth week postpartum.
The factor responsible for these alterations in lipoproteins is the hormone estrogen. The drop in HDL-c after week 24 is understood by the increase in plasma concentration of insulin, which represents an increase in insulin resistance. It is, therefore possible to conclude that HDL-c levels are more related to estrogen levels during the first phase of gestation and to insulin during the second phase. It isrecommended that lipid profile test by postponed to, at least, 4 to 6 weeks after gestation, especially in women without previous alterations.
In an update to the Brazilian Guidelines on Dyslipidemia and Atherosclerosis Prevention, the recommendations for women of fertile age with dyslipidemia include dietary orientation and adoption of a healthy lifestyle, in addition to weight control, physical activity, and ceasing tobacco use. Therapy with statins should be avoided in women of fertile age who plan to become pregnant (class II-A; C).
Gestational hypertriglyceridemia occurs to meet maternal energy demands, as a precursor of hormones for the placenta and to provide cholesterol and essential fatty acids to the fetus. Statin therapy should not be indicated for pregnant women in the second and third trimester or in breastfeeding women (class III-C). This contraindication is due to reports of teratogenicity, although the information available in the literature is inconclusive. 
Fibrates, ezetimibe, niacin, cholesterolamine and omega-3 are considered to be drugs without contraindication, but cholesterolamine is the only one whose safety has been established. Fibrates may be used in cases of very severe hypertriglyceridemia (plasma level of triglyceride > 1,000 mg/dL), with risk/benefit analysis for pregnant women (high maternal and fetal mortality due to acute pancreatitis). However, dietary control should be the treatment of choice for pregnant women (class IIA; C); in extreme cases, apheresis may be recommended. 
Regarding omega-3 fatty acids, pregnant and breastfeeding women should advised to introduce omega-3-rich fish, from deep water and with low mercury levels, into their diets. Salmon, mackerel, herring, sardines, tuna and trout are recommended. There are no studies on supplementation (capsules) and phytosterols during gestation.
Genetic dyslipidemias should be considered, both hypertriglyceridemia with frequent pancreatic complications and familial hypercholesterolemia. Apheresis is a special therapeutic approach to these severe circumstances; in familial cases, selective LDL-apheresis is used. 
Until recently it was accepted that dyslipidemia during pregnancy should be considered physiological, to the extent that lipid profile testing is not part of the prenatal routine. Recently, however, fatty striae have been described in the aorta of dyslipidemic mother fetuses. Based on these observations, it has been suggested that maternal cardiometabolic dysfunction may not only contribute to long-term maternal effects, but it may also lead to a risk of atherosclerosis in future generations. These considerations suggest that diagnosis and treatment of dyslipidemias should be performed prior to conception, and they should continue during gestation and the postpartum period. 

## 3.5.2. Key Points
Increases occur in triglycerides and cholesterol during pregnancy;
The use of statins is not recommended, although there is some controversy regarding their teratogenic effects;
Maternal dyslipidemia may induce fetal atherosclerosis and atherosclerosis in future generations.

## 3.6. Other Diseases

## 3.6.1. Takayasu Arteritis
Takayasu arteritis is a chronic, idiopathic vasculitis that predominantly affects the aorta and its main branches, coronary arteries, and the pulmonary artery. The resulting inflammatory process causes narrowing, occlusion, and aneurysm in the affected branches. Etiology of the disease is unknown, but several studies have demonstrated an association with human leukocyte antigens, suggesting a predisposition to the immune-mediated process. 

3.6.1.1. Prevalence

Takayasu arteritis is a rare disease, with growing rates of prevalence. The highest rates occur in Japan, with 100 to 200 new cases annually. Women are more affected, in 80% to 90% of cases; the onset of the disease occurs between 10 and 40 years of age, overlapping with the fertile period of life, and gestation demands special attention. It is the most frequently observed form of vasculitis during pregnancy, precisely because it appears in young patients. Maternal immune activation during pregnancy may influence the course of the disease and impair maternal and fetal outcome. 

3.6.1.2. Prognosis

Pregnancy in patients with Takayasu arteritis has an uncertain prognosis. Although the majority of gestations are successful, the incidence of severe hypertension and preeclampsia is 40% higher, when compared to 8% in the general population. Obstetric complications, such as premature delivery and stillbirth, are foreseen. Patients with renal artery and abdominal aorta involvement more frequently have complications of preeclampsia and IUGR. 
The rarest maternal complications, which are, however, very severe, are aortic aneurysm, stroke, HF, aortic insufficiency, myocardial infarction, and dissection of the aorta. Other, more common complications include progression of renal insufficiency, anemia, thrombocytopenia, and elevated inflammatory markers. 

3.6.1.3. Treatment

Treatment of vasculitis during pregnancy is conventional, excluding three teratogenic medications, namely, methotrexate, mycophenolate and cyclophosphamide. Other medications are considered compatible with gestation. It is preferable to use immunosuppressive drugs to control active vasculitis, reserving prednisone for a short-duration regime in moderate doses during the acute phase or in cases where the disease worsens. Treatment may be initiated before conception and maintained during pregnancy and lactation. 
Tumor necrosis factor inhibitors may be continued during the preconception, pregnancy and lactation. These inhibitors, when their composition is based on immunoglobulin G (IgG), cross the placenta from 16th of gestation with a progressive increase in transference nearby term of gestation. Therefore, these drugs should not be administered after 30th week of gestation, but they should be reintroduced in the postpartum period. 

3.6.1.4. Key Points

Pregnancy is allowed when disease is in remission, because vasculitis has severe prognosis;
Treatment with corticosteroids and immunosuppressive drugs (azathioprine, cyclosporine, and tacrolimus) improves maternal-fetal evolution;
In cases of systemic vasculitis, seeing that the risk of thromboembolic events is elevated, prevention with aspirin or LMWH should be considered;
Takayasu arteritis should always be considered in differential diagnosis of arterial hypertension during pregnancy;
Contraception should be efficacious and safe during treatment with high doses of cytotoxic drugs.

## 3.6.2. Kawasaki Disease
Kawasaki disease is a systemic vasculitis of unknown etiology that occurs in children up to 5 years of age, with Asian prevalence and a male predominance of 1.5 para 1. During the acute phase, inflammatory involvement of coronary arteries results in clinical outcomes and provokes aneurysm formations in 15% to 25% of untreated children. It is one of the main causes of heart disease acquired during childhood. 
Coronary artery aneurysms may be detected early on echo and loss of laminar flow in these arteries may favor clot formation.
Disease prognosis is related to presence and size of coronary artery aneurysms. Small aneurysms have favorable prognosis, with low risk of myocardial ischemic events. In contrast, large and giant aneurysms (internal diameter > 8 mm) present a high risk of thrombosis and, consequently, myocardial infarction, arrhythmias, and sudden death. 
Lack of diagnosis and treatment during the acute phase in childhood has contributed to the finding of women with vascular sequelae of Kawasaki disease during fertile age and pregnancy. , The influence of the hypercoagulable and hyperkinetic states inherent to pregnancy, delivery, and the postpartum period represents a potential risk of severe events, such as thrombosis, myocardial infarction, and sudden death, throughout the natural history of women with complicated Kawasaki disease with coronary aneurysms. In addition to this, pregnancy, per se, favors the risk of coronary artery rupture and/or dissection, as a result of specific changes in the artery walls, which include fragmentation of reticular fibers, reduction of mucopolysaccharides and loss of normal elastic fibers ripple.
In keeping with this logic, it is accepted that the state of hypercoagulability during pregnancy and the postpartum period requires permanent anticoagulation. Therefore, low-dose aspirin (80 mg daily) up 36th week of gestation combined with anticoagulation, should be considered. LMWH is recommended during the first trimester and after week 36 of gestation, with low doses of warfarin in the interval between these 2 periods. In the literature, there is a lack of data regarding targets for prevention; nonetheless, the consensus is that INR around 2 is safe and presumably efficacious.
Previous myocardial infarction increases the risk of gestation, and ventricular function is a determining factor for maternal evolution. Beta-blocker (propranolol or metoprolol succinate) use in low doses favors lower oxygen consumption, as a function of less cardiac work.

3.6.2.1. Preconception Evaluation

In risk stratification for future pregnancy, the presence of coronary artery aneurysm, myocardial ischemia, and ventricular dysfunction should be considered.

3.6.2.2. Key Points

Existence of moderate coronary aneurysm (> 3 mm and < 6 mm) in one or more arteries indicates permanent use of low doses of aspirin;
Giant (> 8 mm) or multiple aneurysms, in addition to aspirin, require association with an anticoagulant;
In cases of myocardial ischemia, association of aspirin, an anticoagulant, and/or CCB is recommended.

## 3.6.3. Pulmonary Hypertension
PH is a physiopathological condition that leads to debilitating symptoms and lower life expectancy, caused by compromised pulmonary circulation. It is defined as average resting pulmonary artery pressure (PAP) ≥ 25 mmHg, measured by right heart catheterization. It is a progressive disease, predominant in the female sex, and it may occur during the reproductive period. In general, it leads to right ventricular insufficiency with a risk of death during pregnancy, but especially during the postpartum period. , 
Pregnancy in women with PH is considered high risk and maternal and the neonatal complications rate achieve 50 to 70% respectively, and it has been associated with mortality rates reaching nearly 30%. In view of this, pregnancy is contraindicated.
Physiological changes of pregnancy, especially the decreased peripheral vascular resistance, increased cardiac output, and hypercoagulability, are reasons for maternal hemodynamic instability. In addition to this, there is the activity of sex hormones, such as beta-estradiol, progesterone, and testosterone, in pulmonary circulation; on one hand, they attenuate pulmonary vasoconstriction, and, on the other hand, they activate angiogenic factors that stimulate the proliferation of smooth muscle cells in pulmonary vasculature, predisposing them to reverse vascular remodeling.
This physiopathological complexity of PH during gestation may be resumed in a single primary aspect, namely, the compensatory physiological vasodilatory response of pulmonary vasculature, which becomes decreased or absent, leading to a significant increase in pulmonary pressure and resistance. The inability of the pulmonary vascular bed to accommodate increased cardiac output results in significant disproportion in right ventricular afterload and failure. 
The classification of PH was simplistic, divided into two groups: primary and secondary, according to identification of risk factors. However, since 1998, the WHO has proposed modifications to the classification of PH in order to allow different types of the disease to be grouped based on their physiopathology, response to treatment, and prognosis ( ). It is worth remembering that, in this classification, the term PAH is described as a subgroup of PH, characterized by left ventricular filling pressure < 15 mmHg and pulmonary vascular resistance > 3 Wood units.

 

Regarding diagnosis of PH, symptoms such as dyspnea, chest pain, lower limb edema, palpitation, and dry cough may be attributed to pregnancy, but the presence of syncope attributes more severity to the disease. ECG and chest X-ray show right chamber overload. Transthoracic echo estimates PAP, evaluates right ventricular function, and identifies other structural heart diseases, making it possible to classify the type of PH. Definitive diagnosis is done by means of right heart catheterization and pressure measurements. , 
Family planning in patients with PH includes advising against pregnancy by clarifying the maternal and fetal risks, as well as the choice of an efficacious and safe means of contraception. There is no evidence to date regarding a pulmonary arterial pressure level (cutoff point) for determining prognosis for a future pregnancy.
However, the pregnancy outcome is very different when subgroups for classification of PH are taken into consideration. It is worth emphasizing that patients included in category 2 ( ), such as those with mitral stenosis, aortic stenosis, and cardiomyopathies, receive different treatment and counseling than patients included in the other categories.
For this reason, risk stratification according to category and treatment strategy for pregnancy should receive interdisciplinary support in a tertiary hospital that has specialists in PH, so that the best practice may be adopted.
Excluding pregnant women included in category 2, the first proposal over the course of the first trimester in patients with PAH is to interrupt pregnancy, with an emphasis on clarifying the risks of maintaining pregnancy and those of therapeutic abortion procedure. In the event that the patient does not accept this advice, the following practice is currently recommended: 
Weekly interdisciplinary consultation starting at week 16 of gestation;
Individualized pharmacological therapy for PH;
Periodic evaluation of ECG, echo, and BNP during the second and third trimesters;
Hospitalization starting at week 28 for therapy with intermittent oxygen in accordance with arterial oxygen saturation, anticoagulation, maternal-fetal monitoring, and delivery planning;
Route of delivery is indicated by the obstetrician;
General anesthesia is preferable;
Anesthesia with blocks (epidural or spinal anesthesia) is contraindicated.
Recommended pharmacological therapy is use of prostacyclins and their analogues and type 5 phosphodiesterase inhibitors, which seem to be safe during gestation. CCB are a safe and efficacious alternative for the subgroup of patients who present documented vasoreactivity and NYHA FC I/II without severe ventricular dysfunction; nevertheless, it is necessary to be attentive to their negative inotropic effects, in addition to arterial hypotension, which may limit their use. , 
Parenteral prostaglandins are recommended in patients in NYHA FC IV or patients who show evidence of severe right ventricular involvement. Most experience is with intravenous epoprostenol. In patients with preserved ventricular function who are in NYHA FC I/II, inhaled prostaglandins, such as Ilosprost, may be indicated. Parenteral prostaglandins may be combined with oral phosphodiesterase inhibitors, with satisfactory results. 
Endothelin receptor blockers and soluble guanylate cyclase stimulators are contraindicated in pregnancy. , Intravenous prostaglandins may be considered during delivery, with invasive monitoring via CVC and arterial access.
It is worth remembering that a large number of maternal deaths occur during the postpartum period, with the following causes standing out: HF due to right ventricular failure, hypoxemia, and thromboembolism (pulmonary thrombosis in situ). Therefore, anticoagulation is essential, with therapeutic doses of LMWH (1 mg/kg every 12 h) during the first trimester and after 36th week of gestation and, warfarin in a daily dose, INR target of 2, another other periods (Figura 6).

3.6.3.1. Key Points

Diagnosis of PAH should be confirmed by right chamber catheterization.
Pregnancy should be advised against in women with PAH;
Categories of PH according to current classification have different prognoses and treatments;
The proposal to interrupt pregnancy should be considered in patients with PH during the first trimester, except in patients in category 2;
In pregnancy in maintained, the prenatal care and delivery should be at a tertiary hospital with specialized PH staff;
Current pharmacological therapy has assisted in successful pregnancy in PH.

## 3.6.4. Aortic Diseases
Aortic diseases may be present in women of reproductive age, and they are considered to be important causes of complication and even death during gestation. This is due to 3 physiological phenomena of pregnancy that have detrimental impacts of aortic diseases. These phenomena are hemodynamic (increased cardiac output), structural (progressive aortic root growth until the third trimester), and hormonal (vascular wall fragility). The following are the most frequent causes of aortic disease in pregnant women: bicuspid valve, Marfan syndrome, coarctation of the aorta, Ehlers-Danlos syndrome, Turner syndrome, and Loeys-Dietz syndrome.

3.6.4.1. Aortic Dissection and Rupture

Gestation increases a woman’s susceptibility to dissection and rupture of the aorta. In the general population, the incidence of aortic dissection is 6 cases per 100,000 individuals yearly; nevertheless, during pregnancy, the occurrence increases 100-fold, to approximately 0.6%.For this reason, diagnosis of aortic dissection should be considered in all patients with chest pain during pregnancy. It occurs more frequently during the last trimester (50%) or the initial postpartum period (33%). 
Marfan syndrome is the most common conjunctive tissue disease, caused by a mutation in the FBN-1 gene, which codifies the inherited glycoprotein fibrillin in an autosomal dominant pattern. Average increase in aortic diameter growth during gestation in patients with Marfan syndrome is 0.3 mm/month, while in the general population with Marfan syndrome, it is 0.38 mm/year. This increased rate of aortic dilatation decreases after delivery, but it remains higher than the pre-gestational rate. 
Diagnosis includes history, physical examination, echo, and magnetic resonance of the aorta. Thoracic aortic angiography complements investigation when there is strong suspicion of dissection based on previous examinations.
One of the most important factors for determining the risk of dissection of the aorta is maximum diameter (< 40 mm, 1% risk of dissection; > 40 mm, 10% risk of dissection). Pregnancy is generally contraindicated if the ascending aorta diameter is greater than 40 mm in patients with family history of dissection or sudden death, even though the exact dimension is still a question of debate. There seems to be a low incidence of dissection if aorta diameter is lower than 4.5 cm; pregnancy, however, increases the late risk of aortic complications. , , 
One important consideration is body surface area, especially in small women. Aorta diameter index higher than 27 mm/m is associated with a high risk of dissection, and prophylactic replacement of the aortic root should be considered. 
It is also necessary to evaluate associated cardiovascular problems, including the possibility of aortic regurgitation and mitral valve prolapse with associated regurgitation.
Beta-blockers have been shown to increase aortic distensibility and reduce pulse wave velocity and reducing the rate of complications such as regurgitation, dissection, and congestive HF. A 20% decrease in resting heart rate is considered to be the objective of treatment. 
Periodic echocardiographic monitoring is recommended every 6 to 8 weeks to monitor the size of the mother’s aortic root; the interval depends on initial echocardiographic findings. 
The preferred route of delivery is cesarean in patients with aortic dilatation > 45 mm, and delivery should take place in a tertiary center where there is an experienced surgery team. In patients with diameters < 45 mm, with no previous events, delivery may be vaginal, with early analgesia and relief forceps.
Preconception counseling requires determination of the underlying disease, genetic evaluation, and aortic dilatation correction in accordance withdiameter thresholds ( ).

 

Ehlers-Danlos syndrome type IV occurs with severe vascular complications, with characteristics of autosomal dominant inheritance and 50% risk of transmission to offspring.
Maternal mortality is significant, and it is related to uterine rupture and dissection of the great arteries and veins. Pregnancy is, therefore, considered a high-risk situation, and it is not advised (WHO risk IV); in this manner, when contemplating pregnancy, these women should be advised in a shared decision-making process. 
In vascular Ehlers-Danlos syndrome, also a rare severe conjunctive tissue disease, characterized by fragile vascular tissue, vascular rupture has been related during pregnancy in up to 50% of cases, with mortality rates between 5% and 50%. Gestation, in these cases, is also associated with premature rupture of fetal membranes, spontaneous abortion, and prematurity. 
Turner syndrome is the most common sexual chromosome abnormality in women, and it occurs in 1 of every 1,500 to 2,500 female live births. Chromosome constitution may be absence of an X chromosome (karyotype 45,X) or chromosome mosaicism (karyotype 45,X/46,XX), as well as other structural anomalies of chromosome X. Turner syndrome is associated with increased risk of heart disease, aortic dilatation, hypertension, diabetes mellitus, and atherosclerotic disease events. 
Dissection of the aorta in patients with Turner syndrome is estimated to be 36 in 100,000 cases, but it is 6 times more common in younger age ranges than in the general population. Risk factors include dilatation of the aorta, bicuspid aortic valve, and coarctation of the aorta. Pregnancy should be avoided when aortic size index is > 25 mm/m . Furthermore, after aortic root surgery, patients continue to be at a risk of a type B dissection.
Although spontaneous pregnancy may occur in patients with Turner mosaic (0.5% to 10%), it is more common with assisted fertility. For this reason, cardiovascular evaluation is recommended before beginning fertility treatment. Furthermore, good blood pressure and diabetes control during pregnancy is mandatory for all patients with Turner syndrome. 
Loeys-Dietz syndrome is an autosomal dominant condition. It was described for the first time in 2005, and it is associated with formation or dissection of an aneurysm in the aorta or in other arteries, generally at a young age. It has been identified in individuals referred for investigation for Marfan syndrome or vascular Ehlers-Danlos syndrome who did not present the classical characteristics of these conditions, but rather others characteristics, including general arterial tortuosity, hypertelorism, bifid/broad uvula, or cleft palate. 
The syndrome results in mutations in the genes that codify components of the transforming growth factor beta (TGF-beta) signaling pathway. Aortic pathology is particularly concerning in this condition, but other vascular abnormalities may also be present. 
Significant maternal morbimortality has been described in patients with Loeys-Dietz syndrome, but it is possible for pregnancy to be successful and free of complications. Nonetheless, all patients with this condition should, at present, be treated as high-risk during pregnancy and the postpartum period, until reliable risk prediction tools become available. 
There are no studies on the benefits and risks of cesarean delivery in comparison with vaginal delivery in patients with hereditary aortic disease. Cesarean delivery is, nonetheless, recommended, according to the aortic dilatation thresholds shown in . Vaginal delivery may be considered in cases below these limits.

3.6.4.2. Key Points

Aortic diseases constitute an important cause of maternal death during the pregnancy-postpartum cycle;
Pregnancy increases women’s susceptibility to aortic dissection and rupture;
Pregnancy planning includes diagnosis of the underlying disease, magnetic resonance of the aorta and base vessels, eventual corrective aortic surgery in accordance with limits for risk of dissection, and genetic counseling;
The occurrence of dissection of the aorta with a viable fetus (> 28 weeks of gestation) indicates emergency cesarean delivery; if, however, the fetus is not viable, the case should proceed to cardiac surgery and maintain the pregnancy;
Women with Ehlers-Danlos, Turner, or Loeys-Dietz syndrome, in addition to the high risk of dissection of the aorta, are exposed to complicated events, such as hypertension, diabetes, and other aneurysms, which, in conjunction, represent a significant increase in maternal death during pregnancy.

## 3.6.5. Chagas Disease

3.6.5.1. Prevalence

Global estimated prevalence of T. cruzi infection in pregnant women has varied from 1% to 40%, with approximately 1.8 million women of fertile age infected in Latin America. In Brazil, the prevalence of infection in pregnant women is accepted to be 1.1%, with a vertical transmission rate of 1.7%. , 

3.6.5.2. Diagnosis and Practice for Cases with T. cruzi Infection during Gestation

Serological evaluation for T. cruzi infection is recommended during prenatal care in pregnant women who reside in or come from endemic areas and in those who have received blood transfusions in these regions. , The most frequently used tests are based on higher sensitivity and specificity for detecting T. cruzi infection. They include enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA); indirect hemagglutination (IHA), and indirect immunofluorescence (IF). Transmission may occur at any moment during pregnancy, but specific antiparasitic treatment for T. cruzi infection is contraindicated during gestation and breastfeeding, owing to teratogenicity in animals. Accidental exposure to benzonidazol does not indicate adverse effects in the newborn, and it is not a criterion for interrupting gestation. 
Elevated maternal parasitemia is associated with a greater risk of vertical transmission and miscarriage. For this reason, during the acute phase of Chagas disease, pregnant women should be individually evaluated, and the decision to initiate antiparasitic treatment should be based on the risk-benefit ratio.
Evidence of T. cruzi infection does not justify indicating cesarean delivery, even though congenital T. cruzi infection may result in uterine growth restriction and prematurity. , It is worth emphasizing the importance of proceeding to recommended evaluations during prenatal care, including anti-HIV tests. Simultaneous infection with T. cruzi and HIV represents an increased risk of congenital transmission of T. cruzi owing to elevated parasitemia, which also implies higher perinatal morbimortality. , After delivery, women should be referred for clinical evaluation and specific treatment. shows indications for practice in Chagas disease during pregnancy. 

 

3.6.5.3. Chronic Chagas Heart Disease

Chagas heart disease, in its indeterminate form, does not present any additional risks to pregnancy, whereas forms with ventricular or arrhythmogenic dysfunction are associated with complications such as HF, thromboembolism, and complex arrhythmias. In these cases, pregnancy is considered high-risk, and it is advised against at times, depending on the degree of cardiac involvement, which may be established by echo with 24-Holter monitoring.

3.6.5.4. Vertical Transmission of Trypanosoma cruzi

Vertical transmission (from mother to child) of T. cruzi depends on the degree of parasitemia; transplacentally, it may occur at any stage (acute or chronic) of the disease, which requires treatment prior to gestation in infected women of fertile age. It is worth emphasizing that vertical transmission may recur during the reproductive period, and detection of vertical transmission in practice is complicated, given that most congenital cases are asymptomatic. Cases of congenital Chagas disease are considered acute, and it is compulsory to notify them within disease surveillance programs. , , 
During the acute phase of Chagas disease, there exists a possibility of transmission through breast milk, whereas, during the chronic phase, transmission occurs during lactation in cases of bleeding from fissures in the nipple rather than through milk itself.

3.6.5.5. Reactivation of Chagas Disease

During gestation, mechanisms and immunological alterations in the maternal organism may favor the reactivation of chronic Chagas disease in previously infected cases. Reactivation is defined by positivity on the following examinations, regardless of other signs and symptoms:
Presence of the parasite in direct microscopic examination of blood or biological secretions, such as cerebrospinal fluid, pleura, pericardium, and ascitic fluid;
Histopathological examination of tissue lesions (panniculitis, myocarditis, encephalitis, enteritis, colpitis) with parasite nests found in acute inflammatory infiltrates.

3.6.5.6. Breastfeeding

Suspending lactation is not recommended in women in the postpartum period with chronic Chagas disease, except in cases with breast fissure, in situations with elevated parasitemia, or in women in the acute phase of the disease. 
If a breastfeeding child is exposed to milk from an infected mother, either in the acute or chronic form, with nipple fissures, the child should be monitored for acquisition of T. cruzi infection during the exposure period. In some cases, it is possible to consider thermal treatment of breast milk before administration to the child. , , 
Lactation should be suspended in cases of T. cruzi and HIV coinfection, given that lactation, regardless of association with Chagas disease, is associated with a 7% to 22% additional risk of HIV transmission. Similarly, in cases of acute maternal HIV infection, natural breastfeeding increases the probability of vertical transmission of the virus to 29%. In Brazil, mothers have the right to receive infant milk formula until their children are at least 6 months old. , 

3.6.5.7. Key Points

Serological evaluation is recommended for all pregnant women who are positive for the disease;
The risks to gestation depend on the clinical form of Chagas disease;
Pregnancy may favor reactivation of the disease;
Breastfeeding should not be advised against;
Antiparasitic treatment is contraindicated during gestation and breastfeeding;
Route of delivery is indicated by the obstetrician.

## 4. Hypertensive syndromes

## 4.1. Introduction
Hypertensive syndromes during gestation are considered to be a public health problem, with an expressive rate of maternal and fetal mortality, in both developed and developing countries. It is the most common medical complication, and it affects 5% to 10% of pregnancies worldwide.
Preeclampsia occurs in approximately 3% of all pregnancies in the United States, where it is responsible for 9% of maternal deaths. Its incidence has shown a 25% increase over the past 2 decades. In recent years, an increase has been registered in the proportion of women with preeclampsia. In 2009, it was 2.2%; in 2013, it was 5.58%, and over the past 5 years, 22.5% suffered a severe general complication. 
Although research has evolved in the area of hypertensive syndromes during gestation, its etiology remains unknown. The methodological challenges to research related to preeclampsia are numerous; they include defining hypertension, level of severity, and physiopathology during pregnancy. These data probably interfere with research and outcomes, which justifies the following recommendations.

## 4.2. Recommendations for Measuring Arterial Pressure
Blood pressure measurement devices in pregnant women must be accurate and validated for this special population. The cuff should be appropriately sized 1.5 times the circumference of the arm.
Blood pressure should be measured with the patient sitting. The patient should rest for at least five minutes before measurement. Measurement may also take place in the left lateral decubitus position, while resting, and it should not differ from the measurement taken in the seated position;
It is necessary to consider Korotkoff phase V to determine diastolic arterial pressure (DAP); 
White coat hypertension and masked hypertension are considered to be relatively common presentations during pregnancy. They occur in at least 1/3 of pregnant women, to the extent that ABPM and home blood pressure monitoring (HBPM) are useful complementary examinations for making the clinical decisions which are fundamental to avoiding treatments which are unnecessary and potentially harmful to the fetus; , 
Pregnant women with SAP ≥ 140 mmHg and/or DAP ≥ 90 mmHg are considered hypertensive;
Severity of hypertension during pregnancy is assessed based on the occurrence of target organ involvement, as well as arterial pressure level; 
Severe hypertension is defined based on pressure levels ≥ 160/110 mmHg, which are associated with increased risk of stroke in pregnant women. , , 

## 4.3. Classification
The most widely used classification for hypertensive syndromes during gestation is the one adopted by the Report of the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists’ Task Force on Hypertension in Pregnancy, which is also applied in the Brazilian Cardiology Society’s Guidelines on Pregnancy in Women with Heart Disease ( ). In accordance with this classification, syndromes are classified in the following manner:

 

Chronic, preexisting hypertension (due to any cause);
Preeclampsia/eclampsia;
Chronic hypertension with superimposed preeclampsia;
Gestational hypertension.
Based on this position, classification into 4 categories will be maintained, emphasizing the importance of other presentations of arterial hypertension, such as the following:
White coat hypertension;
Masked hypertension;
Transitory gestational hypertension occurs without the development of preeclampsia; arterial pressure normalizes within 12 weeks postpartum and it is resolved without treatment; , 
Postpartum hypertension generally arises between 2 weeks and 6 months after delivery. It is mild and labile, and it normalizes within the first year. It may be related to persistent gestational hypertension, preeclampsia, or chronic hypertension, or it may be secondary to other causes; 
Unclassified prenatal hypertension is the term used when the first pressure measurement is recorded after week 20, and it is not clear if it is chronic or preexisting; diagnosis is only established during postpartum reevaluation between weeks 6 and 12. 

## 4.3.1. Chronic, Preexisting (Essential or Secondary) Hypertension
This occurs when arterial pressure is ≥ 140/90 mmHg (preexisting hypertension; in general, essential hypertension or hypertension diagnosed before week 20 of pregnancy). It is commonly diagnosed around the first trimester or right at the beginning of the second. It is associated with adverse maternal and fetal outcomes; there should, therefore, be more rigorous control of maternal arterial pressure (110 to 140/85 mmHg), monitoring fetal growth and repeatedly evaluating the development of preeclampsia and maternal complications. 
Hypertension may not be diagnosed in many women whose first prenatal consultations occur during the second trimester. Pregnant women may be considered normotensive during the initial phase of gestation, due to the physiological decrease in arterial pressure during the first trimester of pregnancy, in the same manner that an increase in arterial pressure may be diagnosed as gestational hypertension, because pressure levels were not verified before week 20 of gestation. Chronic hypertension usually persists until 42 days postpartum. 
Diagnosis of chronic hypertension can only be made correctly once arterial pressure has been reevaluated after 6 to 12 weeks postpartum. 

## 4.3.2. Preeclampsia/Eclampsia
This is a complex hypertensive syndrome, and it may deteriorate rapidly and without warning; classifying it as “mild” or “severe” is not recommended. Diagnosis occurs with the appearance of hypertension, with onset from week 20 of gestation, with one or more of the following related conditions:
Proteinuria (> 0.3 g/24 h) and/or maternal organic dysfunctions, such as evidence of maternal acute renal lesions (creatinine ≥ 1 mg/dL);
Hepatic dysfunction (elevated hepatic transaminases, > 40 IU/L);
With or without abdominal pain (upper quadrant or epigastric);
Neurological complications (including eclampsia, altered mental state, blindness, stroke, clonus, intense headaches, persistent visual scotoma);
Hemolysis or thrombocytopenia and/or uteroplacental dysfunction (restricted fetal growth, abnormal analysis of umbilical artery Doppler waveform or stillbirth).
The existence of proteinuria is not mandatory for diagnosis, and it may occur for the first time during the intrapartum period. In this manner, it is ideal to identify pregnant women with a risk of developing preeclampsia. Recommendations for screening, such as investigating proteinuria to this end, are fallible; the only consensual routine is to measure arterial pressure regularly during prenatal consultations. , 

4.3.2.1 HELLP Syndrome (Hemolysis, Elevated Liver Enzymes, and Low Platelet Count)

This is a severe manifestation of preeclampsia, and it should not be considered as a separate entity.

## 4.3.3. Chronic (Preexisting) Hypertension with Superimposed Preeclampsia
This occurs in 25% of pregnant women with chronic hypertension. It is diagnosed when a pregnant woman with chronic essential hypertension develops maternal organic dysfunctions compatible with preeclampsia. As a routine increase in arterial pressure may occur after week 20 of gestation, elevations in arterial pressure alone do not qualify for diagnosis of superimposed preeclampsia, in the same manner that restricted fetal growth may be part of the clinical picture of chronic hypertension.
In cases of kidney disease with underlying proteinuria, an increase in proteinuria is also not a diagnostic parameter for superimposed preeclampsia; if, however, there is no preexisting proteinuria, its appearance within the context of elevated arterial pressure is sufficient for diagnosis.

## 4.3.4. Gestational Hypertension
Gestational hypertension is a recent hypertension that arises after week 20 of gestation, in the absence of proteinuria, without any biochemical or hematological abnormalities. It is generally not accompanied by IUGR, and outcomes are frequently positive; however, approximately one quarter of women with gestational hypertension (especially those who present before week 34) evolve to preeclampsia and present unfavorable outcomes. In general, it resolves itself within 6 weeks postpartum. 

4.3.4.1. Key Points

Consider hypertensive pregnant women, when SBP ≥ 140 mmHg and/or DBP ≥ 90 mmHg;
Define as severe hypertension when blood pressure levels ≥ 160 x ≥ 110 mmHg. These levels are associated with increased risk of stroke in pregnant women;
Pre-existing Chronic Hypertension (Essential or Secondary) should have tighter control of maternal blood pressure (BP = 110 - 140/85 mmHg), monitoring fetal growth and repeatedly evaluating the development of preeclampsia and maternal complications;
Preeclampsia/Eclampsia – complex hypertensive syndrome, may deteriorate rapidly and without warning. Not recommend classifying it as "mild" or "severe";
Proteinuria is not mandatory for diagnosis and may occur for the first time during the intrapartum period or early postpartum.

## 4.4. Treatment of Gestational Hypertension Syndrome

## 4.4.1. Non-pharmacological Treatment269
Considering pregnant women with SAP ≥ 140 mmHg or DAP ≥ 90 mmHg hypertensive, the following recommendations are applied:
Routinely, there is no indication for rest in pregnant women with gestational hypertension syndrome (GHS); 
Physical exercise is recommended for at least 3 days per week, with an average of 50 min per session, including aerobic, strength, and flexibility training;
Physical activity with moderate exercise may be continued in women who are already accustomed to practice; 
Diet should be healthy, rich in nutrients, proteins, fibers, and cereals;
Calcium supplementation, between 1.5 and 2.0 g daily, is necessary, especially in areas with low dietary calcium ingestion;
Weight gain in pregnant women is based on pre-gestational body mass index (BMI): 
– BMI of 25 kg/m2 (normal): weight gain from 11.2 to 15.9 kg;
– BMI of 25 to 29.9 kg/m2(overweight): weight gain from 6.8 to 11.2 kg;
– BMI ≥ 30 kg/m2 (obese): weight gain of 6.8 kg.

The following are not recommended:

Any type of low-calorie diet, even in obese women, because low-calorie diets may lead to fetal growth retardation;
Salt restriction during gestation with the intention of preventing GHS or low sodium (less than 100 mEq daily) diets in pregnant women with chronic arterial hypertension;
Use of dietary supplements (magnesium; vitamins C, E, and D; fish or algae oil; or garlic) with the goal of preventing GHS.

## 4.4.2. When to Treat – Target Arterial Pressure
In international consensuses, there are points of divergence regarding the beginning of pharmacological treatment for GHS. , - This notwithstanding, the prevailing recommendation is to begin oral anti-hypertensive drugs in GHS when SAP is 140 to 155 mmHg and DAP is 90 to 105 mmHg, measured during a consultation, or when arterial pressure is ≥ 135/85 mmHg at home. Specifically, in cases of chronic hypertension, gestational hypertension, or preeclampsia, anti-hypertensive therapy is recommended if SAP is ≥ 140 mmHg or DAP ≥ 90 mmHg. , 
Treatment with anti-hypertensive drugs should maintain arterial pressure at 110 to 140/80 to 85 mmHg, and treatment should be reduced or ceased if DAP is ≤ 80 mmHg. An abrupt drop in maternal arterial pressure, by more than 25% of the initial value, increases the risk of hypoperfusion in maternal target organs and low blood flow to the fetus.
The primary objective of treating hypertension in GHS is to prevent stroke, progression of preexisting kidney disease, or other lesions in target organs, while preserving uteroplacental circulation. Pressure levels should be correlated to the gestational period in course, observing the physiological changes that occur with each gestational trimester, such as the increased glomerular filtration rate, which interferes in bioavailability of drugs during gestation. , 
In women with chronic hypertension, to date, there is not enough evidence to demonstrate that, by reaching or maintaining a specific (ideal) arterial pressure level or by using a specific anti-hypertensive drug, it is possible to decrease the risk of developing superimposed preeclampsia. - 
The latest systematic review by Cochrane concluded that data are insufficient to determine the benefits of anti-hypertensive medications for mild to moderate hypertension (SAP from 140 to 169 mmHg and DAP from 90 to 109 mmHg) during gestation; more research is, therefore, necessary. Treatment with anti-hypertensive drugs, however, decreases the risk of severe arterial hypertension, but not of preeclampsia, IUGR, premature placental detachment, or adverse neonatal outcomes.
The international multicenter randomized clinical trial Control of Hypertension in Pregnancy Study (CHIPS) with pregnant women who were non proteinuric and whose hypertension was “non severe” (arterial pressure = 140 to 159/90 to 109 mmHg), demonstrated that “less tight” pressure control, with DAP target of 100 mmHg versus “tight” control with DAP target of 85 mmHg showed a correlation with a higher incidence of severe hypertension (arterial pressure ≥ 160/110 mmHg), with preeclampsia, fetal loss, low birth weight, prematurity, and hospitalization in neonatal ICU. , 

## 4.4.3. Oral Anti-hypertensive Drugs- Chronic Hypertension /Gestational Hypertension
All anti-hypertensive medications cross the placental barrier; for this reasons, the use of pharmacological therapy during pregnancy requires risk-benefit analysis with individualized treatment. , 
In Brazil, the available oral medications that are usually used are methyldopa, beta-blockers (except atenolol), hydralazine, and CCB (nifedipine, amlodipine, and verapamil). Initial anti-hypertensive therapy to pregnant women with gestational hypertension or chronic hypertension should be with monotherapy, with first-line drugs, - such as methyldopa, CCB, long-acting oral nifedipine, and beta-blockers (except atenolol).
If ideal blood pressure levels are not achieved, the association with second-line oral medications: clonidine, hydralazine and thiazide diuretics should be considered. , The potential of diuretics to cause depletion of intravascular volume and therefore compromise placental uterine circulation, IUGR or oligohydramnios, is not supported in more recent randomized studies and in a systematic review of diuretics for the prevention of preeclampsia. , - 
1st line drugs should be considered:
Sympathetic nervous system inhibitors (centrally acting alpha-2-adrenergic receptor agonist): decrease blood pressure by reducing peripheral vascular resistance. They can change the heart rate and output. A-Methyldopa is the best studied antihypertensive drug in pregnancy. , However, methyldopa has only a mild antihypertensive effect, with a slow onset of action (3 to 6 h) and with an average duration of 6 hours. to 8 hours. The most common dose-dependent maternal side effects are drowsiness and dry mouth. Dose independent agents include elevated liver enzymes in up to 5% of women and autoimmune hemolytic anemia. The recommended starting dose is 250 mg, 2 or 3 times a day (maximum dose 3 g/day);
Calcium channel blockers (BCC): oral nifedipine does not appear to be teratogenic. - , - , , Clinical trials demonstrate that blood flow in the umbilical artery is not affected. Maternal side effects with the use of BCC include tachycardia, palpitations, peripheral edema, headaches and facial flushing. Experience with nifedipine has been favorable. Although not specifically licensed for pregnancy, it is recommended and its use together with labetalol and methyldopa. The maximum daily dose of nifedipine is 120 mg, divided into three or four doses or 30-60 mg once daily (prolonged release). - Administration by sublingual route is contraindicated because it determines an unpredictable hypotensive response, excessive autonomic activation and acute myocardial ischemia;
The exposure to amlodipine in early pregnancy does not appear to be associated with an increased rate of fetal malformations compared to other antihypertensive agents , and the antihypertensive effect is slow (± 8 hours);
Beta-blockers: none of the beta-blockers have been associated with teratogenicity - IUGR and low placental weight have been associated with the use of atenolol. , , The exposure to any beta-blocker is associated with the risk of bradycardia and neonatal hypoglycemia, which can cause sedation, sleep disorders and depression in pregnant women. In the case of propranolol, there are reports of IUGR, bradycardia and neonatal hypoglycemia, especially with high doses (160 mg/day). Labetalol is not marketed in Brazil.
Drugs of second line are:
The following are second-line drugs:
Clonidine shows an exaggerated increase in arterial pressure (rebound effect) when treatment is discontinued abruptly. It has a greater hypotensive effect than methyldopa;
Hydralazine is predominantly used intravenously for treatment of severe hypertension in preeclampsia;
Diuretics: the use of diuretic therapy during pregnancy continues to be controversial, mainly due to theoretical concerns regarding reduced maternal plasma volume. Thiazide diuretics may be continued in pregnant women with chronic SAH, provided that they do not promote volume depletion. Chlorothiazide may increase the risk of congenital anomalies and neonatal complications. , 
The following oral anti-hypertensive are contraindicated during gestation: 
ACEI and ARB, which are associated with fetal acute kidney injury and oligohydramnios and which should be suspended before conception; 
Atenolol (beta-blocker), which leads to IUGR and low placental weight; , 
Spironolactone, which has an antiandrogenic effect during fetal development; 
Chlorothiazide, which may increase the risk of congenital anomalies and neonatal complications.

## 4.4.4 Anti-hypertensive Drugs for Severe Hypertension in Preeclampsia275,276,278,279,298-300
The maternal and fetal prognosis in severe hypertension is correlated to initial care provided to these pregnant women. Severe hypertension in preeclampsia is when systolic arterial pressure ≥ 160 or diastolic arterial pressure ≥ 110 mmHg; or both during pregnancy, intrapartum or postpartum period. It is an obstetric emergency, and it requires immediate anti-hypertensive treatment. The goal is not to normalize blood pressure, but to reach levels of 140-150 / 90-100 mmHg or to reduce 15% to 25% of BP. 
Severe preclampsia grave is associated with reversible encephalopathy syndrome (PRES) characterized by headache, visual symptoms, impaired consciousness, epileptic crises, and, occasionally, focal neurological defects. 
Pregnant women with severe preeclampsia should be attended or transferred to tertiary healthcare centers. Prior to inter-hospital transfer, blood pressure (BP) must be stabilized and other measures initiated, such as magnesium sulfate for eclampsia prophylaxis. It is recommended that magnesium sulfate should be used for the prevention and treatment of seizures in women with gestational hypertension and pre-eclampsia with severe characteristics or imminence of eclampsia. Maternal stabilization should occur before delivery, even in urgent circumstances.
Admission to the ICU should be considered, in accordance with the following criteria: pregnant women with severe preeclampsia (SAP ≥ 160 mmHg and DAP ≥ 110 mmHg), respiratory insufficiency requiring mechanical ventilatory assistance, eclampsia, HELLP syndrome, oliguria, acute pulmonary edema, and neurological complications, such as stroke or PRES. 
Endotracheal intubation is another risk in hypertensive emergencies. Induction of general anesthesia and intubation should never be performed without first taking measures to eliminate or minimize the hypertensive response to intubation. Maternal-fetal monitoring must be strict by the medical and nursing staff during treatment. After initial stabilization, the team should monitor BP closely and institute maintenance therapy as needed.
The American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists , , makes the following recommendations and conclusions:
Treatment with first-line agents should be immediate or occur as soon as possible within 30 to 60 minutes after confirmed severe hypertension (blood pressure greater than 160/110 mmHg and persistent for 15 minutes) to reduce the risk of maternal stroke . The patient must be positioned in a sitting or semi-reclining position, with the back supported, they must not be repositioned to be reclined or to stand on their side to obtain low blood pressure, as it will provide a false reading of the pressure measurement; 
Maternal and fetal monitoring by a doctor and nursing staff is recommended during the treatment of severe acute onset hypertension;
After initial stabilization, the team should monitor blood pressure closely and institute maintenance therapy as needed;
Intravenous labetalol and hydralazine (IV) are considered first-line drugs for the treatment of severe acute onset hypertension in pregnant women and women in the postpartum period;
Immediate-release oral nifedipine can also be considered as first-line therapy, especially when IV access is not available;
The use of labetalol IV, hydralazine IV or oral nifedipine of immediate release for the treatment of severe acute onset hypertension in pregnant or postpartum patients does not require cardiac monitoring;
In the rare circumstances in which immediate release oral labetalol, hydralazine or nifedipine boluses fail to relieve acute onset, severe hypertension and are administered in appropriate successive doses, emergent consultation with an anesthetist, subspecialist in maternal-fetal medicine or subspecialist in intensive care to discuss second-line intervention is recommended;
Magnesium sulfate is not recommended as an antihypertensive agent, but magnesium sulfate remains the drug of choice for the prophylaxis of seizures in women with severe acute onset hypertension during pregnancy and the postpartum period. The onset of magnesium should not be delayed in the setting of acute severe hypertension; it is recommended regardless of whether the patient has severe gestational hypertension, pre-eclampsia with severe features or eclampsia.

## 4.5. Practice for Hypertensive Emergency in Preeclampsia (PA ≥ 160/110 mmHg)
In the hypertensive emergency, the most effective drugs are nifedipine, hydralazine and labetalol. There may be subtle differences in your security profiles. The evidence is inadequate for other drugs. Medicines for intravenous use are hydralazine and intravenous labetalol (not available in Brazil). Oral nifedipine is now accepted as first-rate. A recent systematic review by Cochrane found no significant differences between these three drugs in the treatment of hypertensive crisis in terms of efficacy or safety between hydralazine and labetalol or between hydralazine and BCC. , - 
Nifedipine: initial dose of 10-20 mg orally. The onset time of action of oral nifedipine is 5-10 minutes. The dose should be repeated in 20 minutes, if necessary (if blood pressure is> 155/105 mmHg). Maintaining 10-20 mg every 2-6 hours with the maximum daily dose is 120 mg. Repeat medication if blood pressure is> 155/105 mmHg and administer a maximum of three doses. After 20 min of the third dose and the persistence of arterial hypertension, administer a drug of second choice. It should be noted that the tablets should not be chewed and the formulations should not be used sublingually;
Hydralazine: Initial dose of 5 mg intravenously (maximum dose of 45 mg) in bolus, slowly, over 1 to 2 min, repeat, if necessary, 5 mg every 20 minutes (note: The hydralazine ampoule contains 1 ml, in concentration of 20 mg / ml, dilute an ampoule (1 ml) in 19 ml of distilled water, thus obtaining a concentration of 1 mg / ml). The action starts within 10 to 30 minutes and lasts 2 to 4 hours. Parenteral hydralazine may increase the risk of maternal hypotension (systolic BP, 90 mmHg or less); 
In the rare circumstances in which the bolus of labetalol (not available in Brazil), hydralazine or oral nifedipine (retard) administered in appropriate and successive doses does not control blood pressure levels, it is recommended to discuss intervention with drugs considered to be second line; 
Nitroglycerin is considered a medication of choice for preeclampsia associated with acute pulmonary edema (intravenous infusion of 5 mg/min, gradually increasing every 3 to 5 min to a maximum dose of 100 mg/min);
Sodium nitroprusside should be considered as a preferential option for controlling arterial pressure in exceptional situations, such as refractory hypertension of severe hypertension with risk of death. Prolonged treatment with sodium nitroprusside is associated with fetal risk sodium nitroprusside is associated with the fetal risk of intoxication by cyanide, a metabolic product of sodium nitroprusside;for this reason, it should be initiated at 0.25 μg/kg/min up to a maximum of 4 μg/kg/min, for no longer than 4 hours of continuous infusion. 

## 4.6. Prophylaxis of Seizure in Preeclampsia - Eclampsia and Magnesium Sulfate Therapy293,275, 299-303
Since the publication of the results of results of The Collaborative Eclâmpsia Trial – Maggie Trial, o magnesium sulfate (MgSO4) is the drug of choice when eclampsia is imminent, and it is the only drug that is effective against seizures in preeclampsia. Randomized clinical trials have demonstrated that it is superior to hydantoin, diazepam, and placebo for preventing eclampsia and recurrence of seizuresn, in addition its low cost, easy to administer and does not cause sedation. - Therefore, the use of magnesium sulfate is highly recommended for cases of imminent eclampsia, HELLP syndrome (15% of these patients develop eclampsia) and pre -eclampsia with clinical and/or laboratory deterioration, including difficult-to-control hypertension. 
The initial dose, properly administered, does not pose a risk of intoxication. However, it is recommended to monitor the patellar reflex, respiratory rate and diuresis. If there is no patellar reflex, respiratory depression (respiratory rate < 16 rpm) and diuresis below 25 ml/h, it is recommended to stoped MgSO4 intravenous and measure serum levels.
The therapeutic concentration of the magnesium ion varies from 4 to 7 mEq/L (4.8 to 8.4 mg/dl). The patellar reflex is abolished with 8 to 10 mEq/L, the risk of respiratory arrest starting at 12 mEq/L and cardiac arrest of 25 mEq/L. Calcium gluconate (1 g intravenously – 10 ml at 10% – administered slowly) should be used in cases of signs of magnesium intoxication. In respiratory arrest, in addition to calcium gluconate, endotracheal intubation and mechanical ventilation should be performed. In patients with renal impairment (creatinine ≥ 1.2 mg/dl), the maintenance dose should be half the recommended dose. Magnesium sulfate infusion should be stopped only if diuresis is less than 25 ml. In view of values within normal limits, treatment should be maintained or restarted. 
The prevention of convulsive crises in preeclampsia is guided by the following recommendations:
Loading dose: (MgSO4 50% – ampoule with 10ml – contains 5 g de magnésio) – 4 to 6 g of MgSO4, intravenous, in a single dose (dilute 8 to 12 ml of 50% solution in 100 ml of 5% glucose solution and administer, with an infusion pump, for 30 minutes);
Maintenance dose: 1 to 2 g per hour, intravenous (dilute 10 ml of MgSO4 50% (1 ampoule) in 490 ml of 0,9% of saline solution. The final concentration will be 1 g/100 ml. Infuse the solution intravenously at a rate of 100 ml per hour in a continuous infusion pump.
It is necessary to maintain the MgSO4 for 24 hours after delivery or the last seizure. In cases of recurrence of the seizure, an additional 2 g of magnesium sulfate is administered intravenously (bolus) and the dose of 2 g/h is used as maintenance. If two of these boluses do not control seizures, the drug of choice will be diphenylhydantoin in its classic regimen for treating seizures. In these cases, the investigation of brain complications, especially intracranial hemorrhages, is recommended.
After the first 24 hours of observation and evaluation, it is necessary to decide on conservative conduct or termination of pregnancy. Childbirth is the only intervention that leads to the resolution of pre-eclampsia and eclampsia. It is recommended that the expectant conduct is only until 37 weeks of gestation. After this gestational date or if the diagnosis of pre-eclampsia is performed at term, the resolution of the pregnancy should be indicated, thus reducing maternal risks, without altering the perinatal results.

## 4.6.1 Key Points
In women with gestational hypertension, pre-existing hypertension overlapping with gestational hypertension or with damage or symptoms of hypertension and subclinical organs, initiation of drug treatment is recommended when SBP ≥ 140 mmHg or DBP ≥ 90 mmHg;
A goal treatment for blood pressure in SHG should be 140/80 to 85 mmHg. DBP to ≤ 80 mmHg, antihypertensive drugs should be reduced or discontinued;
Methyldopa, beta-blockers (except atenolol) and calcium channel blockers are recommended as the drugs of choice for the treatment of hypertension in pregnancy;
ACE inhibitors, ARBs or direct renin inhibitors are not recommended during pregnancy;
Diuretic therapy is usually avoided because plasma volume is reduced in women who develop preeclampsia;
Considers SBP ≥ 170 mmHg or DBP ≥ 110 mmHg to be an emergency in a pregnant woman who should be admitted to hospital immediately for treatment; The consensus is to reduce BP to < 160/105 mmHg to avoid acute hypertensive complications in the mother; fetal heart rate monitoring;
Magnesium sulphate should be used to prevent and treat seizures in women with gestational hypertension and preeclampsia with severe or imminent eclampsia;
In a hypertensive emergency, the most effective drugs are nifedipine, hydralazine and labetalol (not available in Brazil);
In preeclampsia associated with pulmonary edema, nitroglycerin administered as i.v. infusion is recommended;
The delivery is a single intervention that leads to resolution of preeclampsia and eclampsia.

## 4.7. Prognosis and Prevention of Preeclampsia
Clinical prediction models based on risk factors have low sensitivity, and they generally do not include a large number of pregnant women who might develop preeclampsia during the course of gestation. The following biochemical markers stand out: placental growth factor (PlGF), which is proangiogenic and, when its levels are low between weeks 11 and 13, and soluble FMS-like tyrosine kinase 1 (sFlt-1), which is antiangiogenic and which, when its levels are high, may predict preeclampsia. As neither of them have sufficient sensitivity, the relationship between both factors (sFlt-1/PIGF) is currently being studied, with more promising results. There is, at the moment, however, no predictive laboratory test available in clinical practice. 
It is also possible to utilize Doppler ultrasound as an auxiliary tool. By evaluating pulsatility and resistance in uterine arteries, it may classify pregnant women by risk of developing preeclampsia. Doppler ultrasound should be performed between weeks 20 and 22, although there is a good correlation between late preeclampsia (> 34 weeks) and IUGR. In contrast, Doppler ultrasound performed at the end of the first trimester has lower accuracy; nonetheless, in conjunction with clinical history and comorbidities, it may be useful for identifying pregnant women with higher risks and selecting those who will require prophylaxis for preeclampsia. 
Diverse substances have been tested to reduce the incidence of preeclampsia. Studies on diet, weight loss, physical activity, vitamins, antioxidants, nitrates, dipyridamole, heparins (LMWH and UFH), and antiplatelet agents have been conducted; of these, only calcium replacement and acetylsalicylic acid (ASA) have shown some benefit.
Calcium replacement (1.5 to 2.0 g daily) reduces the risk of preeclampsia effectively only in the subpopulation with calcium ingestion below 600 mg daily. 
Studies have shown the benefits of ASA in low doses (between 75 and 150 mg) for preeclampsia prevention, and it has recently been included in the recommendations of important international guidelines. , , Study with 1,776 patients, using 150-mg doses of ASA versus placebo, starting between weeks 11 and 14, demonstrated that the total of preeclampsia events was significantly reduced in the ASA group compared to placebo group, reinforcing the protective effect of ASA in pregnant women with high risks.
The precise indication of ASA is for patients classified as high-risk for preeclampsia ( ), and it should be initiated between weeks 12 and 16.

 

## 4.7.1. Key Points
Predicting preeclampsia in low-risk patients is difficult and depends on joint assessment of clinical history and Doppler US;
Calcium replacement in patients with low intake reduces the risk of preeclampsia;
The use of low dose AAS in moderate to high risk pregnant women reduces the risk of preeclampsia and should ideally be started between 12 and 16 weeks.

## 4.8. Arterial Hypertension during the Postpartum Period
Arterial hypertension during the postpartum period has been little studied, because there is still a belief that once the placenta has been removed the problem is solved. To a certain extent, placental delivery marks the moment when the stimulation of the production of inflammatory and vasoconstrictive substances ceases, leading to a gradual return in arterial pressure to pre-gestation levels; nevertheless, some of these inflammatory and vasoconstrictive alterations may remain in the maternal organism for a few days.

## 4.8.1. Recommendations
Hypertension normally improves within the first week (5 to 7 days); however, during this period, there continues to be a risk of related complications, especially in patients with preeclampsia, in addition to the possibility of preeclampsia itself manifesting only during the postpartum period. There is also a risk of eclampsia during this period, and 32% to 44% of convulsions may occur during the postpartum period.
Hypertension during the postpartum period may be aggravated or prolonged by situations such as volume overload (hydration) and use of pain medication, such as non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (vasoconstriction and sodium retention), in addition to cases of stroke with reactive vasoconstriction and in patients with previously undiagnosed chronic hypertension.
In postpartum women with preeclampsia, a new elevation in arterial pressure may occur between 3 and 6 days postpartum, probably due to reabsorption of accumulated edema in the third space, which is a rather common syndrome of preeclampsia. 
The treatment objective is to decrease the risk of target organ injury due to hypertensive emergency (acute pulmonary edema, stroke, dissection of the aorta, acute kidney disease). Thus, postpartum women with mild to moderate hypertension (SAP < 160 mmHg and/or DAP < 110 mmHg), who are asymptomatic, may receive follow up without anti-hypertensive medication.
Women may receive any anti-hypertensive medication during the postpartum period. The factor that limits use is breastfeeding; thus, preference should be given to anti-hypertensive medications which pass through breast milk in lower quantities.
In 2013, a review from the Cochrane Library suggested that the use of furosemide might assist in more effective control and shorten hospitalization time in patients with preeclampsia. The review recommends that each service use its routine medication without giving preference to any class of anti-hypertensive drug. Diuretics should become part of the anti-hypertensive regime after the second day, when the reabsorption of peripheral edema begins. The consultation site https://toxnet.nlm.nih.gov, reviews publications and updates recommendations for use of medication while breastfeeding. 
The ACEI captopril and enalapril, which are contraindicated during gestation, are permitted during breastfeeding, as they pass through breast milk in very small quantities. Regarding ARB group II, there is not a sufficient number of studies for liberating the use of this class of medication. The most utilized CCB is nifedipine, which also passes through breast milk in small quantities. Amlodipine and other CCB, such as ARB, lack studies to liberate them without restrictions. Beta-blockers should be individualized on a case-by-base basis. Propranolol and metoprolol are compatible with breastfeeding, whereas atenolol should be avoided.
Diuretic drugs, such as hydrochlorothiazide and furosemide, may deplete intravascular space and decrease milk production; for this reason, they should be used in low doses. Spironolactone may be administered without restriction, and it may be used in patients with resistant hypertension (primary hyperaldosteronism).
Treatment of hypertensive peaks in postpartum women may be done conventionally. A study comparing captopril and clonidine for controlling hypertension (SAP ≥ 180 mmHg and DAP ≥ 110 mmHg) verified that there was no significant difference between the substances, only a tendency for clonidine to be better during the third day of the postpartum period. Both were considered effective and safe for treating postpartum women with hypertensive emergencies. 
We recommend hospital discharge after at least 24 hours in cases of SAP < 160 mmHg and DAP < 110 mmHg. After that they should receive close outpatient follow up, with brief reevaluation 1 to 2 weeks after discharge. 

## 4.8.2. Key Points
Hypertension usually improves in the first five to seven days, but after this period there is still a risk of complications, including preeclampsia/eclampsia;
Priority should be given to medications low-releasing for breastfeeding;
Outpatient follow-up is important as most of these patients leave the hospital still on medication.

## 4.9. Hypertension During Gestation and Future Cardiovascular Risk
Preeclampsia is an established risk factor for coronary artery disease, chronic hypertension, peripheral vascular disease, and stroke. Possible mechanisms behind the increase in cardiovascular disease include endothelial, vascular, and metabolic dysfunctions found during preeclampsia, which have a common link to other traditional risk factors, such as dyslipidemia, obesity, diabetes mellitus, and kidney disease.
The CHAMPS Study, conducted retrospectively with more than one million women with cardiovascular disease after their first gestation, showed an increase in the risk of myocardial revascularization and hospitalization due to cardiovascular disease, stroke, and peripheral arterial vascular disease; this risk was 2 times higher in patients who had had preeclampsia, gestational hypertension, placental rupture, or infarction.
Another large review including more than 3 million women and nearly 200,000 pregnant women showed increased relative risks of 3.7 for chronic SAH, 2.16 for ischemic heart disease and 1.81 for stroke after 10.4 years, in women whose had preeclampsia.
In this manner, hypertension during gestation should be seen as a sex-related marker of future cardiovascular risk. Furthermore, although it is not one of the main factors used for calculating cardiovascular risk, it is necessary, as part of clinical routine, to include precautions when counseling women after delivery and to intensify control of other modifiable factors with the aim of decreasing their cardiovascular risks. 

## 4.9.1. Key Points
Preeclampsia is a risk factor for coronary artery disease, chronic hypertension, peripheral vascular disease and stroke;
Patients who have high blood pressure during pregnancy should intensify control of other modifiable factors to reduce future cardiovascular risk.

## 5. Treatment and Prevention of Cardiac Complications

## 5.1. Cardiac Arrhythmias

## 5.1.1. Epidemiology
Arrhythmias are very frequent complications during pregnancy, whether or not they are associated with structural or electrical heart disease. The first manifestation may occur during gestation, or an aggravation of preexisting arrhythmias may occur. 
The occurrence of arrhythmias during gestation requires investigation with special attention to definition or exclusion of structural or electric cardiac injury; this practice is fundamental to determining treatment and prognosis for the patient. , 
A study in hospitalized pregnant women has shown that: 60% of arrhythmias correspond to sinus bradycardia or tachycardia; 19% to supraventricular or ventricular extrasystoles; 14% to supraventricular tachycardia (SVT); 5% to VT or VF; and 2% to other disorders. 
AF and paroxysmal supraventricular tachycardia (PSVT) are the most frequently diagnosed sustained SVT during gestation; bradyarrhythmias, conduction disorders, other atrial tachycardias, VT, and VF are relatively rare. 
The accepted risks of antiarrhythmic drugs affecting organogenesis and fetal development should be considered during pregnancy, given that most diagnosed arrhythmias do not require specific treatment. Nevertheless, recurring or persistent arrhythmias that cause important symptoms or hemodynamic repercussion should be treated in the same manner they would be for non-pregnant women. 
The risks inherent to ionizing radiation used to perform catheter ablation may by minimized with electromechanical mapping and, in some cases of device implantation (pacemaker, ICD, and resynchronizer), with the use of 2-dimensional echo. 

## 5.1.2. Clinical Presentation
Palpitations occur frequently during pregnancy. They may be related to arrhythmias, or they may be consequent to hemodynamic alterations during gestation. Diagnostic evaluation of palpitations in pregnant women does not differ from diagnosis in non-pregnant women, and it has been demonstrated that palpitations are associated with the presence of arrhythmias in only 10% of cases. 
Symptomatic sinus bradycardia is rare, and it is generally associated with gestational supine hypotensive syndrome, which is treated by placing pregnant patients in left lateral decubitus. Syncope linked to atrioventricular blocks is, similarly, infrequent, and congenital complete atrioventricular block, especially supra-hisian, with narrow QRS, presents favorable evolution during gestation. Sudden Cardiac Death (SCD), which is rare during gestation, presents a greater risk of occurring in women with VT associated with structural heart disease, and, during gestation and the postpartum period, in women with channelopathies (especially women with long-QT syndrome). , 

## 5.1.3. Maternal-fetal Risks
Sustained cardiac rhythm disorders may lead to maternal hemodynamic impairment, the risk of thromboembolism, and SCD. They may also compromise fetal development, leading to low birth weight, premature delivery, fetal abnormalities, and other indications for cesarean delivery. For this reason, these disorders should be diagnosed and adequately treated.
The modified WHO classification for maternal risk considers isolated supraventricular and ventricular extrasystoles as class I (in which there is no detectable risk of increased maternal mortality, but there is a mild increase in maternal morbidity); supraventricular arrhythmias are in class II (in which there is a mild increase in maternal mortality and a moderate increase in maternal morbidity), and VT are included in class III (in which there is a significant increase in maternal mortality and morbidity). 
Current recommendations suggest that arrhythmias be classified during gestation, in accordance with potential hemodynamic impairment, as the following: low-risk of SCD (PSVT and AF with hemodynamic stability, idiopathic VT, low-risk long QT syndrome, and Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome); medium-risk of SCD (unstable SVT, VT in patients with structural heart disease, Brugada syndrome, long QT syndrome, and moderate-risk catecholaminergic polymorphic VT); high-risk of SCD (unstable VT in patients with structural heart disease, torsades de pointes in patients with long QT syndrome, short QT syndrome, and high-risk catecholaminergic polymorphic VT). , 
For the low-risk group, a cardiologist should participate in delivery planning, and delivery should be indicated by the obstetrician. In the medium-risk group, delivery continues to be indicated by the obstetrician; nevertheless, the multidisciplinary team that accompanies the pregnant patient should include an electrophysiologist, and, during delivery, the team should be prepared to use drugs such as adenosine and beta-blockers, as well as cardioverter-defibrillator (CD). In the high-risk group, there is an indication for cesarean delivery, during which it is necessary to be prepared to use CD and antiarrhythmic drugs, in addition to beta-blockers; patients in this group may require admission to the ICU during the postpartum period. 

## 5.1.4. Treatment
Treatment of arrhythmias in pregnant women is similar to that in non-pregnant women. According to indication, the following methods may be used: electrical cardioversion, vagal maneuvers, antiarrhythmic drugs, device implantation (pacemaker, ICD, and cardiac resynchronizer), and catheter ablation ( ). Treatment of cardiac arrhythmias in the emergency room will be discussed in section 5.7.

 

Due to a lack of randomized clinical trials, the indication or contraindication of a given method is based on experimental data from animal studies, registries of side effects of medications used in clinical practice, and case reports or case series. This means that these treatments should only be used when there is maternal and fetal hemodynamic impairment as a result of arrhythmia and/or when there is a risk of maternal SCD during pregnancy and the postpartum period. Whenever possible, all treatments should be postponed to the second or third trimester (thus avoiding the organogenesis period); in the event that medications are used, it is necessary to utilize the lowest dose for the shortest time necessary.
Synchronized electrical cardioversion, which is indicated for reversion of unstable SVT (AF, atrial flutter, atrial tachycardias, PSVT), and unstable or stable VT in the presence of heart disease, is safe during all phases of gestation; it does not compromise fetal blood flow. The pads should be placed in the anterolateral position, with the lateral pad below the mother’s left breast and fetal rhythm monitoring. 
During gestation, vagal maneuvers, such as the Valsalva maneuver, carotid sinus massage, immersing the face in 10ºC water, placing a wet towel on the face, may be used safely for acute reversion of PSVT (caused by nodal reentry or by an accessory route, the latter being characteristic of Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome). , The Valsalva maneuver is typically more effective than carotid sinus massage. Eyeball compression is potentially dangerous and should never be used.
When vagal maneuvers fail in the attempt at acute reversion of PSVT, adenosine (6 mg initially; maximum dose of 24 mg) is the drug of first choice for pregnant women, because there is no evidence of negative effects on the fetus, and the maternal effects (chest discomfort and flushing) have short duration. , , Even though they are not first-choice drugs, beta-blockers (metoprolol, propranolol), verapamil, procainamide, and amiodarone may also be used in the attempt at reversion.
In acute management of other sustained supraventricular arrhythmias (AF, flutter, atrial tachycardia), beta-blockers, verapamil and digitalis drugs are indicated for controlling ventricular response, and other drugs, including flecainide, ibutilide, and propafenone, may be used for acute reversion to sinus rhythm. , , For reversion to sinus rhythm in stable idiopathic VT, beta-blockers, sotalol, flecainide, procainamide, lidocaine are indicated. For SVT, overdrive ventricular pacing is an alternative that should be considered ( ).

 

Permanent treatment of SVT and VT should be the same as that applied to non-pregnant women, with the exception of restrictions to the use of amiodarone due to fetal implications (hypothyroidism, hyperthyroidism, growth retardation, and prematurity). It should also be considered that bradycardia, fetal hypoglycemia, and low birth weight might be associated with the chronic use of beta-blockers; nevertheless, this fact appears to be dose-dependent. Prescription of beta-blockers should contemplate the benefits, which should exceed the risks; the exception is atenolol, which has recognized teratogenic effects and should, therefore, be avoided during gestation. There are also reports of teratogenicity with the use of diltiazem. Sotalol should not be permanently used in pregnant women with Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome to prevent episodes of PSVT ( and ). , , 

 

 

In general, catheter ablation and device implantation, whenever possible, should be performed outside of the gestational period, due to the risks inherent to these procedures, including the risk related to exposure to ionizing radiation. Catheter ablation during gestation has been indicated only for pregnant women who present recurring or persistent severe tachycardias with severe hemodynamic impairment and who do not respond to the usual treatments. There are case reports and small case series of patients with SVT who underwent catheter ablation with the use of mapping strategies that use increasingly smaller amounts of ionizing radiation, thus increasing maternal and fetal safety regarding the future risks of this exposure. There are no reports of catheter ablation for VT to date.
Women with pacemakers and ICD show positive evolution during gestation; this notwithstanding, the complications inherent to underlying heart disease and devices appear to be present, leading to the need for specialized care. In the event that they are absolutely indispensable, these devices may be implanted safely during gestation with or without minimal fluoroscopy. 
Devices (pacemakers and ICD) should be reprogrammed before cesarean delivery, due to functional interference caused by the electric scalpel. In the event of emergency cesarean delivery, a magnet is placed over the pacemaker generator pocket while the electric scalpel is in use, and the cautery plate is placed far away from the thoracic region. For vaginal delivery, reprogramming is not necessary.
For pregnant women with chronic AF or atrial flutter that are not associated with structural heart disease risk stratification should be performed for thromboembolic phenomena, by means of the CHA2DS2-VASc risk score, including indication for anticoagulation when the score is ≥ 2. It is controversial whether the state of hypercoagulability increases the risk score for indication of anticoagulants during gestation. It is necessary to emphasize that new oral anticoagulants (dabigatran, rivaroxaban, apixaban, and edoxaban) should not be used in pregnant women. , 

## 5.1.5. Key Points
Initial practice for arrhythmias during pregnancy is to investigate structural cardiac injury;
“New” arrhythmias, in the absence of structural cardiac injury, should be treated according to maternal symptoms or the complexity of the arrhythmia;
A 24-hour Holter monitor examination is essential to therapeutic decision making;
Device implantation (pacemaker, ICD) and radiofrequency ablation with electroanatomical mapping are safe during pregnancy, and they should be indicated when a case is refractory to pharmacological treatment;
Devices such as pacemakers, ICD, and cardiac resynchronizers should be reprogrammed after cesarean delivery.

## 5.2. Thromboembolism

## 5.2.1. Epidemiology
Venous thromboembolic events are important causes of maternal mortality and they are potentially preventable. , They are the main direct cause of maternal death in developed countries and in Brazil; in 2013, they were the sixth leading cause, behind severe hemorrhage, hypertension during gestation, infection, delivery complications, and abortion. Furthermore, they are a relevant cause of morbidity due to post-thrombotic syndrome. Late diagnosis, delayed or inadequate treatment, and inappropriate prophylaxis are responsible for approximately 3.5% of maternal deaths. 
Thromboembolism includes both deep vein thrombosis (DVT) and PTE; 75% to 80% of cases of pregnancy-associated thromboembolism are DVT, and 20% to 25% are PTE. The real incidence of the disease associated with gestation is unknown, but it appears to be between 7 and 25 cases per 10,000 pregnancies, and the clinical impression is that chances are increased 5- to 10-fold during this period. The risk appears to be greater during the third trimester, but it is elevated since the first. During the postpartum period, the risk reaches 20 times that of non-pregnant women, and it decreases gradually until 6 weeks postpartum. Nonetheless, recent studies have shown an increase in the risk of thromboembolism for up to 180 days postpartum in patients with some obstetric risk factors, including cesarean delivery and twin gestation. , , 

## 5.2.2. Risk Factors
The lists preexisting, transitory, and obstetric risk factors associated with thromboembolism during gestation. It has been suggested that the presence of 2 or more of these factors further increases the risk of disease; prior history of thrombosis, however, is the most important individual risk factor. The recurrence of thrombosis during this period increases 3- to 4-fold, accounting for 15% to 25% of all cases of thromboembolism during gestation. , 

 

## 5.2.3. Thrombophilia
Thrombophilia comprises a state of congenital or acquired hypercoagulability. This issue, when isolated, even in the context of pregnancy, does not necessarily result in the occurrence of thromboembolism; the rarity of thromboembolism during pregnancy and the high incidence of hereditary thrombophilias do not justify systematic tracking of this disease.
Venous thrombosis is a polygenic disease with incomplete penetration, which makes genetic counseling uncertain. The risk of thromboembolism associated with different thrombophilias and its prevalence in the general population are shown in .

 

There is limited value to tracking thrombophilias in pregnant women with acute thromboembolism, because it does not modify clinical practice. For this reason, investigation of thrombophilia is recommended during gestation in the following situations, with the following classes of evidence:
Based on clinical risk (class IB);
Family history (first-degree relatives) of thromboembolism without a detectable cause or occurring during hormonal exposure, or a minor risk factor, or still under the age of 50 should be investigated (class IIC);
Thromboembolism with lower transitory risk factor, such as travel time (class IIC).
Investigation of thrombophilia is not recommended in the following situations:
Prior thromboembolism without an apparent cause (class IB) and thromboembolism related to hormone use or during a previous gestation (class IIC) require indication of tromboprophylaxis;
Personal history of the disease with a major transitory risk factor (fracture, surgery, prolonged immobility) (class IIB);
Obstetric history of recurring fetal loss, placenta praevia, IUGR, and preeclampsia.

## 5.2.4. Diagnosis
Final diagnosis may be compromised by signs and symptoms which are inherent to normal pregnancy, such as edema, pain in lower limbs, chest pain, precordial palpitation, and dyspnea. Nevertheless, clinical evaluation is the essential basis for seeking conclusive diagnosis, because there is still not a single screening test that is sufficiently sensitive to define the situation. Furthermore, most studies that evaluate diagnostic imaging examinations for thromboembolism and flowcharts for diagnosis exclude pregnant women due to a concern for maternal-fetal safety.

## 5.2.4.1. Deep Vein Thrombosis
Diagnosis based on clinical picture (anamnesis and clinical examination) is concerning, because it determines whether or not the patients will require permanent anticoagulant therapy during gestation. This situation requires subsidiary examinations in order to conclude diagnosis, which should be expedited, given that sudden death is not uncommon in pregnant women with signs and symptoms compatible with this disease.
Structured risk scores for classifying pregnant women as low-, intermediate-, or high-risk for DVT, such as the Wells’ score, have not been validated for use during gestation. The LEFT rule on the other hand has been proposed for specific prediction of the chance of DVT during pregnancy, and it appears to be promising. If none of its variables are present, the negative predictive value appears to be 100% but this method still needs to be validated by larger prospective studies. , 
The variables considered by risk scores for DVT are the following:
Presentation of thrombosis in the left leg;
Difference of ≥ 2 cm in calf circumference (edema);
Presentation during the first trimester of pregnancy.
 lists the complementary examinations used for diagnosing DVT, their sensitivity, specificity, advantages, and disadvantages.

 

5.2.4.2. D-dimer

D-dimer dosage is present in the classical algorithm for diagnosing thromboembolism; during pregnancy, however, this marker loses its accuracy for diagnosing PTE, given that it undergoes an increase of approximately 40% during all trimesters, the postpartum period, and complications such as preeclampsia and placenta abruption. These uncertainties influence the disagreement regarding use of D-dimer in the algorithm for diagnosing thromboembolism during gestation. , , 

5.2.4.3. Venous Ultrasound

A practical approach to suspected DVT begins with the use of compression ultrasound in the affected limb. Analysis of vein compressibility on this examination presents a sensitivity of 96% and a specificity of 98% for diagnosis of DVT above the knee; this is slightly lower for those beneath the knee, although there is a substantial chance of diagnosis in these as well. Knowledge of the fact that DVT frequently presents in proximal veins, but that it may be isolated in iliac veins may limit the ability to exclude DVT with compression ultrasound alone in symptomatic pregnant women. Given that compression maneuvers may not be performed in iliac veins, iliac vein thrombi are diagnosed by direct visualization of intraluminal echogenic mass or absence of spontaneous venous flow on Doppler.
If ultrasound is positive, diagnosis is confirmed, and treatment is initiated immediately. In the event that it is negative and the patient continues to present symptoms, the examination should be repeated every 3 to 7 days, and treatment should be initiated if diagnosis is confirmed. shows 2 flowcharts for diagnosis of DVT during gestation: a venous compression ultrasound starting with the femoral veins and the use of D-dimer to evaluate the need for investigation of the iliac region; and complete venous ultrasound in the leg, including evaluation of the iliac vein.

 

5.2.4.4. Iliac Vein Magnetic Resonance

When the clinical picture of isolated iliac thrombosis arises (whole limb edema, with or without pain in the flanks, buttocks, or lumbar regions), ultrasound does not resolve the situation well, and magnetic resonance should be used. Magnetic resonance may be used to diagnose DVT involving iliac veins during pregnancy, but it depends on the examiner’s expertise. , , 

5.2.4.5. Pulmonary Thromboembolism

Currently, approach to diagnosis of PTE during gestation is uncertain, and further studies are required. Approximately seven guidelines consider diagnosis of PTE during gestation, and the orientations regarding the use of rules for predicting risk, using D-dimer dosage, and choosing imaging methods diverge. Most of the guidelines do not include D-dimer dosage in the diagnostic algorithm for PTE. In relation to ultrasound, some guidelines initially use investigation for diagnosis of DVT; its positivity, however, is only 20% to 40% for PTE, and, if it is negative, diagnosis has to be confirmed by other imaging methods.
Examinations of choice for diagnosing PTE are pulmonary V/Q scintigraphy or CTPA; both tests, however, carry the risk of maternal and fetal exposure to radiation. Pulmonary V/Q scintigraphy exposes the fetus to a greater radiation dose than CTPA; thus, if chest X-ray is normal, only perfusion scintigraphy is considered, therefore reducing the radiation dose. V/Q scintigraphy also exposes the child to a greater risk of neoplasm, and CTPA exposes the mother to a higher radiation dose, leading to a small, yet significant increase in the risk of breast cancer (1 case in 280,000 versus less than 1 case in 1,000,000).
The choice between V/Q and CTPA is divergent. Most recommendations indicate V/Q scintigraphy as a first choice, especially perfusion, in the presence of normal chest X-ray. Others, however, recommend using CTPA with low doses for diagnosing PTE, even though they produce a higher proportion of inconclusive results during gestation. Approximately 80% of scintigraphy examinations are diagnostic, i.e., 70% are normal, and 5% to 10% are high probability. shows absorbed radiation doses of diagnostic tests for PTE during pregnancy. , 

 

Pregnancy-Adapted YEARS Algorithm was applied for the diagnosis of PTE in a population of pregnant women and showed that in the absence of factors such as deep venous thrombosis, hemoptysis, PTE as the most likely diagnosis and, D-dimer not exceeding 1000 ng/ml, the diagnosis of PTE it can be ruled out and, consequently, chest angiotomography could be avoided in 32 to 65% of patients. 

5.2.4.6. Differential Diagnosis

Differential diagnosis of PTE is wide-ranging, given that pulmonary embolism has clinical manifestations similar to those of pneumonia, HF, and AMI. For this reason, it is wise to exclude the presence of coexisting pulmonary embolism with pneumonia manifestations. From the peripheral point of view, DVT in lower limbs should be differentiated from osteomuscular diseases, such as tendinitis, muscular distension, popliteal cyst, popliteal aneurysm, hematoma, cellulitis, lymphangitis, and post-thrombotic syndrome ( ).

 

## 5.2.5. Treatment

5.2.5.1. General Approach

Faced with strong clinical suspicion of thromboembolism, full permanent anticoagulation should be initiated before confirmation of diagnosis, unless it is contraindicated. Heparin is the preferred anticoagulant, whereas “new” oral anticoagulants, such as dabigatran, rivaroxaban, and apixaban, have not been approved for use during gestation and lactation. In cases of allergy or thrombocytopenia induced by heparin, fondaparinux may be indicated, and it seems to be safe during the second and third trimesters of pregnancy.

5.2.5.2. Heparin Use

LMWH and UFH are the options for treating PTE during gestation. LMWH is easy to use, and it seems to be safer and more efficacious than UFH, with data extrapolated from studies that did not include gestation. Intravenous UFH is indicated in patients with increased risk of bleeding or persistent hypotension during PTE. Prolonged heparin use, i.e., for more than 7 weeks, is associated with the risk of osteoporosis, hemorrhage, allergic reactions, skin necrosis, and thrombocytopenia, which are less frequent with the use of LMWH. Suspension is indicated when platelet count drops below 150,000 or the equivalent of 50% of the initial count. In this case, although it is controversial, substitution with fondaparinux may be indicated.
Anticoagulation should be continued throughout the pregnancy and at least during the first 6 weeks postpartum. Platelet count should be performed daily to investigate thrombocytopenia during the first 3 days of treatment and weekly thereafter.

5.2.5.2.1. Recommended Doses

Subcutaneous LMWH: dalteparin 200 units/kg daily or 100 units/kg every 12 hours, or enoxaparin 1 mg/kg every 12 hours. The heparin dose should be controlled by anti-Xa factor in the therapeutic range between 0.6 and 1.0 IU/ml, when it is applied every 12 hours, and in the range of 1 to 2 IU/ml, when it is applied in a daily dose;
Intravenous UFH: UFH bolus of 80 units/kg followed by an infusion of 18 units/kg/h, adjusted every 6 hours to maintain APTT between 1.5 and 2.5 times baseline. Stabilization of the therapeutic range allows for daily APTT control;
Subcutaneous UFH: It is reasonable to initiate with 17,500 IU every 12 hours, adjusted every 6 hours to maintain APTT between 1.5 and 2.5 times control. Stabilization of the therapeutic range allows for daily APTT control.

5.2.5.2.2. Labor and Delivery

Delivery planning in patients under anticoagulation requires the involvement of a multidisciplinary team, as risks of bleeding and thrombosis should be weighed during the stages of labour, delivery and postpartum period. In cases of spontaneous labor, heparin should be suspended immediately; in planned induced or cesarean delivery, LMWH should be suspended 24 hours in advance; this practice makes neuraxial anesthesia possible. In cases when it is judged risky to suspend heparin for 24 hours, it should be substituted by intravenous UFH, which should be interrupted 4 to 6 hours before delivery. Neuraxial anesthesia may be performed when APTT returns to normal. In the event of planned preterm delivery (triplet gestation, premature rupture of membranes, significant cervical dilatation, preeclampsia, or IUGR), LMWH or subcutaneous UFH should be discontinued at week 36 and substituted with intravenous UFH.
In the occurrence of delivery in patients under full anticoagulation, more bleeding is predicted during the intrapartum and postpartum periods; in addition to this, the risk of spinal hematoma contraindicates neuraxial anesthesia. Accordingly, oxytocin use is suggested during the third stage of labor. 

5.2.5.2.3. The Postpartum Period

Heparin should be reinitiated 12 hours after cesarean delivery or 6 hours after vaginal delivery, once it has been verified that there is no significant bleeding. Warfarin, when it is indicated, should be initiated on the second day postpartum, in conjunction with heparin, until INR is between 2 and 3 IU. It is indispensable for patients to be on heparin when an oral anticoagulant is initiated, because the oral anticoagulant can stimulate coagulation and may cause vascular purpura during the first days. Oral anticoagulant use does not contraindicate lactation.

5.2.5.2.4. Duration of Anticoagulation

Duration of anticoagulant treatment should be individualized. According to studies in the general population, total duration should be from 3 to 6 months in patients with only transitory risk factors. Anticoagulation should be extended for at least 6 weeks postpartum; patients with persistent risk factors, however, may require more prolonged duration of anticoagulation. , 

5.2.5.3. Inferior Vena Cava Filters

Temporary removable inferior vena cava filters may be used during gestation with indications similar to non-pregnant patients. This means that they are contraindicated in cases of conventional anticoagulation, such as the following: hemorrhagic stroke, active bleeding and recent surgery; thromboembolism in spite of full anticoagulation; need to interrupt anticoagulation; or when pulmonary circulation is significantly impaired. The use of vena cava filters is limited, because it is associated with risks of insertion and removal, such as filter migration in more than 20% of cases, filter fracture in more than 5%, perforation of the inferior vena cava in 5%, and mortality in 0.12% to 0.3%. 

5.2.5.4. Thrombolysis

Thrombolysis is reserved for patients with massive PTE and associated hypotension. Maternal mortality is estimated at 1%, fetal loss at 6%, and maternal hemorrhage at 8%. Intravenous UFH should be initiated immediately after thrombolysis, and LMWH should only be initiated once the clinical picture has stabilized.

## 5.2.6. Prophylaxis
Proposed prophylaxis regimes ( ) against thromboembolic phenomena during gestation in diverse clinical situations are the following: , , , 

 

Prophylactic UFH: 5,000 units of subcutaneous UFH, every 12 hours;
Intermediate dose of UFH: 10,000 units of subcutaneous UFH, every 12 hours;
Adjusted UFH: subcutaneous UFH, every 12 hours with APTT adjusted to 1.5 to 2.5 times baseline;
Prophylactic LMWH: dalteparin (5,000 units subcutaneous daily), enoxaparin (40 mg or 0.5 mg/kg subcutaneous), or tinzaparin (4,500 units subcutaneous);
Intermediate dose of LMWH: dalteparin (5,000 units subcutaneous, every 12 hours) or enoxaparin (40 mg subcutaneous, every 12 hours);
Adjusted dose of LMWH: dalteparin (200 U/kg or 100 U/kg every 12 hours) or enoxaparin (1 mg/kg every 12 hours) in doses adjusted to 0.6 to 1.2 anti-Xa factor;
Postpartum: Initiate with intravenous UFH or subcutaneous LMWH + warfarin until INR reaches 2.0. Subsequently, maintain warfarin for 4 to 6 weeks with INR between 2.0 and 3.0.

## 5.2.7. Key Points
Thromboembolism is an important cause of morbimortality during gestation;
Gestation and other related factors may increase the risk of the disease;
Diagnosis of thromboembolism should be confirmed in order to justify treatment of the disease, which is prolonged, requires prophylactics measures, and has future therapeutic implications;
When thromboembolism is suspected during gestation, venous ultrasound should be the first complementary examination solicited;
While normal D-dimer dosage appears to have a negative predictive value, it has not been validated during gestation;
Pulmonary V/Q scintigraphy or CTPA are examinations of choice for diagnosing PTE during gestation;
Treatment of DVT or low-risk PTE during gestation is based on the use of LMWH or UFH;
Treatment should be maintained throughout the entire gestation and at least for 6 weeks postpartum;
Thromboembolic prophylaxis should be used in pregnant women with past history of thromboembolism. It should also be considered in the presence of other risk factors;
Investigation of thrombophilia should be individualized;
The absence of factors such as deep vein thrombosis, hemoptysis, PTE as the most likely diagnosis and, D-dimer not exceeding 1000 ng/ml, makes the diagnosis of PTE unlikely.

## 5.3. Therapy and Prevention

## 5.3.1. Heart Failure
HF stands out as the main cause of complications associated with maternal mortality in women with heart disease. It has a prevalence of 0.04% in the general population of pregnant women and 12.5% among women with heart disease. It is important to emphasize that approximately 60% of cases of HF occur during the postpartum period. Although they are asymptomatic, 0.85% of women in Brazil may eventually present ventricular dysfunction during the postpartum period. The most frequent situations that should be considered in diagnosis of HF during the pregnancy-postpartum cycle are shown in . HF associated with PPCM has been discussed in section 3.3.7.

 

Diagnosis of HF during gestation is difficult, because adaptive physiological changes during pregnancy cause signs/symptoms, which should be considered when they are exacerbated. In this manner, interface in interpretation of physiological symptoms of pregnancy versus those of HF, as shown in , requires the application of specific knowledge in order to make the most appropriate decision regarding eventual therapeutic intervention.

 

From initial evaluation to clinical follow up, the physician should pay attention to personal and family history of heart disease, gestational age at the time when FC progressed from I/II to III/IV, and identification of factors such as cardiac arrhythmias, anemia, and infections ( ).

 

Pregnancy is generally poorly tolerated in women with LVEF < 40% and FC III/IV (NYHA), both of which are considered predictive factors of mortality, and pregnancy should be advised against. In cases with LVEF < 20%, pregnancy should be contraindicated, and, during the first trimester, interruption should be considered.
The routine for pregnant women with suspicion of HF should include basic subsidiary examinations, namely, the following: laboratory tests (blood count, serum electrolytes, renal function, fasting blood glucose, glycosylated hemoglobin, lipid profile, thyroid function and liver function); 12-lead ECG to identify arrhythmias, cardiac chamber overload, and conduction disorders; chest X-ray to detect pulmonary congestion; and 2-dimensional transthoracic Doppler echo with Doppler flow analysis, which is the preferred diagnostic imaging test, not only due to its wide availability, but also to the fact that it does not require ionizing radiation. Echo identifies structural cardiac alterations, including myocardial, valve, and pericardial abnormalities, in addition to evaluating hemodynamic aspects. 
Studies have confirmed the value of BNP as a marker for HF during gestation as well. Values above 100 pg/ml contribute to sustaining clinical diagnosis of HF, and they facilitate the implementation of appropriate therapeutic measures. It may be useful to incorporate serum levels of BNP into clinical practice, especially when assessing cardiac events during pregnancy.
Evaluation of prognosis of HF during pregnancy is similar to conventional evaluation; the following invasive examinations, however, should be postponed until after pregnancy: transesophageal echo, CMR, myocardial perfusion spect, PET scan, coronary angiotomography, and cardiopulmonary test.
HF prevention during gestation requires multidisciplinary counseling with the obstetrician, and it should observe the following recommendations: (1) weekly or biweekly medical consultation; (2) body weight control; (3) insisting on avoiding activities that require great effort; (4) moderate salt intake restriction; (5) eventual removal from professional activities that require great effort; (6) maintaining non-teratogenic medications and (7) hospitalizing patients who continue in NYHA FC III with optimized medication. 
Obstetric evaluation concomitant to cardiologic care is important to establishment of gestational age. In this manner, fetal viability and growth conditions and the placental flow situation are factors that support therapy and reflect the maternal hemodynamic condition.
Pharmacological treatment of HF with reduced ejection fraction (HFrEF) differs from treatment for the general population of women with heart disease regarding the class of drugs used, daily dose, and therapeutic goals, given that teratogenic drugs should be substituted during preconception.
Beta-blockers, especially beta-1-cardioselective ones (metoprolol, bisoprolol, and carvedilol), are considered first-line drugs, because they are beneficial with respect to mortality due to HF and CSD, and they improve symptoms and reduce rates of re-hospitalization due to HF. For these reasons, the use of these beta-blockers should be maintained during gestation in cases with HFrEF.
The literature is lacking in data on target doses for reaching therapeutic goals during gestation, which should not be the same as those considered for the general population of women with heart disease. This is because reduced heart rate and decreased arterial pressure resulting from high doses, which are usually factors applied to the population of patients with HF, can impair uteroplacental circulation.
It is generally prudent for doses of drugs used during pregnancy to be fractionated; they should initially be low and gradually increase, with caution, seeking the highest dose tolerated by the mother and the fetus. The following are thus recommended: an initial dose of bisoprolol of 1.25 mg daily, carvedilol of 3.125 mg 2 times daily, and metoprolol succinate of 12.5 mg 2 times daily, in accordance with the recommendations for the population of patients with HF. 
Vitality (biophysical profile and cardiotocography) and fetal maturity should be assessed more frequently when compared to the population of healthy pregnant women. During the neonatal period, supervision should last from 24 to 48 hours after birth, considering the most frequent symptoms and signs, such as respiratory depression, bradycardia, hyperbilirubinemia, and hypoglycemia. For this reason, when a patient is close to delivery, a prudent measure is to reduce the beta-blocker progressively, seeking the lowest dose with maternal efficacy. 
The occurrence of pulmonary congestion requires the use of loop diuretics, preferably furosemide and thiazide diuretics, in the attempt to optimize preload. In the event that there is no congestion, they should be avoided, due to the risk of causing reduced uteroplacental flow. Attention should be paid to the deleterious effects of the permanent use of diuretics, such as worsened placental flow, increased uric acid (early marker of preeclampsia), appearance of maternal-fetal electrolytic disorders, and IUGR.
Hydralazine may be used to treat symptoms of HF, with or without nitrates, as an alternative treatment in the event that SAP is > 110 mmHg, especially in cases with associated arterial hypertension, severe left ventricular dysfunction, and/or evidence of congestion. , Nevertheless, during pregnancy, the association between hydralazine and nitrates has been related to low maternal tolerance due to the usual arterial hypotension.
Digoxin may be used when volume overload persists, notwithstanding therapy with vasodilators and diuretics. When it is necessary in patients with HFrEF, digitalis plays an important role in controlling maternal heart rate, especially in the presence of AF. 
Anticoagulation in HF during pregnancy is controversial. LMWH or UFH may be considered in patients in the most common situations, such as dilated cardiomyopathy with LVEF < 35%, prolonged hospitalization and history of thromboembolic events. It is worthwhile to consider that the postpartum period adds a higher risk of thromboembolism; for this reason, anticoagulation is indicated during this phase of the pregnancy-postpartum cycle.
Regarding arrhythmias in HF, AF if the most common, and it may be treated with beta-blockers; if necessary, digoxin is added to control heart rate. Regarding frequent ventricular arrhythmias or sustained ventricular tachyarrhythmia, treatment includes the use of amiodarone and, when risks are higher, ICD are indicated.
When hemodynamic instability and cardiogenic shock occur, the patient should initially be transferred to the ICU, if possible, with MCS. Urgent cesarean delivery should be considered, with MCS immediately available; in the event of elective delivery, however, it is at the obstetrician’s discretion whether the route of delivery is vaginal or cesarean, considering maternal parity, existing comorbidities, and the severity of cardiac injury.
During the postpartum period, it is necessary to avoid volume overload as a result of infusion of fluids during the intrapartum and postpartum periods. The use of oxytocin in low doses should be considered, in spite of its vasoactive properties, and ergometrine should be avoided due to its peripheral vasoconstrictive effect.

## 5.3.2. Key Points
The physiological symptoms and signs of pregnancy may delay diagnosis of HF;
BNP (≤ 100 pg/ml) is a marker of HF that is also valid during pregnancy;
Serial BNP during gestation assists in HF diagnosis and therapy;
Beta-blockers are considered first-line drugs, and they should be maintained during gestation in cases of HFrEF;
During family planning, pregnancy should be advised against in women with chronic HF who present LVEF < 40% and contraindicated in those in FC III/IV with LVEF < 20%.

## 5.4. Therapy and Prevention

## 5.4.1. Infective endocarditis
IE is rare during pregnancy; it occurs in 0.006% of the general population. However in patient with valve disease or congenital heart disease, this percentage reaches 1.2%. , Patients with valve prostheses and complex cyanotic heart disease, as well as those who use illicit drugs, constitute a higher-risk group.
IE is a severe disease with maternal mortality close to 33%, consequent HF, and thromboembolic phenomena. , During pregnancy, special attention should be paid to fever without an apparent cause and new precordial heart murmur, given that it appearance is very common during normal pregnancy.
The approach to IE requires multidisciplinary care in a tertiary cardiology center, with decisions supported by a heart team that is qualified to offer the resources available for diagnosis, treatment, and follow up, according to conventional recommendations. 
Prophylaxis for IE during pregnancy follows the same recommendations that apply non-pregnant patients. , Given that the oral cavity is the entryway for the most frequent etiological agents, basic orientations for preventing IE include promotion of oral health, advice on hygiene, and periodic dental consultation for surveillance of gingivitis, which favors periodontal disease.
Antibiotic prophylaxis for dental treatment is controversial; nonetheless, when it is indicated, 2 g of oral amoxacillin or 600 mg of oral clindamycin are used for patients who are allergic to penicillin, 1 hour before dental intervention.
Antibiotic prophylaxis for IE at the moment of vaginal or cesarean delivery is also controversial, and the lack of evidence regarding disease prevention with antibiotic use at the moment of delivery renders their indication fragile. Nevertheless, it is necessary to consider that the occurrence of IE during the postpartum period is severe, given that, during this period, complications that elevate bacteremia (manual extraction of the placenta, curettage, or placental retention) are not predictable, and postpartum infection in Brazil is one of the leading obstetric causes of maternal death. For this reason, the decision to use antibiotic prophylaxis for IE at the moment of delivery should be at the discretion of the team caring for the parturient patient, with individualization of each case.
Although it is still controversial, clinical situations at a high risk of IE that may require routine antibiotic prophylaxis are shown in , and recommendations regarding means of application are shown in .

 

 

Clinical diagnosis of IE reviews history of fever; chills; decline in general condition; embolic, peripheral, or central phenomena; vascular or immunological phenomenon; glomerulonephritis; and new murmur. Regarding complementary examinations, transthoracic Doppler echo should be performed whenever clinical suspicion exists; transesophageal echo is indicated when transthoracic echo is negative for IE and in cases of prosthetic valve. Blood cultures should be collected prior to the introduction of antibiotics. A minimum of 3 samples should be taken at 30-minute intervals, by means of sterile peripheral venipuncture, regardless of fever peak. Treatment should be initiated following blood culture collection, and it should be based on epidemiology, clinical history, and blood culture and antibiogram results, in accordance with conventional guidelines. , 
It is worth remembering that the most common etiological agent of IE in Brazil is Streptococcus viridans in the oral cavity. The choice of antibiotic, intravenous administration, and duration of antibiotic therapy are the same as in non-pregnant patients, considering the possible toxic effects of antibiotics on the fetus. , , , 
There are, accordingly, 3 groups of antibiotics classified regarding risks to gestation: (1) the safest, which include ampicillin, penicillin, amoxacillin, oxacillin, erythromycin, daptomycin, and cephalosporins; (2) those which present intermediate risk and should thus be monitored, such as vancomycin, imipenem, rifampicin, and teicoplanin; and (3) those that are contraindicated, namely, aminoglycosides, quinolones, and tetracycline. 
Surgical treatment in cases of IE follows conventional indications, such as failure of etiological treatment, refractory HF, repeat embolic phenomena, periprosthetic complications, abscess, or prosthetic dehiscence. It is recommended that delivery take place before cardiac surgery in cases where the fetus is viable. , 

## 5.4.2. Rheumatic Disease
Rheumatic fever (RF) is an autoimmune disease which occurs following infection of the oropharynx by Lancefield Group A beta-hemolytic Streptococcus. The first rheumatic outbreak affects children in early childhood, and it contributes to an important number of women with valve disease in reproductive age and, therefore, during pregnancy.
Acute RF is rare during pregnancy, but its diagnosis should be considered in pregnant adolescents without previous prophylaxis or those who present a clinical picture of severe HF that does not correspond to the degree of valve involvement.
Diagnosis is guided by the Jones criteria and complementary examinations. Both major (carditis, Sydenham’s chorea, migratory arthritis, erythema marginatum, and subcutaneous nodules) and minor (fever and arthralgia) criteria are valid during gestation; however, acute phase reagents, such as alpha acid-glycoprotein, C-reactive protein, and protein electrophoresis, may be influenced by pregnancy. For this reason, diagnosis is strongly based on the patient’s clinical presentation and history.
Accordingly, it is worth considering that Sydenham’s chorea is a common cause of chorea in patients who have prior history, and there should be differential diagnosis with chorea gravidarum, which may be associated with morbidities other than RF. Both manifestations of chorea are linked to high obstetric risks, such as fetal loss, and they require differential treatment. 
The same applies to the distinction between HF consequent to rheumatic carditis and chronic heart valve disease; both increase the risk of maternal death, and they have very different forms of treatment. 
Treatment of rheumatic outbreak, which is rare during pregnancy, should be the same as in the general population. Hospitalization is indicated in all cases of suspected carditis, incapacitating arthritis, or severe chorea, and home rest should last for a minimum of 4 weeks and, eventually, until delivery. 
Secondary prophylaxis for RF should be maintained during gestation in accordance with the following recommendations: penicillin G benzathine 1,200,000 IU intramuscular every 21 days or phenoxymethylpenicillin 250 mg orally 2 times daily. In patients who are allergic to penicillin, erythromycin 250 mg orally 2 times daily or clindamycin 600 mg daily are recommended. The use of sulfadiazine is contraindicated during pregnancy.
Duration of prophylaxis does not depend on occurrence during pregnancy, and it is related to the following factors: RF without prior carditis (for 21 years or 5 years after the latest outbreak, applying whichever covers the longer period); RF with prior carditis, mild residual heart valve disease, or resolved valve lesion (for 25 years or 10 years after the latest outbreak, applying whichever covers the longer period); moderate to severe residual valve lesion (for 40 years or lifelong); after valve surgery (for 40 years or lifelong). Patients with risk of repeat pharyngitis, such as those who work in daycare centers or nursing homes, should use secondary prophylaxis for the rest of their lives. , 

## 5.4.3. Key Points
Antibiotic prophylaxis for IE at the moment of delivery should be performed in patients at a high risk for IE;
Prophylaxis for RF should be maintained during pregnancy.

## 5.5. Cardiovascular Surgery During Pregnancy
Worldwide experience in cardiac surgery during pregnancy has shown controversial results. Studies are characterized by retrospective nature and heterogeneity of procedures, associated with difficulties to standardization of surgical techniques, which render difficult the judicious analysis of prognostic variables and their reflexes in practice during pregnancy. , 
It is accepted that the risk of maternal death due to cardiac surgery is not greatly modified by pregnancy. For emergency surgery, however, the risk of maternal mortality increases. The maternal mortality rate verified of 7.5% to 13.3% is relatively high, in comparison with that of cardiac surgery in the population of young women of fertile age, which encompasses the age range of pregnancy. , , , 
Another important aspect for indication of cardiac surgery is gestational age. This is because, the earlier complications appear in patients with severe lesions, the greater the tendency to indicate early surgery, because there is a very high tendency for hemodynamic deterioration to progress during pregnancy, leading to an increase in emergency surgery and maternal death. This logic justifies the notion that the best period to plan cardiac surgery is during the second trimester of gestation, given that the fetus is still not viable, and the physiological and mechanical modifications pregnancy are still not very significant; furthermore, it provides the mother with a reasonable postoperative recovery period. One of the highest risk variables associated with worse maternal-fetal outcomes is emergency. , 
Surgery during pregnancy requires specific precautions; the following stand out: choice of anesthetic drug, continuous maternal-fetal monitoring, and adequate control of anticoagulation. The obstetric team should initiate both maternal and fetal monitoring simultaneously, by means of cardiotocography, in order to control uterine dynamics and fetal heartbeat. Induction of anesthesia should be cautious to avoid periods of hypoxia and hypotension, and drugs without teratogenic effects should be chosen. 
Cardiovascular surgery techniques during pregnancy do not differ from those for non-pregnant patients; the surgical team’s experience, however, is fundamental in order to reduce duration of surgery, especially of CPB, in addition to specific precautions which are shown in .

 

Typically, a drop in fetal heart rate occurs during initial installation of CPB, which returns to normal by completion. This is mainly due to the change to continuous flow, embolic effect of microbubbles, initial hypotension, hemodilution, stacking of red cells, and alterations in peripheral vascular resistance. This “acute dysfunction” of the placenta as a result of impaired uteroplacental flow is the cause of the high incidence of fetal loss, prematurity, neonatal death, and malformations. , 
It has been recommended to indicate delivery before cardiac surgery if the fetus is viable. Nevertheless, it is worth highlighting that corticoid use for fetal pulmonary maturation is very risky for pregnant women with unstable, severe hemodynamic conditions, which are very frequent in this situation. This is because corticoid use in recommended doses (2 doses of betamethasone, 12 mg intramuscular, 12 hours before delivery), associated with delivery, whether cesarean or vaginal, may lead to aggravation of HF, cardiogenic shock, and maternal death.
Prevention of premature labor with the use of natural progesterone suppositories (50 mg, every 12 hours during the intra- and postoperative) is preferable, given that indometacin may lead to closure of the arterial canal, especially after 26th week of gestation. 
Cardiac surgery, even though it constitutes a high risk for pregnancy, should be indicated for clinical conditions without other therapeutic options for maternal survival. Surgical procedures in emergency situations are significantly correlated with maternal complications during the postoperative period; for this reason, the moment of surgical indication has direct implications on maternal-fetal results. , 

## 5.5.1. Key Points
Cardiac surgery during pregnancy should be indicated in clinical conditions without other therapeutic options for maternal survival;
Emergency surgery is significantly correlated with maternal complications during the postoperative period;
Cardiac surgery during pregnancy requires differentiated precautions and a hospital protocol.

## 5.6. Percutaneous Cardiac Intervention

## 5.6.1. General Principles
The use of percutaneous interventions during gestation has gradually increased, driven by their greater availability and by the risks imposed during surgery with CPB. In general, these interventions are considered during gestation for severe symptomatic heart diseases whose treatment cannot be postponed because they pose risks to the mother’s life. 
The goal of percutaneous intervention during gestation is to save the mother’s life and protect the fetus from the potential risks of radiation. Accordingly, proposing that intervention be performed at the beginning of the second trimester takes the following into consideration: (1) organogenesis is almost complete; (2) fetal thyroid function is not active; (3) uterine volume is moderately increased (greater distance between the fetus and the maternal thorax); 4) facility of using barrier devices for protection. 
An alternative method to protect the fetus is by using echo (transthoracic, esophageal, or 3-dimensional) as a substitute to fluoroscopy. This makes it possible to place the catheters and to measure valve orifice diameters and aortic coronary outflow position; it also serves as a guide for balloon catheter valvuloplasty procedures and prosthetic valve insertion, including valve-in-valve procedures, and it assists coronary stent release.
Fluoroscopy should follow the criteria that include; (1) low radiation doses, (2) abdominal shielding, (3) distancing direct radiation from the abdominal region. Procedure duration should be as short as possible, because the risk of radiation to the fetus must always be taken into consideration. Nevertheless, this concern should not impede the use of essential diagnostic procedures, making use of the best available method for the given clinical situation. 

## 5.6.2. Percutaneous Valve Interventions

5.6.2.1. Balloon Catheter Valvuloplasty in Mitral Stenosis

BCV in mitral stenosis should preferably be performed during the second trimester of gestation, and it should be indicated for women with significant mitral stenosis in NYHA FC III/IV, who do not respond satisfactorily to conventional clinical treatment. The results of BCV, when its indications are followed, have been shown to be superior to those of conventional surgery, with lower mortality and better clinical condition in approximately 80% of cases. 
The criteria for indicating mitral BCV include the following:
Absence of: (1) severe mitral regurgitation; (2) concomitant valve or coronary lesion requiring correction; (3) left atrial thrombus proven by transesophageal echo;
Compatible anatomical condition of the mitral valve, namely: (1) certain flexibility; (2) non-excessive calcification; (3) commissural fusion; (4) approachable subvalvular portion;
Wilkins echocardiographic score equal to or less than 8, allowing for better immediate and long-term result. 
Expanding to include patients with Wilkins score up to 10 as a result of pregnancy is controversial, because the potential for complications such as acute mitral insufficiency can be fatal. In very special situations, mitral BCV with an index above 8 requires previous discussion with a heart team and availability of resources in the event that emergency surgery is necessary. 

5.6.2.2. Aortic Stenosis

Patients who present severe aortic stenosis with manifestations of HF, limiting angina, and syncope during pregnancy are indicated for valve intervention, and balloon aortic valvuloplasty (BAV) may be performed by an experienced operator. In adolescents, it has good immediate and long-term results; in patients in higher age ranges, however, results are worse. BAV may thus serve as a “bridge” to temporary improvement in clinical condition, making it possible to reach gestational age for safe delivery in favorable hemodynamic conditions. It is worthwhile to remember that, when the procedure is performed, conventional rescue surgery should be available in the event of emergency. It is, furthermore, essential that, after gestation, these patients receive follow up with clinical examinations and periodic echo to determine the eventual need for definitive heart valve disease correction.

5.6.2.3. Congenital Pulmonary Valve Stenosis

Severe, symptomatic pulmonary valve stenosis (PVS) with manifestations of HF, arrhythmias, or syncope is uncommon during pregnancy. In this situation, BCV has been indicated with immediate success. 

5.6.2.4. Percutaneous Implantation of Prosthetic Valve

In recent years, we have witnessed the development of transcatheter aortic valve implantation (TAVI). It has the great advantage of avoiding cardiac surgery with CPB, but it requires intensive use of ionizing radiation by means of aortic valve tomography for preliminary study of the structures involved (aortic ring, prosthesis diameter, coronary height, and the thoracic and peripheral arterial system), as well as radioscopy during the procedure, to assist in catheter placement and visualization of prosthesis expansion. Conventional TAVI is thus, not approved, during gestation, due to the high fetal radiation burden.
This notwithstanding, arterial ultrasound for evaluation of the arterial system (iliac, aorta, and coronary height), in conjunction with 3-dimensional echo (evaluation of the valve ring) was successful in the first reported case of TAVI during gestation, which used short periods of radioscopy to place the prosthesis. The fact that pregnant women are younger, with healthy arterial vascular beds, facilitates navigation with catheters; nevertheless, there should exist a degree of valve calcification to allow for prosthesis placement, and this is not always found in this group of patients.

5.6.2.5. Valve-in-Valve Procedure for Bioprosthetic Valve Dysfunction

BPV dysfunction is very common in young women, and it sometimes requires valve replacement during gestation. In this scenario, valve-in-valve type procedures are promising in order to avoid surgery with CPB. Prostheses are introduced by means of catheters, using the following routes: femoral artery or other arterial accesses to the aorta, femoral vein followed by transseptal puncture and left atrial access, and left ventricular apical (transapical) incision. A case report during pregnancy has described transapical implantation of 2 prostheses, mitral and aortic, with the aid of transesophageal echo and restricted use of fluoroscopy, which made it possible to reach vaginal delivery with positive maternal-fetal results.

5.6.2.6. Coronary Angioplasty

Primary percutaneous coronary intervention is the treatment of choice for acute coronary syndrome during gestation, while thrombolysis is less utilized. Coronary angioplasty with conventional stents has been considered safe in cases of obstructive arterial disease due to atherosclerotic disease.
While the safety of drug-eluting stents is still not known, the need for dual antiplatelet therapy for a prolonged period of time with this type of stent constitutes a serious restriction to their use during gestation, owing to the hemorrhagic risks. Furthermore, clopidogrel should be interrupted 7 days before delivery, which adds a risk of stent thrombosis.
In spontaneous coronary dissection, the indication for angioplasty should consider the technical difficulties and the vascular fragility peculiar to this situation, which increases the risk of extension of coronary damage, in addition to the fact that its success is considered suboptimal. For this reason, most cases of coronary dissection benefit from conservative treatment. , In situations where coronary angioplasty is indicated, the option to use the latest generation of drug-eluting stents, which require dual antiplatelet therapy for a shorter time (3 months) may be a safer option.
The dilemma of this decision is that obstetric risk (maternal hemorrhage) and cardiac risk (stent thrombosis) must be judged on a case-by-case basis by an interdisciplinary team, because, to date, there are no studies on these circumstances that support decision making.

## 5.6.3. Key Points
Percutaneous intervention during pregnancy should be indicated in cases of complications refractory to conventional clinical treatment or in conditions of imminent risk of maternal life;
Percutaneous intervention should always be performed after discussion with the Heart Team in Tertiary Cardiology Services.

## 5.7. Cardiovascular Emergencies

## 5.7.1. Acute Heart Failure
Circulatory overload during the pregnancy and postpartum period in patients with structural heart disease, even if it is asymptomatic, may be responsible for acute heart failure (AHF), treating it during gestation can lead to improvement of symptoms and prevention of maternal death. The orientation of attendance follows the recommendations for patients with HF in the emergency room ( ), but it is necessary to consider the risks of medication use regarding the mother, the fetus, labor, and lactation, as well as necessary adjustments according to gestational age.

 

It is worth mentioning that in addition to the symptoms of CHF, the identification of systemic and/or pulmonary congestion and low output, supported by subsidiary exams, define the determining cause in most cases. , , 
Laboratory examinations should be part of the investigation of AHF during pregnancy, and they include the following: electrolyte dosage, BNP, , renal function, markers of myocardial necrosis, thyroid profile, blood count, and other infectious parameters.
Interaction with the obstetric team is mandatory to determine both gestational age and parameters of fetal vitality and viability. Eventual indication of therapeutic delivery and the route of delivery should be part of the algorithm for attending cases with AHF during pregnancy.
Acute dyspnea during pregnancy should include the following differential diagnoses: AMI, pulmonary congestion in preexisting heart disease, PPCM, PTE, and myocarditis. Orientation for differential diagnosis may be summarized by the following points:
AMI: dyspnea and angina pain; over 35 years of age; history of tobacco use and use of contraceptives with estrogen components; elevated serum troponin levels; echo with alterations in segmental motility. Definitive diagnosis is made by coronary cineangiography;
Preexisting heart disease: Dyspnea is more frequent during the second and third trimesters. Serum levels of BNP may be elevated, and echo shows structural cardiac injury. In Brazil, acute pulmonary edema is common as the first manifestation of mitral stenosis, from the second trimester of gestation on;
PPCM: dyspnea during the last month of gestation or, more frequently, after delivery, with significant elevation in levels of BNP and new systolic dysfunction in the left and right ventricles. CMR is important to determine diagnosis; 
Thromboembolism: Dyspnea is associated with pleuritic chest pain. Levels of troponin and BNP are elevated, and right ventricular dysfunction and PH are signs of greater severity of this event. It is worth emphasizing that sensitivity and negative predictive value of D-dimer are limited when there is suspicion of PVS during pregnancy; 
Myocarditis: Dyspnea is associated with unspecific symptoms related to viral infection. Troponin may be elevated (myocardial inflammatory processes increase cellular release), and echo may demonstrate segmental akinesis or diffuse hypokinesis. CMR with identification of myocardial edema or mesocardial fibrosis reinforce diagnosis. , 
During clinical evaluation, it is fundamental to determine hemodynamic profile. In patients classified as profile B (wet and warm), volume adjustment with diuretics and vasodilators, in the absence of hypotension and shock, should be considered sparingly, keeping the formal contraindication to the use of ACEI and ARB in mind and giving preference to the use of nitrates and hydralazine, in combined therapy, whenever possible.
Loop diuretics are safe. Furosemide is the most commonly used, at an initial dose of 20 to 40 mg, with the possibility of optimization, depending on previous chronic use, diuretic response, and improvement of dyspnea and hypoxemia. Fetal risks are consequent to reduced placental flow due to volume adjustment beyond what is necessary.
In more severe patients or cases of acute pulmonary edema, without hypotension or shock, nitroglycerin or sodium nitroprusside is used in continuous infusion, preferably guided by invasive arterial monitoring. Doses and infusion rates are described in . Continuous fetal monitoring should also be performed, seeing that the abrupt reduction in maternal arterial pressure may compromise fetal vitality.

 

Non-invasive ventilation (NIV) support with positive pressure is indicated for all patients with peripheral arterial saturation < 90% and respiratory distress or discomfort who do not improve with oxygen therapy. It is also indicated for patients with acute pulmonary edema, given that, in non-pregnant women, it is known to have benefits for reducing the need for invasive mechanical ventilation support. 
In patients with symptomatic hypotension, signs of low cardiac output with organic dysfunction, or cardiogenic shock, there is a need for inotropic agents and, in some cases, association with vasoconstrictors, similarly to non-pregnant patients. Dobutamine is the most widely used inotropic agent, because it promotes a dose-dependent increase in cardiac output, even though its arrhythmogenic effect is limiting, and it presents lower efficacy in cases of chronic beta-blocker use. Milrinone, in addition to increasing cardiac output, is able to reduce peripheral and pulmonary resistance. It is, therefore, indicated in patients with congenital heart disease and PH. Levosimendan presents a positive inotropic effect, due to its vasodilatory action, however, it should be used with greater caution in pregnant women. shows drugs and their recommended doses for treatment of AHF during pregnancy. In patients with AHF due to PPCM, as discussed in section 3.3.7, levosimendan is preferable, keeping the biomolecular effects inherent to catecholamines in mind. A recent study has demonstrated a beneficial effect of levosimendan (at a dose of 0.1 mcg/kg/min) in relation to improvements in ventricular function and systemic congestion in pregnant women with AHF due to PPCM. 

 

Norepinephrine is indicated in the occurrence of significant arterial hypotension or cardiogenic shock, because, in addition to its vasoconstrictor effect that modulates vasoplegia and redistributes blood flow, it also has an effect on cardiac output. In refractory patients, who do not respond to pharmacological measures, success has been described with the use of temporary mechanical circulatory assist devices, such as intra-aortic balloon (IAB) and extracorporeal membrane oxygenation (ECMO). 

## 5.7.2. Arrhythmia
The main consideration in practice for poorly tolerated arrhythmias with hemodynamic impact is to prioritize the mother’s life. Nonetheless, treatment should also be weighed in relation to the side effects of antiarrhythmic drugs on maternal cardiac output and uteroplacental flow, oxytocic effects, and proarrhythmogenic effects on the fetus.
For these reasons, antiarrhythmic medication, maintenance, discontinuation, or dose optimization should be individualized depending on the type of arrhythmia, gestational period, maternal structural disease, and risk of sudden death. 
Nodal reentry tachycardia is the most common SVT, followed by atrioventricular tachycardia. Its occurrence is more frequently observed during pregnancy; its treatment in the emergency room, however, does not present modifications in relation to non-pregnant women. In stable patients, the vagal maneuver is the first choice, followed by the use of adenosine, which does not pass the placental barrier, in a bolus (6 mg, followed by 12 mg if it persists). Regarding CCB, verapamil is a good, safe option. In patients with signs of pre-excitation on resting ECG, there is a formal contraindication to the use of beta-blockers. In patients with hemodynamic instability, synchronized electrical cardioversion is indicated. There are no contraindications to cardioversion, and, other than choosing the most appropriate form of sedation, there are no additional precautions. Indication for catheter ablation may be considered during pregnancy, using electromechanical mapping in refractory cases.
AF, atrial flutter, and atrial tachycardia are uncommon during gestation in patients without structural cardiac injury. In situations of accelerated ventricular response, there is a risk of hemodynamic degeneration in both the mother and the fetus. In all patients, it is necessary to rule out association with infection, anemia, and thyrotoxicosis. In order to control AF frequency in patients with high ventricular response, lanatoside-C, verapamil, or metoprolol are used. Under hemodynamic instability that might be attributable to tachycardia, synchronized electrical cardioversion is indicated. Patients with AF and heart valve disease have a precise indicated for anticoagulation. In cases that are more clinically stable, when opting for rhythm control, electrical cardioversion is preferable to chemical cardioversion, considering the teratogenic effect of amiodarone and the scarcity of evidence in relation to the safety of high doses of propafenone. In cases where time since onset of arrhythmia exceeds 48 hours, it is necessary to perform transesophageal echo. 
For patients with flutter, cardioversion is preferable, given its high reversibility rate, observing less than 48 hours of onset or after performance of transesophageal echo to rule out the presence of intracavitary thrombi.
The occurrence of VT during gestation is rare, but it may occur in high-risk patients, especially those with structural disease and ventricular dysfunction. Electrical cardioversion is indicated when the maternal clinical picture is unstable. In patients without hemodynamic instability, lidocaine is safe, and it has the best reversibility rate. The use of amiodarone should be excluded to isolated situations, when cases are refractory and ventricular arrhythmia recurs following electrical cardioversion, and it is necessary to be aware of its dose-dependent effects on the fetus. ICD implantation in indicated patients is approved during pregnancy when it ensures better prognosis during delivery and the postpartum period. 

## 5.7.3. Acute Myocardial Infarction
AMI, which is uncommon during pregnancy, is potentially fatal. Over the past decades, its incidence has been found to increase, notwithstanding reduced maternal mortality due to the issue during gestation. 
In general, practice for treating AMI during gestation follows the same recommendations as the general population, including revascularization with stent angioplasty or surgical revascularization. Multiprofessional care includes obstetric evaluation and continuous monitoring of the fetus, with evaluation of fetal vitality and cardiotocography.
Clinical treatment of AMI during pregnancy considers the following: 
Oxygen therapy: nasal O2 catheter, 2 to 3 L/min;
Pain control: Morphine sulfate is considered to be safe and effective, but it may lead to respiratory depression in the fetus if administered near delivery;
Nitrates: Attention should be paid to the risk of maternal hypotension and consequent low uteroplacental flow;
Beta-blockers: metoprolol, carvedilol, or propranolol. Fetal monitoring with cardiotocography is recommended to control uterine dynamics and fetal heartbeat;
Aspirin: low doses (< 150 mg);
Clopidogrel may be used, but it should be suspended 7 days before delivery;
Heparins: UFH and LMWH are used according to indications. Fondaparinux should only be used when heparins are contraindicated.
Indicated treatment of AMI with ST-segment elevation is coronary reperfusion, as early as possible, , by means of either thrombolytic drugs or, preferably, primary coronary angioplasty with stents. Thrombolytics should be restricted to cases where the hemodynamic room is not available in a timely manner. Restrictions to its use are due to the risk of placental hemorrhage. If percutaneous angioplasty is indicated, there is still controversy regarding the preference of conventional stents to drug-eluting stents. 
Risk stratification of patients with acute coronary syndrome without ST segment elevation is indicated, in the same manner as in non-pregnant patients, considering age, vital signs, risk factors, recent or recurrent symptoms, and electrocardiographic and laboratory findings. In low-risk pregnant patients without signs of HF, refractory pain, or electric instability, conservative clinical treatment is indicated. In contrast, in high-risk pregnant patients, invasive stratification during the first 24 to 48 hours following the onset of the acute condition should be prioritized in order to proceed to myocardial revascularization. 
Spontaneous coronary artery dissection is a frequent cause of AMI in women, it should, therefore, be the first hypothesis when faced with an acute ischemic event during gestation. Treatment should follow conventional recommended measures. 

## 5.7.4. Acute Aortic Syndrome
Most acute aortic syndromes occur in women with diseases predating gestation, but they may also affect patients who were previously healthy. It is estimated that the incidence of dissection of the aorta in the population is from 2.4 to 2.9 out of 100,000 patients yearly, and there appears to exist a strong correlation with pregnancy in women under 40 years of age. 
Chest pain in women with aortic disease requires investigation with angiotomography of the aorta, in order to rule out suspicion of acute dissection of the aorta. In pregnant patients with type A dissection, with involvement of the ascending aorta, there is an indication for emergency cardiac surgery, in addition to pressure and heart rate control. The procedure should take place in conjunction with a multiprofessional team in a tertiary cardiology center, and cesarean delivery is indicated when the fetus is viable, followed by correction of the dissection. In situations where the fetus is not viable, cardiovascular surgery is performed, prioritizing the mother’s life (contemplating that fetal mortality is from 20% to 30%). 
In women with uncomplicated type B dissection of the aorta, without involvement of the ascending aorta, initial conservative treatment is indicated, maintaining adequate arterial pressure and heart rate control. In the event that there are signs of complication, such as persistent pain, uncontrolled arterial hypertension, progression of dissection, ischemia in a target organ or symptoms of aortic rupture, percutaneous treatment should be considered, even though it has been little described during gestation. Route of delivery should be cesarean once fetal viability has been ensured.

## 5.7.5. Prosthetic Valve Thrombosis
The incidence of thrombosis in mechanical prostheses during pregnancy varies according to the anticoagulation regime utilized. Diagnosis should be considered in previously asymptomatic pregnant women who present dyspnea, chest pain, and symptoms of hypotension. Transesophageal echo is the gold standard examination for definition. 
Treatment of valve thrombosis during pregnancy or the postpartum period should be the same as that proposed for non-pregnant patients, taking their clinical condition, thrombus size and localization of the affected prosthesis into consideration. 
Thrombolytic use should be considered in critical patients who would present great risks of death if they underwent surgery, in places where a surgical team is not available, and in the event of thrombosis in the tricuspid or pulmonary valve. The following thrombolytic doses are recommended: streptokinase, 1,500,000 IU for 60 minutes without UFH; or alteplase (rT-PA), 10 mg in a bolus + 90 mg for 90 min with UFH. , In partially successful cases, i.e., cases that persist with residual thrombi, patients should be referred for surgery 24 hours after thrombolytic infusion has been discontinued.
A protocol with low-dose thrombolytic therapy in slow infusion (rT-PA 25 mg, intravenous infusion for 6 hours, repeated after 24 hours and, if necessary, up to 6 times, reaching a maximum dose of 150 mg, without bolus or concomitant use of heparin) has recently been proposed for pregnant women with prosthesis thrombosis. The results have shown that thrombolysis was efficacious, with no maternal deaths, and fetal mortality rate was around 20%, which is better than the routinely used strategies. With the enhancement of surgical techniques, however, it is not possible to infer that thrombolysis is superior to surgery during pregnancy.
The issue with surgery is due to high perioperative mortality (between 5% and 18%), which is closely associated with NHYA FC, which is the main predictor variable. Patients in NHYA FC I/III present 4% to 7% mortality, whereas those in FC IV present 17.5% to 31.3%. In contrast, surgery presents a higher rate of success than thrombolysis (81% versus 70.9%). In this scenario, it should be considered in urgent or emergency cases, depending on the patient’s clinical condition. Surgical procedures are associated with maternal and fetal risks, when performed during pregnancy.
In patients with non-obstructive thrombi, who are stable from the hemodynamic point of view and who have no signs of decompensated HF, parenteral anticoagulation at therapeutic doses, with heparin according to APTT and echocardiographic imaging control, is the option. In cases that fail to respond to treatment, thrombolysis or conventional surgery should be indicated. , 

## 5.7.6. Cardiorespiratory Arrest
Cardiorespiratory arrest (CRA) in pregnant women is one of the most dramatic and challenging situations in the emergency room. Although the steps for cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) in pregnant women are very similar to those related to the conventional protocol stipulated by advanced cardiac life support (ACLS), there are different details that require due attention, which are summarized in . 

 

It is worthwhile to remember that many episodes of CRA are preceded by signs of hemodynamic instability. For this reason, teams providing care should receive training regarding not only prompt recognition and evaluation of these findings, but also complete performance of CPR in a synchronous manner. 
The mechanical effects of the pregnant uterus can aggravate desaturation and hypotension in aortocaval compression, favoring cardiorespiratory collapse.In the attempt to reduce aortocaval compression by the gravid uterus, manual left uterine displacement should be performed throughout attendance and during care following CRA. 
When indicated, defibrillation should be performed promptly, without delay or questioning. It is known that it does no harm to the fetus; it is completely safe, and the energy doses established by current protocols should be maintained. 
In the same manner as the indications for defibrillation regarding energy doses, medications and their doses should be the same as those defined by protocols used in adults in general. , , 
Attention should be paid to venous access above the diaphragm, thus minimizing the effects of aortocaval compression caused by the gravid uterus, which would make it difficult to recirculate the medication. 
For pregnant women, in addition to considering the classic causes of CRA established by the ACLS protocol, which makes use of a mnemonic device with letters A to H, there are other diverse conditions which may favor cardiorespiratory collapse, and which may be corrected ( ).

 

As soon as CRA is identified in a pregnant patient, the performance of perimortem cesarean delivery should promptly be considered if the patient’s uterus is above her umbilicus. This measure is characterized by performing cesarean delivery and birth of the fetus after maternal CRA, in most cases during the period of CPR. A review of the last decade has shown that perimortem cesarean delivery is related to maternal survival in 31.7% of cases, and it has no harmful effects on the mother. 
One of the purposes of performing this type of delivery is to facilitate CPR, because it possible to release aortocaval compression by the gravid uterus completely, seeing that lateralizing it to the left is not sufficient. The other purpose is to deliver the child, reducing the risk of anoxia during the period of CRA, thus minimizing definitive neurological sequelae. 
The decision to perform urgent cesarean delivery should be made within the first 4 minutes after CRA. Delivery should be in the same place as attendance for CPR, given that patient transfer may lead to delays that increase risks to the fetus and compromise resuscitation maneuvers. It is worth highlighting that the entire CPR protocol should be maintained during performance of the procedure. In situations where the maternal clinical picture is considered irreversible, perimortem cesarean delivery should be performed immediately.

## 5.7.7. Key Points
In emergency cases, practice should prioritize the mother’s life. It is not justified to omit any treatment that is essential to the mother on account of concerns regarding potentially harmful effects to the fetus;
Practice for cardiac emergencies during pregnancy should follow conventional protocols, such as ACLS.
Cesarean section is considered “perimortem” in pregnant women with uterine height above the umbilical scar, in order to improve the maternal-fetal prognosis.

## 6. Family Planning

## 6.1. Pregnancy Counseling and Maternal Risk Stratification
Preconception counseling is essential for women of reproductive age with heart disease, with emphasis on maternal and fetal risks related to gestation and information regarding the safety and efficacy of contraception. The criteria of functional evaluation for approving or contraindicating pregnancy include anamnesis, clinical examination, and subsidiary examinations, such as ECG, chest X-ray, transthoracic or transesophageal echo, CMR, ergospirometry test, and other more specific tests. Invasive intervention for eventual treatment of cardiac lesions, if indicated, should be performed before gestation.
Once a diagnosis of heart disease (anatomical, functional, and syndromic) has been determined, the risk of pregnancy is weighed together with the couple or relatives. Identification of risk predictors for pregnancy contributes to determining maternal prognosis and decision making, such as approving or advising against conception.
The prospective multicenter study known as CARPREG considered a study population composed 75% of women with congenital heart disease and 25% of women with acquired heart disease, verifying cardiovascular complications in 13%, including 3 cases of maternal death. The predictors of maternal mortality proposed by this study are shown in .

 

Subsequently, the ZAHARA study , defined independent predictors of mortality for women with congenital heart disease, generating a very specific risk estimate. The event rate in the 1,300 women studied was 7.6%, and the most frequent complications were arrhythmia (4.7%) and HF (1.6%) ( ).

 

The classification for the WHO which divides heart diseases by increasing level of severity: (1) risk I includes low-risk heart diseases (accepted as equal to that of the general population); (2) risk II denotes a slight risk of mortality and moderate risk of morbidity; (3) risk III, there is a significant risk of mortality or severe morbidity, (4) risk IV denotes a high risk of mortality that contraindicates pregnancy ( ). 

 

Comparison between the 3 studies, considering the CARPREG, ZARAHA, and WHO scores, revalidated the WHO classification as the most accepted and reliable for predicting risks of heart disease to pregnancy (Tabela 47).
Patients included in the IV-WHO risk should be advised against pregnacy. The Registry of Pregnancy and Cardiac Disease (ROPAC) validated the modified WHO classification, which includes an intermediate category (risk II/III-WHO) which means moderate risk of morbidity and mortality. This study also showed differences between developed and emerging countries regarding the characteristics of heart diseases and the complication rates that can lead to distortions in the interpretation of the risk score. The ESC Guidelines suggest using the modified WHO classification to establishment maternal risk.
This Brazilian Statement understand that WHO classification is the most accepted, and it should be applied to risk stratification of heart diseases for pregnancy. It is worth considering that complicating factors that are expected throughout the natural history of heart diseases, such as complex arrhythmias, prior HF, thromboembolism, or IE, aggravate maternal risk. The resources for care and the availability of a multidisciplinary team should also be considered and individualized during pregnancy counseling.
The ESC Guidelines added aortic diseases associated with the following to WHO risk IV category: Turner syndrome (aortic size index of 25 mm/m ); tetralogy of Fallot (aorta diameter > 50 mm), Ehlers-Danlos vascular syndrome; and Fontan circulation with complications.

## 6.1.1. Key Points
Family planning is essential for women with heart disease, regarding both risk stratification for pregnancy and contraceptive choice;
Risk predictors should be defined before pregnancy;
The risk classification elaborated by the WHO is currently the most accepted;
Resources for attendance and availability of a specialized multidisciplinary team should be considered during pregnancy counseling.

## 6.2. Contraception in Patients with Cardiovascular Disease

## 6.2.1. Different Contraceptive Methods
Contraception is the use of methods and techniques with the aim of impeding sexual relations from resulting in pregnancy. It is a family planning resource for constituting desired and consciously planned reproduction. There are currently numerous known contraceptive strategies, which may be grouped into the following categories: behavior-based methods, barrier methods, intrauterine devices (IUD), hormonal methods, and surgical methods.
Hormonal methods include combined (containing estrogen and progestin) and progestin-only methods. The former include combined pills, vaginal rings, patches, and monthly ingestions. Progestin-only methods include progestin-only pills, quarterly injections, etonogestrel subdermal implant, and levonorgestrel-releasing IUD.
Understanding that different means of contraception present different mechanisms of action, adverse event profiles, beneficial non-contraceptive effects, which vary according to any given clinical context, is the basis for selecting the most appropriate contraceptive method; it is also indispensable to evaluate patients’ wishes and expectations, in addition to their beliefs regarding the method, in order to optimize adherence.
In order to choose a contraceptive method, should be considerer 1) safety supported on the into medical eligibility criteria of available methods 2) clinical condition of patiente; 3) effectiveness, determined by the number of failures (i.e. pregnancies) that occur in every 100 women utilizing the method for 12 months, which is known as the Pearl index ( ).

 

Patients with severe diseases that contraindicate pregnancy or patients who wish to postpone or avoid pregnancy should receive adequate counseling regarding contraception. Furthermore, patients with contraindications to gestation have higher surgical risks; for this reason, permanent methods (laparotomic, laparoscopic, or hysteroscopic tubal ligation) are not any more recommended than any other highly efficacious methods.
In recent years, special attention has been given to long-acting reversible contraception (LARC) methods. These methods have greater adherence because they do not depend on the user remembering them; furthermore, they have greater contraceptive efficacy, with a lower number of failures, and they do not contain estrogen. This category includes both types of IUD (copper and levonorgestrel) and etonogestrel subdermal implant. , 

## 6.2.2. Medical Eligibility Criteria
The WHO has analyzed the safety of different contraceptive methods, taking each clinical condition and their relevant characteristics into consideration, including the following: whether the method worsens a preexisting condition or adds additional health risks; and whether the condition renders the contraceptive method less effective. Safety should always be weighed when comparing the risk of an unplanned pregnancy. It is fundamental to remember that refusing patients access to all contraceptive methods due to concerns related to diseases they have increases the risk of decompensating these diseases should pregnancy occur.
 shows a summary of the categories of medical eligibility criteria for contraceptive choice.

 

Accompanying women of fertile with heart disease requires decisions on the application of family planning methods and, therefore, contraception counseling. A pioneering study on the efficacy and safety of contraceptives that included low-dose combined oral contraceptives, quarterly injection of progestin, and IUD in women with heart disease showed good tolerance and safety for patients who followed the eligibility criteria. 

## 6.2.3. Contraception in Adverse Conditions

6.2.3.1. Hypertension

In patients with hypertension, the use of combined contraceptive methods may worsen blood pressure control. Ethinylestradiol increases the hepatic synthesis of angiotensinogen, which leads to an increase in angiotensin II and aldosterone, with higher systolic volume and greater cardiac output, as well as increased peripheral vascular resistance, thus resulting in greater arterial pressure. In susceptible patients, this increase may be considerable, causing clinical decompensation. For this reason, patients with hypertension, even if it is controlled, should not use combined methods; there is, however, no contraindication to the use of progestin-only methods in patients with controlled hypertension, and, in patients with uncontrolled hypertension, only quarterly injections should be avoided. shows the medical eligibility criteria for different types of contraception in relation to patients with SAH.

 

6.2.3.2. Diabetes Melittus

Patients with diabetes are at a greater risk of cardiovascular events than healthy women, and they are more exposed to unfavorable outcomes during pregnancy. For this reason, contraception in patients with diabetes should be guided by the best available evidence. summarizes the eligibility criteria for different contraceptive methods in patients with diabetes.

 

There is a theoretical concern that, due to its glucocorticoid effect, quarterly depot injections of medroxyprogesterone acetate may worsen glycemic control, and, in patients with vasculopathy, they may increase the risk of thromboembolic and cardiovascular events; for this reason, it is classified as category 3.

6.2.3.3. Heart Valve Disease

Complicated heart valve diseases are included in the WHO list of conditions that expose women to greater health risks due to undesired pregnancy. , Nevertheless, several studies have shown expressively low rates of use of contraceptive methods in women with heart disease. , To comprehend the criteria summarized in , heart valve diseases are divided into complicated and uncomplicated. Those that are accompanied by PH, risk of AF, and history of subacute bacterial endocarditis are considered complicated. shows the medical eligibility criteria for different types of contraception in relation to patients with heart valve disease.

 

Currently, the indication for antibiotic prophylaxis during IUD insertion is controversial, and the available evidence does not seem to justify making it mandatory. Deciding whether or not to use it is at the attending physician’s discretion, considering associated risks and benefits. It is, however, indispensable to remember that the best way to avoid pelvic infection is by performing adequate antisepsis.

6.2.3.4. Previous Cardiovascular Events

Women with ischemic coronary disease or stroke may safely initiate progestin-only contraceptive methods, with the exception of the quarterly injection. However, if events occurred after hormonal contraceptive use, it should be changed to a non-hormonal method. In this clinical context, combined methods, also should be avoided. , shows the medical eligibility criteria of different contraceptive methods in relation to patients with previous cardiovascular events.

 

6.2.3.5. Obesity

In the absence of other clinical conditions, obese patients do not have contraindications to the use of any method. Furthermore, even if it is necessary to investigate metabolic syndrome and screen for other cardiovascular conditions due to obesity, the results of complementary examinations should not delay the introduction of contraceptive methods. 
With respect to quarterly injections (150-mg doses of intramuscular depot medroxyprogesterone acetate), there is a Brazilian study showing significantly higher weight gain in women using quarterly injections, in comparison with copper IUD. For this reason, quarterly injections are not typically the first choice; there is, however, no formal contraindication, and the method may be used.
Specifically in obese women, there is a theoretical concern that methods may be less efficacious. Even if this is the case, their efficacy continues to be high; for this reason, they should not be contraindicated.

6.2.3.6. Congenital Heart Disease

Contraception counseling in patients with congenital heart disease begins at menarche, with advice regarding the risks of gestation and choice of contraception method. Congenital heart diseases are not explicitly listed in the WHO’s eligibility criteria, and they should be understood within the physiopathology of each group of heart disease and the risk of unplanned pregnancy ( ). Complex congenital heart diseases present diverse structural lesions which complicate risk stratification of contraceptive use. , In any event, cyanotic heart diseases, diseases with PAH, Eisenmenger syndrome, and diseases with an elevated risk of thromboembolism have an absolute contraindication to the use of combined methods. For these groups of patients in WHO classes III and IV, the use of progestin-only methods is recommended, and monthly injections are recommended in cases with low risks of tromboembolism. - Due to pain issues, when patients have more delicate heart conditions that occur with the risk of arrhythmias, the IUD should be inserted in a hospital environment, with the possibility of prompt relief provided by an anesthesiologist with experience in women with heart disease, due to the risk of vagal reaction following IUD insertion.

 

6.2.3.7. Pulmonary Hypertension

As the literature is very limited, eligibility criteria for patients with PAH are not included. For this reason, contraception should be effective, tolerable, and non-harmful, because all patients with PAH should be advised against becoming pregnant. For this reason, barrier methods or “fertility-awareness” based methods are not recommended, because they have very elevated failure rates. Among reversible hormonal contraceptives, estrogen-containing compounds are not recommended due to the risk of PTE, leaving progestin-only methods, which may be injectable, oral, or via subcutaneous implantation, which is the most indicated. , Copper-T IUD pose a risk of metrorrhagia, while long-acting reversible contraceptive (LARC) methods with levonorgestrel may be recommended when the patient does not present structural cardiac injury.
Unplanned pregnancy is very frequent in women with heart disease, especially due inadequate contraception counseling. In fact, myths about the eventual risks and lack of knowledge about the efficacy and application of eligibility criteria are factors which favor maternal mortality. Faced with this reality, contraception counseling regarding preferences, contraindications, and efficacy of methods should be initiated during the immediate postpartum period, even before hospital discharge. 

## 6.2.4. Contraception and Adolescence
Age alone does not represent a contraindication to different methods of contraception; nevertheless, during adolescence, doubts may arise regarding strategies for presenting and prescribing contraceptives. Indication of methods should be based on eligibility criteria and, when attending adolescents, it is necessary to consider ethical and legal aspects, which are not always known.
Article 226 of the Brazilian Constitution guarantees the right to family planning free of coercion, and the Child and Adolescent Statute (Law Number 8069, July 13, 1990) clearly addresses important issues in providing care to adolescents who require contraceptive methods, based on privacy and confidentiality rights.
Adolescent patients have the right to privacy, i.e., to be attended alone, in a private consultation space. Confidentiality is defined as an agreement between physicians and patients, meaning that information discussed during and after consultation may not be disclosed to adolescents’ parents or guardians without their express consent. 
Confidentiality is supported by rules of medical bioethics, through moral principles of autonomy (article 103 of the Code of Medical Ethics). In this manner, adolescents have the right to sexual education, access to information about contraception, confidentiality and secrecy regarding their sexual activity, and the prescription of contraceptive methods; there are no ethical infractions when medical professionals proceed in this manner.
Contraceptive counseling involving short-lasting methods such as pills is generally applied without problems following these precepts. On the other hand, in relation to long-lasting methods (intrauterine methods and implants), as they require medical procedure for insertion, doubts may arise. The Brazilian Federation of Gynecological and Obstetric Associations (FEBRASGO, acronym in Portuguese) suggests that, for these methods, the consent of adolescents and their legal guardians should be considered, reinforcing contraceptive counseling. 
With respect to adolescents with heart disease, contraception should be safe and effective; there is, however, a great barrier to the knowledge of different options and their access, often due to the high initial costs. During contraception counseling for adolescents with WHO risks III/IV for pregnancy, it is necessary to present all available methods with low Pearl indexes, good tolerance, and acceptance for continuity of the method, such as IUD and implants. Nevertheless, the most popular forms of contraception in adolescents continue to be condoms and withdrawal, which represent a high rate of unplanned pregnancy and high risk.
Lack of knowledge, inadequate counseling, social-cultural taboos, legal restrictions, and moralistic attitudes regarding sexuality during adolescence are common, even in patients who choose or wish to use a contraceptive method. Although long-acting methods (IUD and implant) are prioritized by medical entities, difficulties in access and acceptance by adolescents demonstrate that traditional methods, such as combined oral contraceptives and condoms, should receive focus during counseling, with the aim of improving rates of continuity and, in final analysis, reducing the possibility of high-risk pregnancies and maternal mortality due to heart disease.

6.2.4.1. Key Points

There are numerous contraceptive methods (behavior-based, barrier, IUD, hormonal, and surgical) that may be prescribed to women with heart disease;
Choice of contraceptive methods should consider patients individually, including their wishes and tolerance, as well as the eligibility criteria proposed by the WHO;
Ethical and legal aspects should be considered regarding contraception in adolescents.

## 6.3. Ethical Considerations
The advances in medicine transformed Michel Peter’s proverb, “Women with heart disease, don’t get married, and, if you do, don’t get pregnant,” outdated. That was the case two centuries ago for preserving the lives of young women with heart disease. We are currently living in a new era, in which the risk of pregnancy is generally lower, with resources to cope with most complications that may eventually occur.
Heart disease and pregnancy should be a comprehensive topic based on medical ethics, integrating several moments during which the multidisciplinary interface is stablished in the care of pregnant women and her child. Physicians should apply scientific rigor, based on validated clinical recommendations, clarify the benefits and possible risks and respect the patient's right to participate freely and actively in the decision-making process, obtaining consent informed for all decisions.
From moments before conception there have been situations related to maternal and fetal safety. Heart evaluation may reveal different degrees of risk due to pathological, clinical and therapeutic situations. Decision-making results in possible conflicts in the doctor-patient relationship, which require the application of bioethics fundamentals. Prudence must prevail. Therapeutic measures should consider the informed consent of the patient, which is based on their right to answer yes or no.
Furthermore, qualification of multidisciplinary teams is fundamental to family planning in young women with heart disease, based on maternal risk stratification, regarding the article 226 of the Brazilian Constitution, which states the following: “Based on the principles of human dignity and responsible parenthood, family planning is a free choice of the couple, it being within the competence of the State to provide educational and scientific resources **for the exercise of this right, any coercion by official or private agencies being forbidden” (our emphasis added). This norm refers to other items: a) dignity of the human person (Article 1, III) and b) right to liberty (Article 5, Heading).”
During pregnancy, the doctor-patient relationship requires total reception by the doctor and adherence by the patient, obviously with adequate availability of institutional resources and the health system.
Interdisciplinary team is desirable at all times of pregnancy and postpartum period; however, it expands its value in the approximation of childbirth, when it is essential the professional competence of the care team. The decision of moment and type of delivery, the search for technological and infrastructure support in general are well assisted by the application on bioethics fundaments.
The puerperium has specific peculiarities and the mother with heart disease demands a higher level of care than usual, while the newborn already has a life of her own, with her particular demands. Thus, there are conflicts, such as non-consent for a medical instruction, it is up to the doctor – or the Service – to make a critical reassessment, based on bioethics at the Bedside for the specific case. The agreement made with the patient must be strictly adhered to by the doctor.

How to cite this statement:

Avila WS, Alexandre ERG, Castro ML, Lucena AJG, Marques-Santo C, Freire CMV, et. al. Brazilian Cardiology Society Statement for Management of Pregnancy and Family Planning in Women with Heart Disease – 2020. Arq Bras Cardiol. 2020 Arq Bras Cardiol. 2020; 114(5):849-942.

Note: These statements are for information purposes and should not replace the clinical judgment of a physician, who must ultimately determine the appropriate treatment for each patient.